
With my little eye I spy a new horizon. Do you hear the birds singing of their exodus? Or perhaps the cold takes your attention instead. The trees have shed their green long ago and the grass is sleeping beneath the dirt. I also see people; they pound the wood with their hammers and it groans. That casket will outlive them all but the charcoal-coloured ruins dotting the landscape, a tall black tower rising above those decrepit bricks hidden under a veil of dirt and muck. Oak trees grow around them, they too will endure under the crackling cold and howling wind for many seasons to come. Do you think any of them will try to do otherwise? Better yet, can they choose in the first place? The trees and grass and stones certainly don’t have much say in the matter, perhaps neither the birds, but what about the others? When you look at everything from above like this they seem to stupid and short sighted at first but when you peel away your own personal complexities patterns appear. Prophecy becomes math, doom becomes logic, degeneracy becomes philosophy. Yet we are once again stressed by the shedload of snaky spandrels, slivering their way across our studious strategy like the sea serpent stretched across shapeless space, squeezing sense.
A war will soon start, the falling leaves are its trumpets. Some are lucky enough not to worry about that struggle, I spy no one like that here. Before I run my mouth again with pretentious, verbose babbling and bore you further let us look down closer because I spy something little with my little eye.
She is running down one of the old dirt paths, panting. She hasn’t shed her youth like the trees either. Her scales will be battered worse than the wood, yet she still walks around unarmed. The frosts are slowly approaching, yet she is still dressed in rags. Maybe she should hide in the ruins, her black scales would blend in well with those stones. In a faraway place her kind is simply called “new folk”, many enjoy their company but here they are simply referred to as “kobold”; they take good care to avoid anyone marginally stronger than themselves. If push comes to shove, only a handful of blunted talons and crooked teeth will be standing between death and...
This one is a strange specimen; willful with a side of fear, well nurtured but rapidly diminishing, her intelligence is... I find it pointless to quantify such things but still wouldn’t expect too many miracles. She hears the birds sing just as we do yet she does not follow them to warmer lands. No, she has instead decided to rob a funeral service. It was easy enough sneaking behind that tombstone and cutting loose the small sack of money next to the other offerings. People seem to notice you less when you are so short and covered in dirt. She needed the money more than that corpse after all. The coin would have made an excellent guard against winter, but it seems like she is planning to give it away to a debt collector instead. Not the wisest choice considering her circumstances, but it would be downright stupid if she knew what will probably happen. Don’t get me wrong, I’m not blaming her, and you should be ashamed of yourself if you do but when the dead are careful enough to carry gold with them to the next life that lizard-like thief should at least be carrying a shiv in her only one. Still, I guess it would not make too much of a difference in the long-term considering the circumstances of this world of ours. The calculations were made long ago, we would have to wipe the slate clean to change them now. Do not blame me for what the writing demands. 
Take care, we won't meet again until the end as I feel quite sleepy, I assure you, and if somehow we do I will not tell you that it is me. There is nothing you can do now but enjoy the better moments, hopefully she realizes sooner than later that she cannot do the same. As mentioned, do not expect a miracle but remember that she is still better equipped than most, these types tend to create their own luck. A single word would make all the difference in the world, but we can't speak to her. So, go on and listen, will you? Hear the blood flowing through her veins, chest rising with each breath, muscles contracting, air traveling through lungs, out again, in again, out again, in again, the dead out, the living in... Keeping the body walking one more second. 

You finally stop running and look back, only the falling leaves. You take a huge sigh of relief and keep walking slowly towards your cabin. Your muscles are used to the tension but with how little you’ve been eating you won't be able to keep your job at this rate. It feels like someone poured poison into your legs; you’d stop to rest but then you’d have to lie down for a while. Not a good idea with your fingers slowly going numb. On the bright side the ancients haven't yet smitten you for graverobbing. Regardless, a beating by thugs or slavery would be a much longer and painful death than a single lightning strike. You grimly chuckle at your own joke, you even whisper it once more as practice, in case if you want to say it to someone else. 
It sounds stupid out loud; you remind yourself to never tell it to anyone ever. Your body was burning from running so much but now the air is feeling colder. You curse your luck for having to pawn that cloak. All the other thieves seem to have enough money for the whores and ale, why do you have to constantly be in debt to those bastards at the slums? Administration fees he says, bribery checks, commission fees... ever since that human scribe joined things have been getting worse for the little guy. If you had just joined a random group of kobold bandits you would probably be eating like kings now. The world gets infinitely difficult every day. You try to console yourself by saying to the few who listen: "At least I don’t have to break heads to eat!" but now it's your head on the line.
The faint stink of the swamp… you shouldn't be here. To the left and right is the dark forest. You were supposed to turn around at the rock! You look at the black tower rising above the trees, you are much further away from it than you should be. It's getting late, having re-oriented yourself you decide not to almost freeze like last time and instead of taking the slower, overgrown, dirt path you move towards the dark forest; cutting the travel time at the possible cost of blood. 
Only after a few minutes into the journey voices can be heard echoing against the thick line of trees. You slow down to a snail’s pace to keep quiet.
Suddenly a woman's shout rings in the air and a few squirrels scamper away.
“What satisfaction do you receive from my suffering you degenerates?”
Your skill set pays off once more as you manage to hide yourself behind a tree. Upon looking closer you can see a few kobolds and goblins having cornered a fancily dressed lady like a pack of wolves, from their attire it looks like a few of them are tribals while the others are from the city. The woman shouts at them as the circle around her closes: 
-I have magic you imbeciles, don’t make me use it!
The circle closes further, you make use of the movement and even though this is the exact kind of occurrence that leaves one beaten to a pulp and robbed you sneak behind a bush to see better. The woman waves her scarf around as if that’s going to protect her "You'll be massacred once my squire gets back with the guard!". A goblin laughs, "That coward? He dropped his sword while running like a rabbit!" it swings around a shiny new broadsword to confirm the story. To see you better you climb a half-fallen tree that seems like it can hold your weight. You have a nice view from here; even if they kill, loot and strip the lady you should be able to find something of value. 
The gang is now at striking distance, you can hear the desperation in her voice as the threats turn to insults then begging. A red kobold almost the size of a man raises his club to strike but another one with war paint puts his hand on the weapon. “We need it for ritual, that is our deal”. The red kobold turns to him and they start quietly arguing.
Having won a chance to think, the noble stops talking for a moment to weigh her options then decides to roll out one last desperate attempt at persuasion. She looks at the sky and shouts at the top of her well-trained aristocratic throat, sending birds flying in all directions: "Blood God! Take me if you will but curse this filth around me!". You feel a shiver go down your spine as the words echo against the trees, even though these curses never stopped you from robbing the supposedly godly.
The effect seems greater on the superstitious tribal kobolds who start stepping backwards. The big red kobold waves them back and shouts “cowards!” which stops them for a moment. A goblin says something to him, but no one moves. The lady notices the effect her words had and starts dancing awkwardly. You have seen the human dance halls in your time but clearly the bandits haven’t and assume her to be casting some sort of a spell, they slowly start backing off again. Emboldened by the unfolding events, the lady shouts louder this time: "Rain down rock and ash and soot on them, God.” Peh! it's not a good idea to hope anything from gods.
Only then you realize that she is shooting glances at you. Your first instinct is to jump off the tree and run at the highest speed you can away from here.
Yet you find yourself at conflict with your own conscious by the situation. She definitely would not save you in a case like this, but that would make you a better person in the- 
The woman shouts again: “I will reward you well for your aid, god!”. Despite your better judgment you grab a stone hard pinecone from the dead tree. This is stupid, you have to stop reading books. You fling it as hard as you can with your weak arms.
A goblin screams in pain and holds his head, he drops his club and starts running off. You intended to take down the leader, but the goblin seems to cause a chain reaction among the bandits. First, the other goblins run off after the hurt one. Then the kobold leader takes a look around but doesn't seem to be able find the source of the attack, so he and his comrades stand powerless as the leader of the tribals signal his kin to fallow him. In less than a minute the clearing is free of bandits as the other kobolds chase after the fleeing goblins.
You hop off the tree and approach the young lady sitting next to the rock. You can hear her heavy breathing even at a distance. She tries to speak but only manages to indicate a small rock next to her for you to sit on. You comply. She finally manages to cease her heavy breathing and asks: "My knight in shining scales, who might you be?" You feel yourself turn red and mumble “Sulti”, that’s at least what you are called. She lets out a quick, exhausted laugh. "I do not remember ever hearing of such a name among kobolds; must be a very old draconic name, no?" You shrug and tell that it’s probably human. "Look Sulti, I know few who can do magic but fewer who are brave enough to do what you did." Your chest burst with pride and you can’t help but smile briefly before turning your head around to hide your face. "However, we can't speak a word of what happened here." Your heart skips a beat. "Look, I am in some very high places and those places are in a particularly sticky situation right now. So, if word gets out that I spent time with, yet alone almost got robbed by, yet alone saved by a kobold… things wouldn’t look pretty.”
You feel more than a little angry that she is puling this shit after all that you did. Luckily, the aristocrat seems to notice your annoyance and starts rummaging through her pockets, finally taking out a small shining object and hands it to you. It's a golden ring! On second inspection its only gold lined, it has only enough gold to cover the surface which has intricate carved symbols. It would barely cover the cost of a few days' food. You glance disappointedly at the woman and say that the kobold beggar is very grateful for the pocket change. She rolls her eyes “Well, would you like to know how magic actually works in the world?”
Magic? Her? You laugh and ask if magic can make a bowl of porridge appear out of thin air. The lady thinks for a moment, opens her mouth but realizes what you meant.
She closes her eyes and sighs; you can’t decide what she is thinking about. Finally, she pulls out a long silk scarf from here chest and hands it you. You hold the soft fabric and rub it against your scales. You always wanted fancy clothes like this! It’s far too long to cover just your neck so you roll it around your entire shoulders and upper body with it. Covered in silks, you can’t wait to look at your reflection the first chance you get. You must look like a real princess with this attire. You thank the lady and hold out your hand to help her raise, she stands on her own instead. You both look around to make sure the bandits aren't back; you can barely see a figure some distance away. Quickly the both of you part ways without a word.
Just then a passing breeze makes you shiver, you instinctively look around; the black tower seems to briefly light up for a few seconds than goes dark again. You turn your attention back to the road; your shoulders feel heavy.
Despite the gift you curse her under your breath as the aristocrat disappears back into the road, not even glancing at the shining tower. If you had been any other fucking race you would have been knighted on the spot and started feasting in the castle before daybreak, but no. She didn't even have to give you anything actually, she could have just stood up and left and you couldn't have been able to do a thing about it. You kick the air, but it just reminds you of how weak your legs are. You laugh to yourself loudly, those bandits are probably drinking a keg of stolen beer now and eating roasted beef. You imagine them telling jokes and trying to make themselves feel better. The large red kobold probably behind a tree doing gods know what to one of the other ones. You feel more than a little shamed thinking about him holding you and doing what you saw, while under the floorboards of their house, that wealthy couple do. 
You shake your head to clear the inappropriate thoughts and try not to lose the way home this time. Luckily these parts of the forest are better known to you so you easily make your way back to the secluded shack you use for refuge, relief fills your heart as you see that it’s still not fallen apart but once you slide under the broken door that relief disappears. It’s freezing in here! You curse yourself this time for being so stupid. Old Antoni had told you: "I can sense it in my bones, the winter will be bad this year so have a cheap carpenter come fix your roof." What did you do instead? You bought wool clothes. A kobold thief buying wool clothes! Ignoring the stupidity of having new, expensive clothes be tailored for you instead of stealing some, how did you convince yourself that a thief running around all day getting caught up in fences and branches could use those thick clothes? You have to admit that you were jealous of the city folk with their fancy dresses. Well, it doesn’t matter now, the pants are at the bottom of a canal and the coat is hanging from the roof of a building in the city. You don’t even need warm clothes! You are cold blooded. You stop screaming internally and instead light a fire in the broken fireplace. Your hand goes over to the book lying next to the fireplace. Normally you could read at least one or two pages under the light but you feel too tired to decipher the writing tonight, that same tiredness stops you as you start pulling down your loincloth. You simply curl up into a ball in front of the fire, hugging the soft silks you try to ignore the hay you are laying on. Even if it’s on an empty stomach and on rough ground you at least have your own home, how many can say that? No feeling like muscles and bone relaxing on a bed, or something akin to it, after a long day. You push worries about debt and life to the back of your mind.

… shining, showing the darkest lair
shield deflecting, holding the beast by hair
sword lighting, cutting up the meanest layer
a mare, a flock of hair and ...

The cold is the first thing you feel after opening your eyes, it sends shivers down your spine. The blank wooden walls of the room were just as you left them before bed. You rise rapidly to the sound of wind howling, a little early to wake up but with this wind the cabin will no longer be habitable because of the cold. You wrap the oversized scarf around you like robes and open the small wooden box with your meagre supplies. The bread is good, goes down well with water, but when you haven't eaten in a day anything is good. You enjoy the feeling of something actually being in your stomach at least. Each bite tastes better than the last, you try not to eat too fast but still almost choke on a large piece and bite your tongue. You look up at the sky and thank who ever invented bread. Only after the feast do you remember a glimpse of your dream. Were you dreaming about being a knight? No, you were getting saved by a knight. Maybe you were a knight getting saved by another knight. You feel depressed for a moment thinking about all the things you will never do. Commoners becoming knights only happens in fairy tales and you are not even a commoner, you are a kobold, untouchable. You remember the events of yesterday and feel even sadder. You should have pushed further; people have kobold servants, right? Is a squire much more than that? Actually, you are female too. Your stomach aches, you could eat well if you were living in the city. You rub your arms, trying to feel the last bit of muscle left.
You try to concentrate on real life instead and open your purse. The counting takes over an hour, you have to start over many times but one hour is still pretty good for you. All and all you have 203 quarters, around 100 short if you got the maths right, which you really doubt. The golden ring and scarf could net you another 100-120 so you are far from screwed and if you are really metaphorically screwed you can try to do as Tomokie suggested and get literally get screwed for money but that's a last resort. You stop for a moment, what was her real name again? It’s been so long since she last used it that you can’t remember it, you need to spend more time with her once she gets back.
You walk out, it's actually colder inside because the sun is just rising but your scales have seen worse. There is no pain like freezing pain. It both makes you numb and feels like being stabbed by a thousand needles. In an acceptable mood, you start making your way to the village on the outskirts of the city before the sun reaches its height. You use the black tower for positioning as to not lose direction, you occasionally see the structure blink before it is finally too far away to be seen clearly behind the trees. You can't help but feel proud making the walk to the village so quickly knowing it took Old Antoni a whole day to walk to your home. 
Prying away the dumber thoughts from your mind you make your way to Antoni’s house. You find him harvesting the last of this season’s plants in his garden. He seems more than a little distracted, he can't even see you with the height difference.  You could so easily steal from the senile old alchemist but after all he has done that would be low even for you. You climb a box to show your face, Antoni finally sees you and smiles.
"Sulti! My Hero, give ‘Ntoni a hug and don't tell me you caught a cold last night." He ends his sentence with a painfully long cough, you ask him if he caught a sickness himself. He smiles "Yes, I have, we all suffer from this plague, it's called old age." You smirk at the old geezer. " Of course, I can’t actually tell if you are sick with this infernal disease, in all my years I have never seen a kobold die of old age. The joke around those buffoons in the academy is that the gods never expected a kobold to make it over 15 so they didn't bother giving you folk old age." For a moment you imagine yourself as a 200-year-old master wizard kobold discussing deep philosophy with elves younger than you...
Still, you are concerned about the cough and ask him if there is anything else. ‘Ntoni stops smiling and looks away with sadness. "Look, Sulti, I took care of you well enough when I found you on the side of that road..." You hate the 'side of the road' story; just imagining powerless, baby you crying to the cold wind makes you shiver." ... and since then, you have done an admirable job surviving the world. There were hard times, but you were harder… sadly, the fact of the matter is that I can no longer support you, in fact I can't support my own body anymore." You hold his hand and look him in the eyes. "The potions, exercise and forest air...  they help but I don’t think I’m surviving this one." He breaks into coughing again and takes a sip from his waterskin. "Someone else will take over the place, I- I think they will help you but I’m not sure. There are terrible times coming, believe me and you'll need all the help you can get. For now I just want to go back to my hometown, maybe stay there for some time…" You feel the winter air on your neck. "In a day or two return to me please, I have something to give to you. I got some new books for you as well; shorter, simpler ones. I bet you could finish them in a month.” Books are nice but you’d rather read one on something other than “epistemology” or “dialectics” or random papers written by his colleagues. “Take this as well" he hands you two small potions" I think you have more than learned the fact that few things are free in life." You sure did, especially that time when he forced you to stay in his house when you got wounded hunting and then charged for the privilege. "If you get into trouble in the city these will help, they are both painkillers and immunity boosters" You never understood the medical jargon but nod anyway. “I have plenty of these in stock, share if you see someone who needs it more than you…” Right, you’ll share them with a pawnbroker who’ll hopefully share some money with you “…few things in life are better than to help the right people smile, eh?”. 
You leave the garden just as you came and take a look around, you still need some stolen goods if you want to pay off those debts. There are plenty of houses around, most of them unguarded, but breaking into a cottage is not worth the risk. These poor farmers have little money and hide what they have well. Your eyes instead turn to the small caravan set up on the other side of the village. Despite being a wretched backwater this village is only a day’s walk away from the city, right on a major trade artery. With the hour still early, you waste no time in rushing to the empty field’s border. As you approach the carts you see another purple kobold coming towards you, their rough looking leather clothing indicating that they live farther from civilization compared to you. Normally you’d stay away from these types but his calm deminer as he walks closer puts you at ease, his pretty face helps his case as well. Once you are in earshot he speaks in a strange accent.
-Healthy winds, can you help me?
You quickly eye him down for any weapons but can’t see any, so you nod.
-I was hunting for my friends, those traders in the caravan had kobold captives but none were my kin; have you seen any one of us with this tattoo by any chance?
He reaches his hand out but you know better than to come closer, you take a quick glance and say that you haven’t seen any tattooed kobolds.
He shakes his head in disappointment;
-Well, would you like to accompany me as I search for them?
You open your mouth to say yes but just manage to blurt out a garbled noise before clarifying that you have your own responsibilities.
The caravan has at most ten to fifteen traders but with your small stature it seems huge. You make sure to hide behind some bushes as you make your way towards the carts. You quietly approach a large one that looks like it has a proper interior and take a look inside. There are a few boxes inside. You look around once more and step inside. You push the heavy lid of a box and reveal cloth inside, too heavy to steal. You slowly and patiently keep opening boxes until reaching one that is properly locked. You curse your luck once more, you couldn’t buy a new, proper metal rake pick after breaking the old one, you’ll have to be old-school for this one. You slowly slide you smallest talon into the lock and start pushing pins, after a few agonizing minutes you manage to get the lock open and even slide your talon out without issue. But your master plan goes array quickly as you don’t realize how heavy the lid is as you remove it. You try to balance it but quickly drop it on the ground, the lid lands with a heavy thud and snaps in half, alerting a few birds nearby who fly off. You panic and look around, no one here yet. 
You desperately look inside the box, there are only useless old iron rings inside! You start looking closer to see if there is anything worth taking. There are footsteps coming from the house, you feel a sharp pain on your arm. You quickly pull it back and see a wound you made in your hurry to search the sharp metal pieces. Desperate to find anything of value, you grab a mostly clean piece of cloth and try to rush back out the window, only to be met by a smiling elf in front of the exit. You freeze, the footsteps are getting louder, you can't leave through the exit. The elf doesn't move either, so you decide to take your chances and slide inside a box just as the owner of the cart comes in.
A woman gasps and a man curses. They start asking the elf what happened but she simply assures them that a few children came and threw rocks at the cart. The man curses loudly again and walks towards the village with the woman. Once they leave You finally relax and get out of the box. The elf is still waiting there with a soothing smile on her face.
"Well, well, well. Hello thief." You struggle to speak and simply ask her "why". She shrugs. "Oh, I have a soft spot for kobolds, you got to do what you got to do to survive right?" You smile and nod, you at last meet someone sympathetic. The elf softly holds your hand and ties one of the bits of cloth around your wound “I’m a friend”. You like the attention and her soft smile is enchanting. You leave the cart holding her hand and fallow her between the other carts as she talks "Where I come from people treat kobolds much more differently, I respectfully disagreed with that most atrocious attitude and came here to share my expertise with the humble people of your city while helping a few people who had requests of me." You two walk to the back of the village where a large field of grain waits, it's almost harvest time. She stops halfway to some shacks and lights a pipe; you lean in the smell the tobacco since Old Antoni never lets you. The smoke makes you cough and you feel dizzy but it's really nice. reminds you of flowers, you take another breath of the smoke. The feeling is good, but you feel like you are about to fall over. You try to move away but the elf roughly holds your head and makes you inhale more smoke. Once the ordeal is done you feel even dizzier. A bright light catches your eye as you walk across the field. You are being dragged? You look around and realize you are entering one of the shacks.

You try to balance; the elf holds your claw and gently leads you forward.

Now you are lying down on a table? You open your eyes fully and look around, the elf is looking down on you with a devilish smile. "You buffoon! Are you this naive?"
You try to raise but your arms but are tied to the desk. The elf points outside the door and you look: there are kobolds working the fields! "Would you like to join them? No? Didn't think so, no one would like to spend the rest of their short, miserable lives working day and night in a field, no?" You pull on the rope holding you down and your heart starts pounding on your chest. "The instructions were simple, once the city is cleared bring me one extra female and male not taken care of like the rest. But instead, all they have are these useless creatures. That’s why I need you, you see?" You don’t understand what she is saying and keep pulling on the ropes. 
"You know, kobolds have one of the shortest birth cycles of any animals, even faster than rabbits in some cases." She finally finds her key and unlocks a large chest; you feel the ropes cut your scales as you pull. 
" Three weeks for pregnancy, the egg cracks in a day, two weeks recovery and repeat. Every few months you have one more, one more old enough to work at least; rabbits are harder to hold than you beasts, and you can only sell rabbits as food. Kobolds sell for slaves in summer as well." Your claws hurt but you manage to start tearing the rope as she reaches into the chest. A shaking, blindfolded, naked kobold steps out of the chest and instantly falls to the ground.
 “You better be listening well; I need you properly educated if we are going to work together” You don't know if it's divine intervention or strength from fear but one of the ropes give away.
 "So, I buy one slave and another walks right unto my doorstep. That pretentious wizard or whoever he is will be very proud." She approaches you while dragging the shaking kobold along. You want to simply lie there and cry, but primal fear overpowers the weakness. Just as the elf comes into range you unleash a vicious slash that sends her to the ground, before she can even stand up you use your free claw to cut the other rope holding you down. You dash out of the shack with the elf on toe.
As you run the way you came you hear shouting behind you and increasing number of footsteps. You run through the field, the caravan, the village, not looking back once. The footsteps slowly fade as you get away.
After a while you reach the forest and instantly collapse next to a bridge further ahead. You scamper and hide under it, the flowing water hiding your heavy breathing. You cover your mouth and scream on the top your lungs then wait until you are no longer dizzy.
After some time your limbs are still shaking but at least you can move. You groan in pain, your lungs hurt from how hard you’ve been panting. You walk over to running water and drink slowly, you have to stop once in a while to breath.
What the actual fuck was that? You know that poorer folk sometimes buy kobold meat if they are desperate and slavery of individual kobolds is a thing but… this is insanity. For a moment you think what the elf was planning to do with you and that other kobold but softly slap yourself to get rid of the thoughts. That red kobold from yesterday comes into mind, you feel awful for thinking... you slap yourself again. You don’t need this in your life on top of all the other problems. Suddenly your shoulders ache so much that you have to drop your scarf because of the weight. After the second slap you look at your hand and realize that you cracked one of your talons in the shack. Damm the gods! these never heal. You cover your face and think, at least there are still seven more, no? You promise yourself you'll die before letting something like that ever happen. With newfound confidence you look around and realize that you are on the path to the city. 

You grab your scarf and keep walking, trying to remain strong but have to roll back tears every time the thought of what could have been come to mind. After an hour or so the walls of the city can be seen along with the black tower now that you are in a clearing, you take one last look at the strangely active tower before it disappears in the horizon.
The city gates are open, people are flowing in, you get in the line of people waiting for others to pass. Suddenly an arm grabs you by the neck, they must have caught up to you! Luckily, they haven't, a guard threatens to stab your eye out if you make trouble inside the city walls. You stare at his nose and nod in acknowledgment. He drops you and goes over to the other guards. You try to forget the incident by humming a tune, not remembering the lyrics of the song it belongs to.
Holding onto your purse with dear life, you manage to push but primarily get pushed all the way through the crowd and into the city just as the closing bells ring. People try to run inside; someone pushes a cart over a few others and a panicking horse falls into the shallow canal but soon the doorway clears and the gates close. You won’t be able to leave until tomorrow morning. You look around the city square instead. The rotten smell reminds you of where you are. The wealth of the city is nice but at least the forest doesn't make you gag. Supposedly the other cities now have dedicated sewers, people still dump their waste in the same canal they drink from here. At least it runs fast enough to somewhat clear itself.
You only get to visit the city once, maybe twice a month, but it always takes your breath away. Stone houses, three or even four stories tall. Knights in shining armour and plump merchants walking around, the peasants seem even filthier than the village ones. Perhaps it's the lack of water here or perhaps they don’t have the time to wash. The rich seem even richer and the poor poorer, but you see fewer beggars than the last time you were here. An improvement perhaps? In any case, it takes you what feels like hours to remember the swirling roads of the city and before you know it the streets are clear of people and you are left alone walking a dark alleyway heading to the kobold slums. Or at least that’s what you think but soon find out that you instead walked into the closed marketplace. You look around in confusion, trying to remember the path you took to get here but it is in vain. Suddenly fear strikes you, you heard rumours of people walking around at night, knocking out kobolds and sending them to the butchers. But they only do that to already dying and dead kobolds, right?
The buildings seem uncanny, you think you recognize a street or landmark only to realize that it’s something novel. Your old memories of the place seem more and more useless as you get further lost. You finally give up on finding the slums and simply search for a way out of the market.
You madly dash around, trying to find a way out of the maze of stalls but suddenly stumble, fail to balance and fall. Whatever you hit doesn't seem too happy about this either as you hear a few humans groan in pain and anger. You stand up, massaging your buttocks from the fall but suddenly a hand grabs your leg and you are dragged to the ground. before you know it you are raised up again from the shoulder, coming face to face with some humans. You can't get a good look at them but from the smell of it all they seem terribly drunk and covered in puke. 
"Ehh? and- and- whatewe heve ere’, eh?" One blurts out something and pukes on the ground. You look away from the disgusting sight but the humans take offense to that "You- you... you think we are ugly, no? You devil, you bloody devil; I’ll show what we do to rats here. " The one holding you flings you towards a stall and you shout in pain as you land on some crates. You don't think anything is broken but the bruises are going to hurt later. 
The humans start speaking amongst themselves and you try to take the opportunity to escape but the wounds slow you down and they catch you again. You struggle and try to hit them, managing to barely scratch one with your claw, drawing blood. That was barely enough to hurt him but the man screams in pain like a baby anyway and hits you on the head, sending you spinning. "Hey man! god's blood! tell your dammed pet to hold it you moron" Pet? There are worse things to be, still this is at least the third most embarrassing thing you had to be called. You try to talk to the humans, but they instead make blubbering noises. At first you think they are just drunk but then realize that they are trying to mimic the way you speak. You curse them loudly and hurl insults. The human holding you responds by petting your head roughly and telling you: "hush kitty kitty, shush kitty kitty." You scream out in frustration; it only gets another rise out of the humans and they start walking out of the market.
You feel more than a little embarrassed seeing these drunks navigate the market better than you, it's probably just their height that helps. Soon you are out and about, dropping each friend of the drunkard at their homes, some live in slums, others in mansions. At least you learn your way around the city while being carried on the man’s shoulder. Finally, your owner is left alone singing to himself in an empty street. You feel his grip relax and as soon as his fingers slip you jump out and run away from him. You expect protests or for him to chase after you but he doesn’t even realize that you are gone.
Then the ground under you gives away, there is only air beneath you, not even giving time to scream. You grunt in pain as your body drops into the water. You try to scream for help, but your lungs fill with liquid and you hit your chest to make it go back out again. You quickly rise to the top and look for a ladder leading out of the cold water but it's too dark to see so instead you try to climb the walls around you, falling backwards a few times in panic but finally managing to hold onto a loose brick that lets you pull yourself up.
You simply slump to the ground after leaving and puke the muddy water out along with your breakfast. With each heavy breath it feels like your heart is about to explode. As your heartbeat goes back to normal you realise the exertion you put your arms through and wince in pain. 
Once you can stand up you look at the place you fell into, it's the city canal! You'd think this would have at least been a good shower but the water over you smells pretty bad. You check your satchel with the money, at least it’s still intact so you thank the blood god for protecting you and Tomokie at the guild for recommending the right tailor for these sturdy containers. Still, you can't help but shout in anger and punch a stone wall, hurting yourself in the process and prompting a restless sleeper to hurl insults through a window.
You at least manage find a somewhat warm spot between some old barrels. You curl up to get some sleep but despite your exhaustion it is hard to drift away in such discomfort and pain. Luckily sleep always triumphs over pain in time.

… for this?
Asked the sorry priest
To have a little comfort
Slaving a life away
Said the wise …

Someone screams, you check to see if the scarf is dry by now.

…is this?
Asked the sorrowful slave
A picture, some words
Already forgotten by me
Said the cold…

You stand up and stumble towards the canal. It's cleaner but a little too muddy for your liking. Still, you drink some.

… since this?
Asked the quiet words
As long as I say it is
As in not for too long 
Said the cruel…

You wake up from your restless sleep to the realization as to how dry your throat is, you are feeling nauseous and tired too. You really hope this is just a result of bad sleep but drink one of Antoni’s potions anyway just to be safe, afterwards feeling your throat softening up and pain weakening. Now that you can see thanks to the daylight you take a closer look around. Looks like you picked a good spot to sleep: a lonely alleyway with nothing but trash and graffiti, mostly drawings of penises and something about a Kristi.
With the sun up and less crowded streets it's much easier to navigate the city. You fallow a merchant to the marketplace where you manage to find a clean scrap of cloth to redress your wound. You remind yourself to not get into fights until it's healed. From there you find your way to the kobold slum.
One would think that the slum was just a simple, oversized, old house if they didn't know what was inside. The path leading to the main entrance is through an out of sight alleyway. A wooden building sits between two older ones, it has a door large enough to barely let two humans pass at a time but for kobolds this is like a palace. In front of the gates there are kobolds talking amongst themselves and with hooded figures of varying shapes and sizes requesting various services. You try to pass the doors along with a few other kobolds but one of the front guards notices you and roughly grabs your arm. You recognize him, with his rusted armour and whittled down sword it's one of the First Blood's people. "You, no playing around. Go see boss now, don't make me fallow you." You do not want him to do that. You saw what he could do those who displeases the boss, he would put that slaver elf to shame... Just as you think he is going to let go he violently pushes you down, sending you face first on the dusty ground. Before you can even get an answer another black kobold helps you up and you walk inside with him. He pulls out a handkerchief that’s barely less dirty than you are but still manages to remove most of the dust and grime on your face. You thank him and tilt your head towards the guard and whisper that he is a bastard, cruelty for cruelty's sake!
The black kobold wipes his handkerchief on a wall and turns to you; “Bastard? Likely. Cruelty for the sake of cruelty? I don’t think so.” You cross your arms and ask the kobold why the guard pushed you then. “The First Blood teaches them well, the point is that they can push you, not to actually push you. Every time they get away with something like this they and everyone here knows who is in charge.” You shrug and tell him that there ought to be better ways to feed their ego than this. “Maybe, but there are worse ways too; the boss, he always has the kobolds “pushed down” in some way, dig?”
The streets, if you can call it that, of the slum are tight and low. This place apparently used to be a few abandoned houses but as the number of kobolds increased and no one let them buy new space they slowly carved up the houses until there were 2-4 makeshift dwellings in each regular room. Some places would only fit Kobolds, but you fallow the main “road” to the guild headquarters that's less tight. You start coughing loudly along the way and start feeling really hot, hopefully it's just the torches around and not any sickness. People have somehow set up shops and houses in the crampy quarters. You stop next to a larger shop. Most of them are so small that they only include a sign with whatever they are selling painted on and a shelf with some kobold standing next to it. The one you come to is as high class as a fence is going to get so you walk over to ask about the price of the ring. Only then do you look at the ring proper, it has a crown on it, intricate symbols... too intricate. You decide that you'd rather keep it in case it has more value than these traders would know, so you carefully hang the ring on a loose thread in your loincloth. 
The slums are not very crowded right now. Most kobolds wake up late because of their nightly activities and you would have done the same too if it weren’t for the terrible night. With such little activity around you can actually hear the building creak and groan under the weight of all the kobolds. You are surprised that the entire building hasn’t collapsed yet. It came close a few times; a few rooms had a cave in and there was just too much rubble to be moved through the streets so they were just left there. You can still faintly smell the rotten flesh under the blocked off doors.
Soon you reach what was once the basement of the grand mansion, a weird place to use as headquarters since it's not the biggest nor warmest room in the house; the only thing of note being its floors which are of dark stones like those of the forest ruins. Another better armed guard sees that you are trying to enter and drags you the way you were going anyways. He drops you in the middle of the room and leaves. Inside it's filthy, even for the slum. Food scraps everywhere, various stains covering the walls and floor, broken furniture… After the forest coming into this room makes you want to puke. In front of you sits two of the guild handlers; first is the First Blood, Reynard, the one you don't mess with. He has white scales, a rare and beautiful sight. Then there is the fat human who handles the coin. It is no exaggeration to call him fat, it looks like he hasn't moved from his filthy old couch in weeks, not that he could as the door is too small for him to leave now. Layers of fat ripping his tight shirt, he tries to scratch under one of the flaps of fat but can’t reach with his short arms, simply giving up after a few tries. You don't know how or why he ended up here, he is no slave for sure but still trapped here. He just appeared one day, less fat, and Reynard said: "he knows a few things". The extortions and guild fees have only gotten worse since then.
Reynard is his opposite, you aren't sure how he got the name, but you know how he got the title as the city tribe's first blood. The kobold gets captured on a big heist one day. He is sent to the dungeon but escapes. He is found again and is placed in the tower prison for execution, still escapes by luring a guard close to himself and grabbing his keys. He sneaks into the castle and steals a chest of gold while escaping, supposedly seduces a queen too although you doubt that part of the story. He then takes the chest to be pawned here but then six, in some stories ten, kobolds and goblins ambush him. He kills each with his claws alone, there are a few skulls sitting behind him as a testament to the story's truth. He then enters the basement where the old first blood sits. Reynard hands the old kobold the chest full of gold and tells him to leave his guild alone. The old first blood simply nods and leaves, making him top dog. You are sure that some parts of the much longer story are made up, but it doesn’t really matter. However, with this new human around and his annoying fees it is getting harder to tolerate the leadership… 
You approach the first blood. He looks down on you from a tall couch and asks your name. You respond truthfully and he signals to the human. The man with great struggle manages to grab a book from his side and looks through the pages. After an agonizing minute he finds the right one and reads, spilling filth from his mouth everywhere: "Sulti, black scales, small frame, joined in bla bla bla... two late fees, that's 75 quarters as admin fees, 75 guild admin costs, both times two, plus 50 times two for the late fees. Coming to a grand total of 450 quarters" You gawk at him and say that you only had to pay 300. The man shrugs, "we instituted a late fee system a few weeks ago, tough luck". Teary eyed, you turn to Reynard to see what he thinks but then notice that he isn't paying much attention to the conversation, he is instead staring directly into your eyes. You cough loudly to get his attention, but he keeps simply staring at the same spot, you look back at him. He turns to the human and speaks harshly: "I’m tired of those two, Gio- something, what were their names again, the two purple ones? Write them off the list, I want coin from now on." The human obliges and writes something on the book. The kobold turns to you next: "Sulti, is it? You from the woods?" You nod "Could tell the moment you walked in; the city scares you?" You don’t know what the right answer is, maybe there is none? This wasn't the worst night you spent in the city, so you say that it used to scare you. The kobold grins "I was scared shitless when I first came; starving, sick, broke... sold my ass to the first bastard passing by" You cringe. "But I survived then thrived and here we are. You seem to be holding up well, until now that is. Hey! Martin, get over here and see what this girl has on her."
You know better than to protests, with all the debts he practically owns you. The guard in front of the doorway comes back in and grabs your satchel, pouring its contents on a table: a fair bit of coin, one and half a bottles of medicine. Then he grabs your scarf and puts it there as well. He grabs your chest wrap; you briefly think he is going to grab them but instead he rudely checks under it, not like you have space to hide something under it like the humans. He then almost heads for the loincloth too but decides against it.
Feeling more than a little violated, you turn back to Reynard who is in turn looking at the human inspecting the coin. "Eh, 300 or so I bet" that’s your entire worth in the world, but you didn’t know the fees would increase! You voice your protests and ask for more time but the kobold quiets you down with a commanding voice: "You are mine, pup. I could chop you up here and no one could say a word, but I won’t, I find you… interesting." You stutter but manage to beg a little. You'll find the money, you know people, you work hard, you can steal it- once you say the last one Reynard stops you. "Steal? Where did you get the money from?" You give him a curious look, you are a kobold, how does he think you make money? He seems impressed “You aren’t an apprentice under any other thieves, are you? Well, those don’t survive long anyway but you must have some serious skill and luck” He moves in his couch and asks something else; the question takes you back. "Are you a virgin?" You turn red, you don’t know what to say and simply look down. The kobold is taken back, "How did you avoid that like this? I’m not talking about the ‘innocent young virgin’ bullshit, I’m just curious. You are more than a few summers old; most are forced get their share of this most pleasant city by this point." You briefly consider saying something about asking ladies their age but realize that It's not very appropriate now and instead explain that you survived off the land, stole food starting from your first winter and had someone help you a lot along the way "Banditry then?" You tell him that you don’t get along well with those sorts of kobolds, stealing and mugging are not the same. The kobold now leans forward, "I like you even more now, most thieves spend years training and you survive on your own? That changes much in the long term.” He briefly grins and mumbles to himself but then quickly puts his hardass attitude back on” We’ll be seeing more of each other after today, for many reasons. For now just come closer." You oblige. The kobold goes from sitting to lying down on the couch, then looks at you, probably noticing your horrified expression. "You will do as I say. Get closer, I need you in the right mindset.”
You don’t know what to say or do, you managed to avoid shit like this until now but you don't know what to do now. This can get awkward or worse very fast. You desperately try to think of something. You slowly approach the couch. The quicker it happens the less you’ll remember...
The kobold slowly starts pulling down your loincloth, then he stops and smells the air; you instinctively cross your arms to hide your sorry state and look down which hopefully assures Reynard that you are normally not like this. He hastens the process and finally leaves you naked in the cold stone room. 
He suddenly reaches out, you close your eyes as he starts touching your body while you clench your teeth.
It's not the worst experience for someone to have and despite the circumstances the kobold has hygiene standards unlike most of your kind. After a while the pain in your muzzle overtakes shame and the kobold starts getting rougher with his hand. You try to resist but it's hard to concentrate. 
Just then a hot liquid fills your mouth through your clenched teeth and you almost bite your tongue in shock but manage to stop yourself in time.
When you open your eyes Reynard is grinning with a lit candle in his hand.
Your first instinct is to spit the liquid back on him but the wax is too sticky. You instead try to wipe away the wax as before it dries up. Flakes of wax drop on Reynard’s lap as you claw them away but thankfully he doesn't seem to mind much since he is too busy laughing at your expense. “You can't survive with your eyes closed, pup!” You try not to swallow but it's in vain; luckily its animal fat so that’s not too hard to get off, unluckily you smell even worse now.
Reynard leans back and closes his eyes. “Danger is around every corner, it is a luxury to be able to let your guard down”. You see the human staring at you both with disgusting expression. There are much worse things to be doing out there. You repeat "this is normal" under your breath as you step off and almost say it out loud but just manage to stop yourself. You hope to leave the room without alerting Reynard but he is way ahead of you and speaks with eyes closed as soon as you step off.
"Sulti's debt is… extended. I’m keeping the gold and the scarf but give her back the potions, I think she is sick from falling in the canal." You cover yourself with your arms as if that's going to stop the smell. He continues with eyes closed "Sulti, I want you back here in two days when I feel like we are ready. I’m putting my trust in you and letting you go, hear me? We have no reason to talk if I can’t trust you and if I have no reason to talk to you I have every reason to kill you. Now go!" You stagger out of the room with your clothes in your hand and run through the slums; the walls crush you every moment in there. Too shaken to remember the direction you keep running naked up the building until you  reach the rooftop. You feel yourself calming down if only a little bit when the relatively fresh air of the city hits you in the face. You quickly start putting your clothes back on before turning towards the sky. The rooftop is too cluttered with crates and makeshift huts to look down but you can still faintly make out the black tower in the distance. It has been more active in the last couple of days and now it is constantly blinking. You stare at the structure for a little while more before slowly going back down again, calmer.
Having escaped a possibly terrible fate you finally crouch outside the entrance to breathe again but only manage to cough out more wax. You wanted this to be... but this isn't the worst option, right? You walk around in circles just out of sight of the other kobolds, trying to find ways to convince yourself that this wasn't as bad as you make it out to be. You manage to get rid of most of what remains of the liquid thrown at you then walk back into the city. Its past noon now and you are starving, water would be good for your throat too. 

The city is large, very large, and very large places have very much to steal. You never liked the odds when it comes to stealing, sometimes the risk weighs the same as the reward and there is some fun to it but usually it's just the threat of death for the reward of a half-eaten apple. The city is large, it has opportunity.
The merchant never saw you, but the others did. You had to run all the way back to the slums and hide. Your legs feel like twigs from the hunger, it’s as if someone poisoned them.
The servant is stupid, why else would one leave a pie like- oh, maggots... you have eaten worse. You take a bite from the clean bit, it doesn’t taste bad at all, very sweet and soft in fact but... it’s just… you leave the rest to the bugs.
Sometimes, once in a blue moon, gold basically drops into your lap. You remind yourself to never drop money while shopping, and if you do to pick it up quickly before a quick kobold snatches it. You manage to buy a bit it of cheap pastry made yesterday with the money. The pastry tastes like sand, you manage to eat half of it quickly but then spend a few minutes drinking water before managing to eat the other half. At least there is now something in your stomach but you hope to find some other food soon. 
A merchant stops you as you wander near the marketplace. He tells you that he will give you gold if you help him carry some sacks. You gleefully fallow him for the prospect of getting to do honest work for once. The merchant takes you to a stall where a tired young man is trying to put some sacks on his back, emphasis on “trying” as he can’t carry them all. The merchant first scolds the man for wasting his time then makes you carry a few smaller sacks on your back. The three of you walk across the market, the sun beats down on your back and you can barely keep up with the humans. You awkwardly change the position of the sacks as you move but their weight bites your back regardless of how you carry them.
 Finally, you manage to reach the destination. You slowly put down the sacks and sit on a chest to catch your breath while the merchant organizes them. Seeing as he won’t talk, you approach the merchant and ask for your pay. The merchant looks at you as if you are mad, “Pay? Who do you do you think you are? I’ve never seen you once in my life! Are you trying to scam me?” Your mouth drops open. You first naively try to remind the merchant as to how you looked but then realize what he is trying to do. You desperately look around for someone to vouch for you but the young man only briefly glances at the situation before turning his tired eyes away and walking into the crowd with his money; the only person coming towards you is a guard alerted by the merchant’s shouting. You quickly run off before an incident happens. From a distance you watch the merchant for a few minutes after getting away. You try to come up with a plan of revenge but realize quickly that it’s just a fantasy. You instead spend some time sitting under the shade of a tree to feel sorry for yourself. 
Ouch! There it is. Your foot is back in its place. It hurt nowhere near this bad when you dislocated your shoulder. No more roof chases, you stagger around limping for an hour before being able to run again.
You stare at the bookstore for a while. You aren’t brave enough to go in. Kobolds can’t read, why would one enter for any reason other than to steal? Well, you can’t afford any books anyway so you guess you would need to steal them. You just want to read something other than a scholarly text from 200 years ago for once.
You couldn’t grab the ceramic plate but at least you got the cup. That shopkeeper looked like the beaty sort too so this isn't the worst outcome.

As the sun falls your fenced goods- well, good, one good- and the stolen money add up to 13 quarters. Not the best day but at least you are not too dead. Now all you need is a Antoni to tell you where to sleep. Sadly, he is not here, luckily there are many Antonis around. They have long white hair, smell weird and talk weirder. "To save a lot of money you need to waste a little money" He would say. You find your Antoni sitting on a street corner with a plate in front of him. You loudly walk in front of the blind beggar and lean in. You drop three quarters in front of him, making sure each can be heard. Then you ask where a Kobold might find a cheap bed without lice, particularly if she has some enemies with steel armour and swords. The old man thinks for a moment and then says: "Dwarf's place”.
You wander around the city for a bit before finding a sickly-looking sad kobold loitering in front of the slums and ask him if he knows of a place of rest run by a dwarf. He nods and slowly staggers through the streets. Surprisingly, he actually leads you to a small inn just next to the city walls, he doesn't even ask for something in return so you let him keep the half-drank medicine. He thanks you and asks where you come from. You respond with "forest", he chuckles and says that he comes from the coastal city but they kicked out all the kobolds one day. You gulp, you hope that never happens here. He manages to regain some strength from the potion but you don’t know if he’ll survive much longer with no help. The cold is becoming unbearable at night these days.
You mournfully stare at him as he stumbles away, after taking a few steps he looks up. You fallow his eyes and see him looking at the barely visible tip of the dark tower, even though it’s completely dark. How did he even make it out in this darkness?
He soon turns his attention back to the road, you imagine his life up until this point: Born to some couple in a slum far away, doing different jobs to survive, making friends, making enemies, learning things, loving, hating… in the end being forced to come to a godforsaken city he doesn’t know about and ending up dead in a pile of trash like a pig while birds gouge out… Everything he has ever experienced or known becoming…
You stare at the empty street; the cold wind makes you shiver. You really need to read a fun novel or find someone to be with. You slowly make your way towards the inn.
You peek inside the inn, it's actually somewhat cozy; low ceiling, actual tablecloth, people are using spoons, mostly dwarf travellers, a sign with a goblin's face and a cross over it hanging over the entrance. You approach the dwarf at the counter who you assume to be the innkeeper and ask for a room. She strokes her beard and sizes you up. "Three rooms left: fancy bedroom, really nice, big, fancy bed; common bedroom, cheap beds..." she chuckles "...broom closet, cleanest room in the Inn." She probably expects you to take the common room but you tell her that the closet is fine. She is taken back at first but then laughs. "Oh, is that so? I was joking, you are used to sleeping alone then… Fine, uhhh- 7 quarters ought to do it. You get food too, soap or dishwater?" That last one actually makes you chuckle back; your mind is still clouded by what's to come in two days with Reynard but you’ll make the most of this place. Maybe you could steal some cutlery from the kitchen and pay off the debt in money. Actually, this place is in all likelihood too poor to have anything of value.
You pay and the innkeeper tells you to take a seat, you try to sit next some dwarves, but they tell you that they are waiting for a friend. Lovely guests. You instead sit on a corner, alone; the table dips on one end and the bench is unstable but at least the innkeeper keeps her word and brings you some lovely warm flour soup. You wish you had some yogurt or at least butter or cheese with this but your stomach starts making angry noises as soon as you smell the food. You feel your intestines light up as the warmth travels down, you'd think ground up seeds, salt and water couldn't taste this good, but the food is gone in a heartbeat. You close your eyes for a moment to feel the liquid sit in your stomach… waiting as your body adjusts to not starving.
Then you are suddenly awoken a by a loud thud. You look around and see some figures sitting on the other side of the table, kobolds, and they... Fuck, fuck, fuck... you stand up but then sit back down again. Maybe they don’t remember you? You feel really fucking stupid for ever helping the woman. The big, red one is simply sitting there with his friends and eating soup. The goblins aren't here, must be staying elsewhere. Then you notice their wounds, those weren't there before. All of them are battered pretty badly and the bandit leader has a large bandage over his entire forehead. They start speaking, you try to leave but they go quite once you stand up, you quickly glance back and see all of them but the leader trying to catch a glimpse of you. You rush back to the innkeeper and ask for your room, she obliges. 
It's a broom closet alright, you could at least make a bed of sorts if you line up the brushes well. You ask for the key from the innkeeper, she simply laughs "key for the broom closet? I've been all over these lands and never have I seen a broom closet with a lock!" She notices the concern on your face. "Well, those kobolds bought the top room with the nice bed, you can ask them kindly to let you stay with them." You consider simply running out but that would be a death sentence with the cold and your condition. You put your hand in your purse only to feel its leather bottom… You thank the innkeeper for her hospitality and enter the dark closet. 

Sleep is so much harder when there are up to, what now, four parties trying to kill you. You lie on the ground with a broom firmly placed under your hand to deter any attackers that might come in. Time passes so slowly when you are like this. 
You wait for what feels like hours, the sounds in the inn die down. 
…lightning strikes…
The door bursts open, the candlelight blinds your eyes as you can’t adapt from the darkness. You almost fling the broom, but instead simply swing it. The light goes out. 
Oh shit, did you attack the innkeeper? someone speaks "Step out slowly". You can’t think straight and start rising as instructed but then realize that the voice belongs to a kobold. Just as you’re on your knees a punch sends you straight back down. When you open your eyes you see the red kobold holding your arms down. You try to scream but he slaps you before you can make too much noise. Then he pulls your chest wrap and starts to shove it into your mouth. You try to spit it out then bite it into shreds, but you are much more concerned about your limbs. The weight is just too much, you want to be able to move them again. You can't even feel the pain from his weight, it's just the horrible feeling of being trapped. It's like your entire body is freezing but is also on fire.
The kobold finally manages to place the rag over your muzzle as your shouting and screaming turns to a whimper. he changes position so that he is sitting on you instead and can trap your limbs without using his hands. He comes close to your face; his heavy breathing is almost deafening; he angrily stares at you. "You- you fucking piece of shit. Who do you think you fucking are, eh?" He awkwardly slaps your torso and the wound sizzles in pain. " You are some bastard hero, are you? Where is your lady now you cunt?" You try to headbutt him but he dodges. "Oh, you want to fight? Is that fucking it?" He pulls out a knife and starts scratching your scales. "Okay, let's go out and we fight. One on one, but if you fall I’m carving you up like cattle and leaving you for the butchers, you hear me?" 
You can’t help it anymore and start crying. "Oh, crying now, are we? I haven’t even hurt you yet. You think I didn't see you with her? Well, I fucking did and I would have made you cry real hard right there and then if it weren't for those shittin' and screamin’ goblins. Well, here we are now. I’m going to show you exactly what happens when you fuck with the wrong people you hear me?" You try to close your eyes, but the tears are too much and you open them again. He first turns you around and then places the knife under your neck. You just want him to get off from your limbs. For a brief moment you wiggle out of his grasp but he slams your head unto the stone floor.
Everything goes dark for a moment; you slowly open your eyes to see light and hear someone speak. Was that a nightmare? Something asks a question and you rub your hand against black stones.
You open your eyes again. Your loincloth is gone. You scream but no sound comes from your muzzle. You bite down harder on the rag instead. His cold hands touch your back. You shiver... so fucking awful. Instead of fighting you cling to the floorboards and freeze... it feels really cold at first and you- stop thinking... why does- You try to wiggle out once more, but he responds by ramming really hard on you. You moan in response then angrily scream at yourself for it.
Don’t think about it... 
Gods, why me? Should it be burning like this? You stop wiggling and wait for it to be over. Why is it taking this long? You cry out in pain but manage to keep your head down. Just- You feel your insides turn as he overbears on you.
He is getting louder and louder. You feel warm for a moment and a weight lifts off you.
You shout loudly in anger and kick back but miss. He is now just sitting there on top of you with the ugliest look on his face, you make eye contact. You don't know how your face looks but he doesn't seem very happy. He leans in once more with the knife and starts scratching the scales on your cheeks. "We are even now you hear me? I will fuck you way harder if you ever get in my way again." You don’t know what to say, your heads drops to the ground and you start crying. 
He releases your legs first, waiting until you aren’t kicking anymore. Then he releases the arms and finally steps off you. You want to stand and fight but can’t find the strength. You simply lie there feeling empty as he leaves and closes the door behind him. 
The numbness in your head goes away after some time and you can think again, everything hurts. It's morning? You check yourself first, everything feels un-real You try to desperately clean yourself with your hands but it's too late. But you are not very healthy right? There is a chance you might not be pregnant. Only then do you realize that the chest wrap is still in your muzzle so you remove it. The air is painful, you need water, your throat aches from the screaming and the cold. The rags are no longer usable after how much you bit them, why are you even wearing chest wraps anyway? You don’t and will never look like the city people, you are an animal at best! You instead use the rags to clean yourself up but with the amount of saliva on it the cleaning is minimal. You at least manage to clean the blood; you are not too sure where it came from.
After gathering enough strength you stand up, your legs shake violently. Thoughts race in your mind; justifications, scenarios, self-shame, glimpses of manic positivity... You silence yourself and stagger to the hall, only the innkeeper is there. She laughs warmly "Had a good sleep princess broom? When you see her smiling face, you can’t take it anymore and run out. You manage to leave just as the dwarf manages to shout something about food.

The streets are so cold now. Will the canal freeze?
Why is everything so normal? Why is no one looking at you? Well, you don’t want to them to look at you but don’t they see you?
What’s this? Shoes? Oh, missing bottom.
You look at the intimidating large stone temple across the square, a priest is explaining scripture. You stagger closer to listen but then notice a line for donated food. You try to get in, someone kicks you off, the guards chase you out of the square. 
The young woman slaps the thief, the criminal could normally get away just fine, but her personal guard is too fast. He is grabbed in a heartbeat. His loot bag spills to the ground, people rush over, the arriving guards are too busy handling the thief to worry about the goods. The gold and silver are lost to the crowd in a heartbeat. The people scare you and you wait in a corner to see what happens. Other guards come and disperse the people, the thief is slowly walked to the castle. You fallow them for a while, the thief seems defeated at first but as he is led through a shady alley he makes some rapid movements, manages to break free. Sadly for him before he can make an escape another guard jumps in front of him, he is cut down with a single strike. People watch the carnage but you notice something, the thief was holding a small object and he drops it. You fallow the rolling object and pick it up. It's an iron necklace with the carving of a dragon on it. You pocket it.
They see you taking the basket, are you not invisible?
You snatch the liver like a cat. The butcher doesn't have the time to react. It's very small, lamb you guess or kobo- You eat it raw in a corner then puke some of it out. 
You wish Tomokie was here, maybe she is back from the trip early?
You consider going to the red-light district but walk the opposite way. You climb a roof to get a better view of the city. Only when you stare into the expense do you notice something odd. You look again, shake your head, rub your eyes. You close one eye, then the other... your left eye... it sees everything different… blurry as if you cried. You look around with only the right, you can't see more than a few meters ahead, the left one hurts but sees mostly normal. You climb back down and ask a somewhat friendly looking kobold if something seems wrong with your right eye, he glances quickly and tells you that you look like you haven’t slept in a week and both eyes are blood shot red, but nothing seems much more wrong with the right. 
Small feet ache, I chat with another, younger beggar; he prefers to be called “monk”. I am told that intelligent people think to themselves in "I" form rather than "you”,"she" or a mix of things. But it is known that one could never adapt to thinking a new way. I, Sulti, disagree. The beggar shares some bread with me, and you decide to stick to being stupid. You try share your medicine with the beggar in kind but after hearing your cough he makes you drink all of it. 
You try to fence the necklace in the slums. You bring it over to one of the black markets and hand it to the kobold running it. He takes one look at it and then quickly hands it back to you “I don’t know where you got this from but don’t ever come here again, scram!” After walking back out into the city you consider throwing the necklace into the canal but decide against it. You’ll fence the golden ring only if Reynard seems to have ill intentions and you need to get away from the city.
The fountain, you’d play with Tomokie here, before she started working full time. You stare at your reflection in the clear water. She’d be so sad to see you like this. Damm, Tomokie is a good friend. You should have waited for her to come home before going to city. What was her old name though? Cat? Kate? It had something to do with a dog in a box… You wash your face in the somewhat clean water.
You come to the bookstore again; as you are looking sorrowfully at the covers a man comes out of a dark corner of the store. You prepare to get out of dodge before someone asks about your occupation but the man seems friendly “Kobold, do my books interest you?”. You stop backing away and approach the man, then tell him that you like reading them. He chuckles, probably suspecting that you are lying about knowing how to read, “Oh, is that so? Which type of book do you prefer? I personally like history.” You are intrigued by his interest in you and tell him that you find history a bit boring, who cares about which king defeated which army two hundred years ago?
The man lets out an amused chuckle “Well, even if you find history unfun there is wisdom in knowing what has come before.” You tell him that you’d ask regular people about life if you wanted wisdom, their knowledge is far more relevant than what those kings had to say. “You are not completely wrong; it depends on the wisdom you seek I guess. Still, don’t those kings deserve to have their stories be remembered? Don’t you care about those who came before you?” 
This time you chuckle, did those kings care about the kobold who would be living in their lands two hundred years after themselves, if not why should you care about them? The store owner laughs “Very clever! I sense that we have a much deeper, philosophical division between one another. If you like books so much you can come read in the evenings when the store isn’t busy, just remember to wash and dry your hands beforehand. I need to close the store now though.” You thank the man; then almost consider asking for food but decide that you want to have one relationship that doesn’t rely on the other person feeding you. 
You look at the sky, the days are getting shorter. You could run away, forget about the debt and live in another city. You fantasize about having another life, living with nice people, like that bookstore owner. You don’t even want wealth or comfort anymore.
You look at the sun slowly falling over the city. You can’t do it; you can’t leave the little you have.

Bells ring, the city closes. You are at least not starving. No more sleeping with people around. You make your way to the manor district. Guards roam around but you are safe, even with lanterns lighting the streets, thanks to your size. The people here are intelligent, you tried breaking into these houses a couple of times, but they have guards patrol each one and some even had traps. These houses are for the master thief who isn’t afraid to club some heads. You instead scale some walls and climb unto a balcony. You scour every other balcony from the rooftops until you see some blurry figures drinking on one of them. You approach the couple then wait patiently for them to leave. After a while the man kisses the woman before going inside and the lights are snuffed out. You would normally peek on them for your needs but you don’t want to think about sex ever again. You carefully jump a few more gaps and land on the balcony. The couple not only left a bit of food for you but they also left the blanket they were cuddling under. You drink the wine left at the bottom of the glasses, lick the cheese plate clean and eat the slices of bread they left.
The night is cold, really cold. Even with the still warm blanket a human could never survive this and you are feeling it. Every breeze sends shivers down your spine. You briefly consider going to the slums and begging Reynard to let you stay with him but quickly realize how dumb that would be. The night feels so long when in pain. You hug the woolen blanket and pretend it’s Old ‘Ntoni. You count sheep, sing a little, look at the stars... The wind stops at last but you still can’t sleep.
At least he didn't hurt you too much, right? He could have killed you. Like, probably this was how you were conceived as well. Only about half the kobold mothers you meet seem to be in relationships... couldn't he have chosen someone else? You sigh loudly and hit your head; almost afraid that it's going to wake the tenants up. Strange that you can't cry. This is the one time it would be easy and maybe even helpful.
A sound comes from the house, at least you think it's from the house and immediately scale the roof with the blanket wrapped around your neck. No one comes unto the balcony, but you are too on edge to go back down. With the wind dead you decide to sleep on the roof, let the stars warm you! 
You stare at the blurry, bright shapes in the sky. They seem bigger and sharper; you rub your eyes to get rid of the tears. The blinking tower is visible in the distance, it seems even more active than before. You turn away from the structure as the sparkling lights disturb your sleep. You toss and turn as fewer and fewer sounds come from the city.
That has to be the worst crime someone can commit, right? Yes, murder causes more damage, but you can justify murder! You stand up with the blanket wrapped around you and turn towards the judge "Yes, I killed him but if I hadn't he would have killed that entire family and their pet turtle!" everyone in the courtroom claps.
Theft is bad but surely letting someone starve is worse. You look at the opulent houses and promise yourself that if you ever somehow become rich you'll let anyone steal food from you. Crimes against gods! That might be worse. But it is worse in the sense of punishment. You could curse the gods and anger them but they have plenty of things to make themselves happy with, no? You repeat the last sentence out loud to the stars, a typical response comes down.
When has what happened ever been justified? You guess if you were one of the two last kobolds alive or something it might be justified but that's never going to happen, is it? Perhaps desire? But the gods gave each race the right hand for a reason. You start shaking and sit back down to finally start crying. It doesn't make you feel any better but at least the anticipation of crying is no longer there. You turn around and look down the house's roof, it's a long drop. You spit... one, two thr- splash. Two and a half? 
The tower suddenly stops blinking and instead shows a single bright, burning light; it almost feels like being watched. 
You leave the blanket on the roof and climb back onto the balcony. You carefully open the door leading into the house and sneak inside the room where the humans went. It’s too dark to see much but thanks to your little bit of night vision you can make out the bottle shimmering in the light next to the sleeping couple’s bed. Patiently you inch across the room, grab the bottle and walk out again. 
The wine is quite sweet, it’s well filtered too. You are used to having bits of sediment in your bitter drink. After a few gulps you start feeling lightheaded. You stand up again and dizzily walk over to the edge of the roof.
…
You lie back down.

If there is no rest for the wicked then you must have been really bad because you never even doze off once in the night and only once sun raises in the horizon does the tiredness set in. You would love to spend the day sleeping here and warming up under the sun, but you are starving. You try to carry the blanket with you but it was already heavy enough on its own and now you don’t have the strength to carry it back down again. You instead tear a piece of it for a bandage then carefully climb back down to the street. Just as guards start noticing the suspicious lone kobold you scamper away.

You make your way back to the market. A cart almost rolls over you, a horse stampedes, someone pushes you to the ground. You catch your beath in a quite alley.
At least 10 people see you take the piece of bread, no one says anything, good old city folk.
There are people in front of the church again, fewer of them. They let you stand in line for food this time. Apparently they were serving beef last time, now it has cheap, roasted kobold meat so fewer people had come. You leave the line.
You find a group of singers with violins.
…
Enemies to the left
Enemies to the right
"Where has my retinue gone?"
The old king cries

Questions
asked the old king
as the coins melt
and the lords meld

a reckoning, declares the prophet
a feast, boasts the army
a famine, warns the poor
a parade, orders the rich
...
If you don’t like our little song don’t blame us
blame the ones
who made us write!
Better yet, call a dragon to fight!

The crowd cheers and the singers collect donations. Someone shouts "the man!", the singers quickly pack up and leave. 
You nibble on your stolen bread in a corner but no amount of it seems to sustain you. You conclude that you must be getting greedy living in the city and decide to keep your eyes peeled to find something to distract from the hunger pangs. Passing by a trashcan next to an abattoir you see a remarkable piece of bone. It's straight, hallow and has no dents. You pick it up and clean it with your loincloth. It is as good as it gets. You sit in a corner and start chiseling it with your claws. You encountered a trade caravan once. Surprisingly, the elves let you in. You saw them play flutes and dance around the fire. You'll always remember them pat you on the head and tell you their stories, which you were too little to remember or understand but still... The food was great too!
It didn't seem too hard while they were doing it. Finally, you carve a few holes into the bone and blow it the way the elves did, a sound does come out; one finger over one of the holes, different sound. Only then do you realize you made too many holes; the elves have 5 fingers while you have 4. You still spend a solid few hours trying to make something even a little nice come out but it's in vain.
You throw it on the ground in shame but then at least manage to convince the fence that you stole it and make a pretty few quarters. Perhaps you could become a craftsman?
"Adultery, fornication, ravin’ in sheep’s clothin'!" You look up at the priest. "They go the dark places, and they betray their wives, they sire bastards from the beasts and they...” you quickly run back to the streets.
Why didn't you just sell the flute normally as your own?
You go to the bookstore again, it’s closed. You try to find the owner but he is nowhere to be seen. While looking around the shop you see a mural on a wall, it’s not particularly beautiful but you recognize it instantly: it’s the same dragon as the one on your iron necklace.
Desperate for sustenance you wonder in parts of the city more foreign to you, finally reaching the bastion walls. As you drag yourself by some warehouses the sound of kobolds on the other side of the wall startles you: “Hold the line mate! The oat crates are heavier than they seem!”
You inspect the old stone walls of the warehouse, plenty of loose bricks protruding out of it… Gathering all your strength you grab unto one and start pulling yourself up, looking down every once in a while to make sure no one is seeing you. After a few painful moments you manage to make it to the warehouse’s roof, you have no reason nor strength to climb the much taller walls of the bastion but you can drop down to a small courtyard from your position; the place seems deserted say for two kobolds and a man in front of a small door leading to the bastion. The man hands the red one a few coins before going inside and the kobold starts walking out of the courtyard towards the street while the other blue kobold walks into a shed next to the building you are standing on. You try to kneel and hide yourself but before being able to do so the second kobold decides to look towards to warehouse and your eyes meet. 
You hold your breath and prepare to jump back into the street, employed kobolds probably don’t take kindly to theft. The kobold looks around for a moment than back at you, then he glances at the crate sitting in the middle of the courtyard. He slowly makes his way towards it while keeping an eye on you, you watch him without making a move. Once next to it he pushes the crate’s lid, revealing bags holding some sort of grain. Then tilts his head as if asking a question. You are not too sure as to what he wants to know but nod in response anyway. The kobold quickly looks around once more before running back inside the bastion. You don’t even think twice before rushing over to grab a bag and then scaling the walls to climb out.
Oats softened in cold well water are far from appetizing but you are too hungry to care; the cold cereals go down like rocks, you can’t even taste them. 
An odd sense of calmness overtakes you as the sun sets and people abandon the windy streets. As you cross the marketplace once more, humming the singer's tune to make yourself feel better, you see the same blind beggar who sent you to the dwarf's place. You push back the memory and walk over to the man again. You drop three coins and ask where a blind beggar sleeps at night. He raises his head and smiles. He reaches out and you grab him by the hand, the both of you start walking the streets. You slowly make your way into the square; the beggar rubs his hands up against stone walls to find the way. He then enters the temple and you reluctantly fallow.
Inside the magnificently grand temple a handful priests are conversing in the middle of the building. Seeing you, one of them tells the others off and approaches. "Audolino, what are you doing?" The beggar looks at your hand and then down. "It's a kobold Audolino." The beggar keeps looking away like an ashamed dog “can’t you learn? Don’t you remember what your last “friend” did? We are still repairing the wooden door because of that beast”. The priest turns to you instead: “Draconic creature, don’t they let you sleep in the so-called “red-light district”?” You tell him that you don’t do that kind of work. He seems a little pleased “Where do you live normally then?” You respond with “the forest”. “Well, that’s where you belong”. He makes a sign with his hands and smiles warmly "the Gods have given me great patience..." how humble "... and I will extend it to you today." He signals you to fallow him and you do so. He goes over to the back of the hall and grabs the carpet he stands on while giving sermons. Then he lies the carpet next a sleeping bag, looks like you'll have a friend to protect or be protected by tonight. You consider waking up early and stealing some of the chandeliers before anyone wakes up. Is graverobbing much worse than robbing the house of gods?
You thank the priest and lay on the carpet; It's as soft as grass, which isn't saying much but it's still better than roof or stone floor and the church is somewhat warm.
You prepare to close your eyes as the tiredness becomes unbearable. Bu then you see the beggar conversing with the priest. The beggar has his usual calm attitude but the priest seems much more agitated than before. Anxiety starts climbing up again, you don’t want to leave. You sit back and watch them, the priest soon stands up, glances at you then quickly leaves. You don’t like this one bit. You go over to the beggar and ask him what's wrong but he doesn't respond. You feel increasingly anxious and exit the temple the same way the priest went. 
Outside the air is- the priest has guards with him! You hide next to a wall. Now out of sight, you listen in on the guards talking between themselves while the priest looks around timidly.
"... but I don’t like beggars listening in on us, do you?"
"Forget the beggar, are we sure it's the right one?" 
"Dark colour, probably male, filthy as a corpse... no?"
"Yeah, but that's half the kobolds here and the priest said it was female."
"Well, if it isn't it then we'll say that it is. It fits the description well enough so we should get the captain off our back for a while."
"All right, go in then, I'll cover the exit."
Why are they searching for you? Well, you did do all that thieving and skulking around... but clearly there is some bullshit going on here. You don’t have the time to consider the options and simply stand still, you can hear your heart beat. The guard walks past you and enters the temple. Your heart slows down.
Then you see the beggar inside the temple staring directly into your eyes through a window... why is he- how is he seeing?
The guard burst open the temple doors and rushes straight at you! You jump over the wall and run like hell into the streets, an arrow flies through the air. You keep running, you can’t see anything, there might be an arrow in you right now! You run for what feels like an hour. Houses and shops become a blur; other guards try to stop you but you are as fast a horse. After a while the shouting of guards quiets down, you slow to a walk and check yourself over. An arrow did hit you! Good news is it mostly grazed you, bad news is it managed to hit you just right next to the chest and punctured a hole in your purse, spilling the few coins you had and bathing the iron necklace in blood. You grab the necklace and put your other hand over the now bleeding wound. You have no idea where you are in the city.
Why, fucking why? Can’t you just have one night where you don’t get attacked? A whore, that’s what you need to be. You avoid the lights coming from further up the road and move towards a small neighborhood. If you are going to get beaten by strangers day and night and be humiliated you might as well make money doing it, no? You remember Tomokie. Is this why she changed her name? Maybe you should do the same, become someone new and do whatever you need to survive. She is always well fed and seems happy enough. Maybe Reynard would actually hire you? You hold the iron necklace and look at it. A dragon with sharp talons and pointy ears… is it biting a coin or is that a shield? It looks distinctive but worthless, why waste money on having this made? You imagine it to be a magic amulet that grants wishes. Maybe you are going insane or lost too much blood, but you start speaking the necklace. You tell it you about Old ‘Ntoni and the woods and the rabbit you caught the other day and...
You stagger into an alleyway as night fully falls, you push your hand over the wound on your side to stop the bleeding and to prevent the guards or their dogs from fallowing the trail. The wound has stopped hurting too much and if it weren't for the cold it might have even had a pleasant sting to it. Looking around for anything to help in your situation you only manage to find a broken mirror left in a trash heap along the alleyway. You consider how you might be able to escape; you are in no condition to fight, too tired to run, too confused to talk your way out, no money to offer and the locket you are holding in your fist won’t be enough to cover anything, perhaps the gold ring stuck to your pants? too cheap... you briefly to turn your head towards your loincloth but then quickly turn away. 
The city is quiet here; for the first time in days, you feel content, serene... which is odd considering the situation. The glint in the glass caches your eye, perhaps this is a magic mirror that will solve your problems? Never mind, you are just slowly losing it. You look in the reflection, there is a creature in it, a disgusting, mud covered, scarred creature with tears rolling down its chin. You look in the reflection more intensely, what is this creature doing? It’s already dead meat, the guards will come any second, if not it will bleed to death and get turned into sausage for some wretched human who can’t afford anything else. You really think about that, sausage, made from you. How cruel is that? There you are, thinking, loving, dreaming... in the end turned into literal shit.
This is it; you don’t want to run anymore. Even if you survive this what's next? Become another heartless thief or bandit? Perhaps there is a child in you now and you will suffer for them, and then for them to suffer for their own? You think about Antoni for a moment, you wish he were here. You feel your eyes tear up then get angry for not being strong enough to handle this. Antoni would kick you out of his house if he knew half the things you do and the red kobold... you did save that lady at least, the one who didn’t even stop to look at you afterwards. Can you convince Reynard that you’re still a virgin, does he care? At this point you'd probably drop dead as soon as he climbed on top of you. You think about that sick kobold from yesterday, if he is dead you might be the last person to have ever known him… is anyone thinking about him at this point? For a moment your heart sinks, you imagine that the memory of the kobold will be forever lost with you.
You hope that death is like sleeping, an eternal dream...
You manage to remove the thoughts only when a cold droplet touches your snout, its snow. There is no way out now, you are dead. “Draconic creature”. You curse the world, first under your breath then louder and louder. With the last bit of strength, you have you shout so that all the cities may hear: "Why work for a living when you die working?" you read that in one of Antoni’s books once, reading it made you feel smart.

I hear a whimper coming a few houses down the street, the old guard is too distracted from how exasperating this situation is to hear so I pull him towards the street corner. It sounded like a kobold, normally I would never speak to one of those beasts, but this is my last hope, everyone else has gone home, the streets are empty. I will find it now or never. I cautiously look inside the alley, there is a black kobold slumped on the steps of a house. I double check to make sure there are no ambushes around and walk towards the creature, guard at hand. The kobold looks at me and I at it. She is a truly miserable sight, even for one of their deplorable kind. She has scratches and blood all over, legs trembling, no clothes say for some rags with holes all over, more or less revealing the kobold's sex, sunken eyes like those of the dead... The kobold manages to turn its head and stare at me, those eyes almost scare me… but then it opens its clenched fist, revealing a round object: the necklace! Despite my heart racing I look around once more for an ambush and unsheathe my dagger as I approach. Luckily it is not needed, the kobold can barely move, it can’t even speak to me once I ask where the locket had come from, it moves its dried lips but only a few whispers came out.
I go back to the almost asleep guard looking out for muggers and despite his half-hearted protests take the water skin he had filled with alcohol. I kneel in front of the creature, braving the all sorts of awful smells on her. I put the water skin up its muzzle and let a bit of the liquid go in. The kobold drinks it but then starts coughing. My fears that it is going to die prove unfounded as instead she sniffs around then opens its eyes fully, speaking in a weak tone but at least she is a little clear this time:
"You... you are the dragon lady.."
I look at the little pin on my chest with the dragon, I am not the only "dragon lady" around but it is clear that she is talking about the necklace. I sigh and ask again where she got the necklace from. Instead of answering the kobold stares deeper into my eyes. Then I remember that this "thing" was the same kobold that was watching the hired pickpocket after the guards had got him. He must have had given it to her before getting caught. But why had the kobold taken it? I ask it that.
"I don’t know. Maybe I wanted to sell it? You can take it if- if you want.” The kobold lets out a raspy laugh “My road is pawed in spikes and I only have my will as boots” 
“My road is pawed in spikes and I only have my will as boots” “That is one of Uncle Valton’s pretentious lines. How does a feral kobold know of this? I ask it what was wrong with her, on top of the current situation.
"Wrong with me? I don’t know, don’t know anything anymore. I just- I just want to rest. I hurt so many to get here and in the end I’m bleeding to death on a street corner..." It sharply closes its eyes "... paid debts... I don’t want that anymore."
That was strangely thoughtful coming from one of these creatures. I ask how she ended up here.
"The details don’t matter; I'll be sausage before the next night anyway.
I gulp, sausage? The butchers do turn dead kobolds into kibble but... The kobold tries to rise, but only manages to hurt herself more and slumps back down.
"I had a dream a few months ago; it was more beautiful than any book or painting I had seen before. It was truly divine. Now look at me, I am trash. I can’t comprehend it; how could I both make that dream and also be… whatever I am now. If what made that dream is this worthless then nothing else would matter much either, no?
I do not know what to say. The kobold lets out another quite laugh and with a long moan curls up, her eyes staring into the dark sky above. I stand up and take one last look at the bleeding creature then turn around. But there is something brewing inside me. I look at the locket, still covered in kobold blood. Thoughts wage battle inside my mind… 

You can’t take the pain anymore, you let your hand go of the wound. Only a small but steady stream of blood comes out. The faint light of the tower behind the dragon lady is the only thing in your vision, your instincts tell you to beg but you silence them, the slowly piling snow is biting your body. You close your eyes. The cold is biting down harder, then it stops. Are you dead? You feel air up against your body, you close our eyes tighter. The blood god is there in the darkness, it's not happy. 
You open your eyes after feeling the ground under you shake, you look around, it's the street you came from. You are high up however. Just as you manage to adjust yourself you are grabbed again and placed against something soft, you are moving now.

… a little drink
Maybe something to think
Little birdie…

You wake up screaming, everything is dark but very warm. A door gets unlocked, you hide yourself with the linen cloth under you as an armed man with a candle in his hand bursts in. You both look at each other, puzzled.
"Something wrong?"
You can’t put words into your mouth, only a weak "where?" comes out. The man’s eyes seem empty, he doesn’t look very happy.
"Just wait a little more and master will come home, you can talk then shitbold." 
He slams the door shut after himself and you can hear it being locked. Left in the darkness again you are confused. After coughing violently for a few seconds you touch your wounds, they are bandaged but you are bruised all over. You are sitting in a small room with a makeshift bed made out of bits of cloth. Is this a prison? No, it's far too comfortable for that. You remember the lady; she must have taken you in. But why?
The dream comes back to mind, you shiver. What kind of a monster was that? You lick your lips; you can almost taste the thing it gave you.
Then you start remembering what you said, or at least you think you said, to the woman. You look at your claws, "shitbold" the guard called you. Suddenly you feel weak again and start coughing. You would normally cry yourself to sleep in times like this but someone might be listening so instead you simply think about the happier times in the woods, seeing as the future doesn’t look too bright. Is Old Antoni okay? It has only been 5 days since you left, or more? You must go to him as soon as possible. 
The door unlocks from the other side. You brace yourself to be dragged out by guards, but instead two fancily dressed humans, one of them the one you talked to and the other an older one, stick out their heads. The older human looks at the other one with disappointment and whispers something. The sharp glint in his eyes suggests that he has seen more in his years than you can ever imagine and is planning to see a lot more before his time comes. Finally, he approaches you and speaks in a posh tone:
"Well, it appears that you left quite an impression on my niece, suggesting that "I" Would be interested in conversing with "you", can you fallow me mentally?"
Normally you'd just nod to a question like this but clearly the man expects more, what did “mentally” mean again?

Uncle is clearly still not happy about the kobold being here, and now I have doubts too. It tugged on my heart strings to hear those words and I brought her here but what if those were just dazed ramblings that resembled something more by luck? The kobold is doing better at least, it's miserable but still on par with how the other kobold slave had been when it was brought here. The kobold trembles as she answers the question: 
"Ye- yes... sir"
Uncle looks more intensely at the kobold; you can’t quite make out his emotions underneath. Is he impressed, angry, sarcastic? He speaks more commandingly this time:
"Sir? I hope you say that as a term of respect and gratitude rather than implying that I am your master, am I correct in my hypostasis?" The kobold stares blankly for a moment then nods. "Never mind, please repeat the line you told my niece and where you learned it from."
The Kobold starts breathing heavily and seems stressed by uncle's deminer, but it still manages to blurt out a few words:
"Uh- "why work for a living when you die working" from- from- uhhh…"
Uncle now actually seems surprised. That wasn't even the one I had heard.
"Really? You are literate? Not only that but you read ‘my' papers?"
The kobold thinks for a moment.
"I can read if that is what you are asking, but It takes a very long time and I can’t remember some symbols."
Uncle smiles and pulls me back into the hallway.
"I was correct, that kobold slave was dumb. They can read but struggle at it just as I predicted! We can learn a lot from her, and I can finalise the report.” Ever the contrarian, I respond that literacy isn’t enough to place them that far enough on his test. He gives me a dirty look, "Yes, but it is enough to place them way above what they should be. The reproductive organs and life cycle, physique, looks… and now intelligence tying it all to the main theorem!" You don't know what to say, his theories may be true after all, the implications send a shiver down your spine. Uncle goes back inside.
"Stand up, come with us."
The kobold tries to obey but when it gets off the bed it's legs crumble beneath her. Uncle shoots a glance at me. In response I quickly rush towards the creature and get her on her feet, holding one hand as she makes her way outside. The three of us walk into the drawing room where Uncle's apprentice is waiting. I help the small kobold sit on top of one of the chairs and turn to uncle, he first looks at the kobold massaging her legs in pain and then turns to me:
"Now dear, it is time for men to talk now." 
Both of us can clearly see the irony of having the kobold here and not me but there is no way to protest. I leave the room; I can talk to Rodian about the findings later. Uncle Valton thinks telling some things to one apprentice and some to the other is going to hide his knowledge. Does he think we are incapable of talking between each other? This attitude is what’s going to bring the dragon down on them…
Outside the old maid comes into my view; she is looking out the window at the blizzard, clearly distraught. I approach her and she speaks as soon as she hears my footsteps.
"Oh, my lady! This is disaster. Only two more weeks and we would have been able to bring the last harvest in, but now it's all ice."
I explain that I am also deeply concerned about the situation too but the king must have thought about this, actually he probably hasn't but the advisors must have. The army had marched north to crush the orcish tribes a few months ago, they would return with all the food supply the orcs would have for their winter.
"Orcs? But I heard from master- I thought- I thought that they were fighting the kobold savages in the mountains."
I ignore the ramblings of the woman and walk away to the kitchen to double check our own food supply for myself.

Everything hurts, you feel sick from what feels like a minor cold and intimidated by everything all around. This "drawing room" feels less safe than even the dungeons, you are not used to luxury. The floors are covered in thick rugs, the walls painted unlike your shack. Comfy looking couches and other such furniture line the walls. The room isn't too large but it's still bigger than your entire house. Normally you would embrace with open arms a dwelling like this but with two men staring down on you nothing feels well. The younger man could probably crush you like a bug if he wanted you, for a moment you imagine him jumping on you and beating your face in with his fists until your you are a bungle of meat and blood on the floor. On second thought he might not be able to, the man looks like he hasn't slept in days and reeks of alcohol...
 Luckily, you don’t have to dwell on these thoughts for too long as you are seated on a tall chair, your bruises hurt above the hard surface. The old man speaks:
"So, kobold, what is your name?"
The question makes you feel unwell, getting called kobold alone makes you feel sick. You answer with a meek "Sulti". The man goes on.
"Sulti? Were your parents also learned as you are? Or perhaps they come from a yet unknown tribe? never mind, I am Master Valton, head natural philosophy advisor to the king and I have been researching kobold history, biology and behaviour for a while now, but I’ve never known of one that can read common writing, none in my lifespan at least. How did you end up in the situation you were in?"
You look back at him, you hold out your claw. Regardless of what you could do you would always be hated, always afraid, always weak. You thought it would have been better to just... be gone.
The scholar challenges you:
"Life is hard for many."
You giggle, you would more than be happy to have a farm of your own to toil in for the rest of your life if it meant you didn't have to worry about being punished for simply existing. You turn to the scholar and show your scars. You more than know what it feels to bleed for the bread. You just… you can’t explain the feeling. That feeling when you are humiliated for the sake of... nothing perhaps?  When you look around, look at people, only to see nothing in their eyes. They see something else when they look at you too. To them it’s not a person they look at but it’s not an animal either. It makes you feel something… like you were never meant to be born or perhaps you were meant to be like this from the start
The Scholar listens to the response and asks, "And what is the cause?"
You feel a poisonous rage boil within you, "What is the cause? Cause? I have ever done two jobs my entire life: whore and thief. Not because I like it but because I had to! We can live longer than all of you, us kobolds, but I don’t want a second of it! A man can live a stupid but happy life working in a farm, dwarves and elves have magic..." You can feel tears rolling down your chin " ... goblins live short and violent lives, but they do so in ignorance and at least have fun doing it; a flower will live contentment until the day it is plucked. What do we have? Rotten meat loaf once a month? Not getting murdered too often? Merciful slavery? Sex?” your mouth feels full all of a sudden, you spit blood on the carpet.
”That’s what I figured out. I will never be rich or content or famous or powerful, I will never figure anything out, I will never be... I tried to fit in, but those attempts were crushed by fucking ..."
You take a deep breath and gulp down the blood coming from your gums.
You speak softly now, you say you dream too, you cry, you laugh, you desire and most of all you know you will lose all of it once a guard unsheathes his sword. 
You feel your eyes hurt and quickly wipe them before tears form. Only then do you hear the scribblings of the young scholar's pen. After calming down a little you finally admit that you are scared of dying, not just dying but death in general. Thinking about anything dying makes you feel… bad.
As you try to cover your eyes and mouth while sobbing two arms hold you, before you know it you are dragged and placed sitting down on the rug beneath you. It's less dignified but at least your bruises won’t be hurt by the edges of the chair anymore. The younger scholar who presumably put you down returns to his chair and only then do you realize that he is wearing the same dragon pin the other lady had. You turn to Valton who is visibly surprised by your outburst:
"Huh, that is indeed an interesting line of thought, the implications are a lot to consider. I’d rather ignore them for now. The carpet, I thought that something to lie on would make you feel better, but I’m not letting you touch my couch yet. So, as I was saying-"
Suddenly the young apprentice lets out a clearly fake cough, Valton looks confused and a little angry but tries to keep speaking only to be interrupted again by a louder cough. The scholar relents, "What is it Rodian?". The young man rises an eyebrow and turns to you, speaking in raspy tone:
"So, do you think there should be some sort of unity or balance between the races… or perhaps the poor and the rich?"
The question seems to get a rise from the Valton but he doesn’t speak. You think for a moment. You, like many had strong feelings about this but with time, thought and experience things look different: You open your mouth to explain but decide that nothing good will come out if you speak. You turn your head and cross your arms almost as if you want to protect yourself. 
“Fine, I guess some things are best left unspoken”
Only then do you realize how hungry you have been. With nausea kicking in you ask your patrons for some food, preferably milk or thick soup. The young scholar stands up and leaves the room without a word. After checking that he closed the door behind him Valton leans towards you and speaks quietly:
"So, Sulti, one final question: Do you think the world would have been a better place if say... you or kobolds didn't have to exist at all?"
You are taken back, hating the world in general or hating yourself is one thing, but this? Your own kind? The scholar senses what you think.
"I am not asking if you hate the kobold, I’m asking whether you would have preferred if they all... say... never existed?"
You think, too many thoughts... you can’t answer. You simply slump forwards and look at the ground… there is nothing inherent about your consciousness that ties you to your kind, is there? The Scholar lets out a chuckle.
"Just a little question, nothing too much to think about, I wanted to know how a kobold such as you would answer."
As he finishes the young scholar comes into the room with a bowl of soup in his hand and leaves it on the chair you stood on. You approach the food with delight. You know that you shouldn't be eating so fast, especially after starving for so long, but you can’t help yourself. You grab the bowl, almost spilling its contents. With one big gulp you drink almost a quarter of the whole dish, you can feel rice or something similar in your mouth. You feel the food travel down. Having something somewhat solid in your stomach after so long gives you pain but you keep drinking like an animal until the bowl is licked clean. Only once your rampage is over do you see the scholars looking at you mildly disgusted. You awkwardly smile at them.
Valton makes eye contact with the other man, he quickly glances at you and then looks back at his master. The young scholar turns to you for a moment too and nods at his senior. Then they both stand up, Valton looks down on you:
"Sulti, I’m sorry to say this but you won’t be able to stay here. Not that I wouldn’t want it but because you will be arrested."
Your heart sinks.
"We had a guest yesterday, lousy loudmouth, he saw you being dragged in and noticed you had this stuck to your rags:"
He pulls out the golden ring the lady gave to you.
"This ring holds the distinctive markings of the royal family."
He drops you the ring, it looks normal enough but when you look at it again you notice a small text now visible since the ring was cleaned. You lean in since your eye is still blurry but manage to read the text out loud, "By the king's blood”.
"That bastard made us tell it to the king’s men, such a small theft isn't bad in itself but the problem is that theft of royal jewellery, however small, is considered a "Royal offense" meaning there has to be trial. A trial with the king himself as judge as per tradition." You stand up and try to explain the events that happened in the woods but the humans don't seem convinced, if they managed to understand what you meant with your exasperated tone in the first place. The young man takes a sip from his flask and reassures you: “Don't worry Sulti, we all get on the bad side of nobility sometimes.” 
You gulp, you feel like you can’t breathe, this has to be a bad dream, you fell asleep in the streets and this is a dream. Valton sees your discomfort and kneels to make eye contact.
"But that's okay, I find your insights invaluable. As such I will do my best to help you defend yourself. Alone the king would sentence you to death as soon as you enter the courtroom since that's all that tradition requires of him, but I can pull a few strings."
You start coughing as the young scholar leaves the room with his papers packed. An old maid comes in. Before shutting the door Valton shoots one last glance at you:
"Sulti, we will do our best to help. You are as I said “invaluable” to us. Now please rest and eat well, you must survive until the trial." For the first time he smiles and you feel that it is not intentional. " You well help us greatly in our-" His smile drops, without a word he shuts the door, leaving you with the maid. The old woman seems more than unhappy with this arrangement, she tells you that you need a wash and then holds your skinny arms and wobbles them. "You'll need some red meat too If I heard what's going to happen to you right". You gulp down your saliva.
She then drags you through the colourful and luxurious, at least you assume to be luxurious, mansion of the scholar until you reach a room in the basement with a big bucket in the middle of it. It's big enough for a kobold to fit in but a human would have to pour it on themselves. The maid grabs it and runs off but not before telling you to strip. You are a little perturbed by her strict words but start removing the barely used children’s pants and shirt in compliance. After a few minutes the woman comes back with a bucket and surprisingly another kobold behind her. She drops the bucket carelessly on the ground, spilling some water in the process and turns to you. "I don’t care what master Valton said, I ain't touching no kobold. This…” pointing to the frightened kobold behind her” … shit we use to clean the gutters will wash you, isn’t that right?". The kobold turns his eyes down and nods. With that she pulls a fancy looking soap from her pocket, thinks for a moment, hands it to the kobold and leaves.
You are left alone with him. You observe your “kin”: small and brown, a deep scares running down from breast to knee... doesn’t look very healthy. You could probably take him out if he tries anything. Then you notice something wrong with the shape of his jaw, and for some reason he's hiding his claws between his legs. He notices what you are looking at, before you can act he hides his hands better and comes forward:
"Uh... I- I- need- to wash you says missus.”
You have been treated well so far, but you don’t want to turn your back to the kobold, so you get in the bucket filled with lukewarm water while carefully keeping eye contact. You are on edge but the kobold seems more scared of you than you are of it.
The creature seems to have never been washed in a bath or washed someone else before, so it holds out the soap, almost dropping it, and starts rubbing it on your chest. But there is something wrong with how he rubs, he keeps scratching you with what feels like his claws. To be fair you used a bathroom only once when Antoni had you bathe in his large bathtub because you needed to stay the winter in his shop. You sigh audibly remembering him but there is nothing to do. 
The kobold gets scared by your sudden sound and drops the soap, then fails to grab it as it is wet and slippery. He starts franticly chasing the soap around the tiled room as it slides from one corner to the next and you can’t help but giggle. He finally manages to catch the slippery thing roaming his domain and returns back to you. You try to hide your smile from him but he is too quick and he can’t help but faintly smile himself. 
Only then do you notice it, the kobold has no teeth. 
You freeze, the kobold is surprised but then touches his face and starts going red. You quickly reach forward to grab him and pull him towards you, he tries whole heartedly to resist. When you try to force open his mouth he refuses and you are not strong enough to pry it open so you stick your fingers in his nostrils, forcing him to open up his mouth. He has no teeth, all removed, most are fully missing but some still have their base left. It is horrifying. Then you close his mouth and grab one of the arms, he doesn’t resist this time. You look at his claws and realize why he was accidently scratching you. He had all his talons pulled expect for one which is half missing and cracked, he couldn’t even sharpen it from the pain exposed nerves would cause. This is what happens to kobold slaves? You imagine the poor thing squirming and crying in pain as they defang and declaw him. The thought alone makes you shudder. Feeling ashamed for embarrassing him, you turn your back to this time as he starts slowly rubbing your back with the soap. You can hear him breath deeper, he is probably remembering what happened to himself as well. He tries using a towel to wash you but you direct him to the washcloth. You want to just ask him to let you wash yourself as the wretch has no idea what to do and is too busy reliving his nightmares but everything feels too awkward to speak. You formulate a cold, polite way to tell him off in your mind but just as you are about to speak you stop.
Instead, you decide to break the tension a little. Without warning you splash the water in your bucket and send it flying towards the unsuspecting kobold. Before he knows it he is drenched and falls butt first on the ground. You both stare at each other for a moment then you playfully giggle and step out of the bucket to help him get on his feet. You grab him by the hand and let him hesitantly get in the bucket himself. He needs the wash as much as you do. As he is trembling you grab the soap and show him how to rub it in your hands and then rub them against his shoulders. He looks down at the water, trying to hide his gaze as you wash his torso and head while he cleans his lower body. After you are both done you grab his chin and make him look at you. He is smiling softly; you smile back in return.
For a brief moment everything feels okay. 
You then hold his arm and tell him to step out of the bucket which he does so quickly and grabs the soap to clean you now. Only as he is stepping out of the tub do you realize how weak the kobold looks. You could probably beat him up even if he had the jump on you... you look away quickly before he notices that you are sizing him up. You sit in the bucket as he washes you. The water is a little muddy now, but you were far filthier than him, it’s not worse than the canal anyway. He is more confident now and he manages to clean you proper. Once he gets the hang of it you finally relax a little but still can’t help but remain paranoid. He finishes cleaning you a little later and when you open your eyes your gazes meet.
You hear the maid coming down the basement with heavy steps. The kobold too looks at the door and then back again at you with sadness. You decide to make use of whatever time you have. Despite your better judgment you pull him towards you and hold his hand. Just as the door opens you push him back away. The maid barges into the room and stares at you then at the squeaky-clean slave.
"Did I fucking tell you to wash yourself dumbass? that's it, come with me after we are done. And you, wear your clothes and make it to the kitchen, unless you are as dumb as him and don’t remember the way." You never actually saw the kitchen but walk out of the room anyway. You messed up again, didn’t you? You make your way upstairs, too depressed to care about the treasures and wealthy furniture around you.
Actually, you aren't. You notice a really fancy old tapestry showing the vista of a city with a white tower rising in the middle on some plains. Just roll it up and grab it, find the kobold, climb out a window... you couldn't leave the city with Reynard or the city guard searching for you though... In the end you are all just kobolds: animals but dumber who can’t fallow a simple order and incapable of caring about anyone but yourselves. You fallow the enticing smell of meat to the kitchen where a younger maid is working the fire. Feeling confident in your new clothes and fresh look you slide into the room. Inside there is more food than you have ever seen in a house before. Vegetable filled boxes, sacks of corn and wheat, herbs and spices hanging from walls, sausage in a corner... you look at the sausage, it couldn't be, could it? These people would buy better meat, no? Maybe the servants... Before you think too much you turn to the young maid who is cooking something over the fire. She notices you and turns. There is mild curiosity on her face.
"Stop staring at me with those puppy eyes, I get why master Valton is feeding you so well but eat up before he changes his mind." 
You were making puppy eyes? Must have been a kneejerk reaction to someone making food. The maid pulls out a piece of steak the size of your head, places it on a ceramic plate and starts pouring spices on it. Once done she places the steak on top of a table and puts a large box for you to sit on while eating. You rush to the piece of meat and prepare to bite. You lust for the food more than anything else before and start chomping on it. The spices, blood, meat... there is party in your mouth and you have never seen a such a good guest list. Before you know it the plate is half empty. You take a moment to breath and start eating slower this time. Once done your stomach feels like it was just punched. In a daze you ask the maid for a drink to which she responds by putting in front of you a small pot filled with a warm brown liquid. Only when you smell it do you realize that it's boiled fruit. At first you are taken back by how sweet the juice is but the maid also brings some regular water so you can wash your throat afterwards, only after finishing the meal do you realize you burned the roof of your mouth. Worse, the speed you ate at plus the previous starvation is really messing with your stomach.
After a few minutes of pure ecstasy and painful cramps you manage to stand up and thank the maid for the food, she shrugs and tells you to thank Valton instead. With night approaching you make your way back to the small room the guard dragged you out of. You enter and drop yourself on the large chest they made your bed out of. Tomorrow you'll be dragged into a jail cell but no need to think about that for now.

…never again
That smile tastes like the sweetest wine
That laugh looks like the brightest day
Those lips sound like the gayest tweet
Since I’ll feel… 

There are heavy footsteps coming from behind the door and outside there is heavy snow. Is it morning already? Are the city guards here? You pull your blanket and cover yourself but when the door opens it's not a guard who comes in but instead a very frightened kobold, the one who you washed with. He must have snuck here for you! You stand up from the bed and look back at him. He tries to say something, but you quickly silence him by showing your claws. Then you move forward and push his paralysed body unto a wall. You show your claws glinting in the darkness and tell him that you’ll chop him up like cheese if he came here for you. You see him go red in the darkness as your eyes adjust to the dark. He drops something on the ground, a red apple and a butter knife! You chuckle and ask if that’s how ladies are treated where he comes from. He blushes even more and manages to stutter a few words: “Do- do you- you want to talk?” With his only weapon gone you indicate for him sit next to you on the bed while you make more space. You grab the dropped apple and knife while he shyly takes a seat. He watches you silently as you slice the apple up. You hand him a piece and he greedily shoves it in his mouth but can’t chew on the account of missing teeth, he tries to eat with his few remaining teeth on the back but it’s in vain. After an agonizing minute he drops the saliva covered mushy apple on his palm. You sigh and grab it; this is disgusting, but probably no more disgusting than the things you might have to do if you are with child. You grab a bucket from under your feet then you carefully dice the apple on the back of the bucket as if it’s a cutting board, making sure that the juices don’t flow out. Once the mashed wet apples are ready you hand the bucket to the kobold, who starts devouring the disgusting slop. Must have been a very long time since he ate something as sweet as this.
You don’t know how wrong this is, but you can’t be sure of anything anymore. As the kobold is distracted with food you carefully lift his tattered pants with the butter knife and look under. He isn’t here for what you think. You feel ashamed but also relieved. Once he manages to finish his food you start dicing the other one, asking him how he got this food. He stops licking his lips and looks away, then starts rubbing his wrists. “Uhhh... I found it.” You laugh, you pat his back and tell him to not be so ashamed about theft, he is in good company.
The kobold looks away from you, “I don’t think you should eat stolen apples.” You throw a cube into your mouth and ask why. “Because- because its owner might want it more.” What if the owner has many apples, and refuses to share? “Well- well how would you feel if someone stole your apple?” You giggle, then tell him he might make a great thinker one day. You hand him the fresh batch of apple mush and he starts licking the bucket clean. You think for a moment, you could take him on easily… You slowly push the now clean bucket away and pull him down on the bed. You make him lie next to you on the small space and tell him that you’ll chop his manhood off if he dares touch you in anywhere under the belly. He takes the threat to heart and almost falls out of bed trying to make sure his legs don’t touch yours. Once your breaths normalize he starts playing with your ears and you let him, his hands are so warm. As he is snuggling with his face under your muzzle you finally ask him his name. He turns his head away from you and sighs.
"It doesn't matter, we will never meet again."
You are taken back. You ask him if he doubts so much that you will leave the dungeon and come back. He sighs louder this time.
"It’s not that. Sulti, I lied- I lied to you."
You stand on all fours on top of him.
"Master Valton, he came to me. He gave me the knife…” he points to the small butter knife on the floor “…and the apple as my reward and he told me to- to force myself on you."
You almost shout at him and barely stop yourself. "But why?", you quietly ask.
"I don’t know, he just told me to never let you know. But I couldn’t help myself, he said he would hurt me if I didn’t help. Sulti- Sulti-" 
He starts sobbing uncontrollably, you quickly gag him knowing that Valton could be just outside. You think for a moment, why in hell would Valton want you to get raped by another kobold? So that he can save you and earn trust? he did that already. Then you turn towards the kobold, your mind is telling one thing, but your heart is telling otherwise. No good will come out of this for him. His sobbing stops so you release his muzzle.
"Sulti, when we open that door you need to pretend I attacked you. I don’t know what he will do to you if we don’t."
You protest, come up with alternatives but he won’t listen. finally, you relent and simply hug him. You both sit in silence for a moment. He finally breaks it.
"Sulti, I was born in the southern tribe, before it was wiped out years ago" You know there are a few slums in the other cities and a few tribes in the Badlands, but you didn’t know the isolated southern tribes were wiped out. "They took me when I was little, you are the first kobold I chatted with in what feels like ages." You sense tears soaking your neck. "They- I don’t remember who used to sing this song, I just remember it being sung by the others. I don’t remember it in its full either. Can you- can you help me sing it?" 
You wipe the tears under his eyes in response. He lies back down on the bed and starts humming a familiar melody then sings a few lines:

White stars shine on black scales
Have I been attacked?

Black eyes shine on white scales
Have I been cursed?

You remember a few kobold couples singing something like this to each other in one of the slum rooms and pick up the song, he can have his romance song, but you are still not letting him touch you. You whisper the second part of the duet for him to repeat.

My eyes see nothing but the darkest pearls
My hands feel nothing but the softest silk

Have I been Blessed?
Have I been Killed? 

He stops fallowing, “Oh, it’s about love. We- we can sing something else if you want…” You feel your eyes get wet. You keep singing both parts alone.

Will I return from the path of glory?
Will you let your heart remain Sorry?

Will you let your bed remain cold?
Will you weep when I am cold?

You hug him tightly.

I will sing your song like a nightingale
I will watch your gift like a slave

We will see each other again
We will see each other again  

But will we sing together?
But will we sing together, again?

Neither of you speak for a moment, you can only hear the Kobold's breathing getting heavier. Suddenly he jumps out the bed and rushes to the door. You don’t have even a moment to grab him as the warmth leaves your side. He reaches for the door handle and gives you a smile: "Please, please be good.", you ask him his name, but he simply stares into your eyes deeper. With that he opens the door and before even managing to take a step outside the old guard charges into him and knocks him unto the floor, you vince as the sound of bones cracking is heard. Valton comes after him with a lantern at hand and rushes to your side. There is concern on his face, normally you'd believe it but it feels painful just looking at him now.
"Sulti!" he shouts, you can barely stop yourself from punching him. "Gods, what has he done to you", he looks down on your lower body and softly touches your legs as you recoil, his concern turns to anger. " I see, looks like it wasn't enough we cut his teeth and claws.". Valton turns towards the Kobold wincing in pain on the ground, he kicks its head, sending it into a daze. Valton shouts again: "Here sleeps the greatest mind of your generation and you try to do “this” to her? What is wrong with you?" he kicks the kobold again while you wince in pain with him. Done with the beating, his master shoots the guard a glance, the guard nods. With one swoop the sword in his hand comes down and cuts open the kobold's belly. you think you can see his guts, blood splitters cover the room, you yourself get splashed and gag. Just as you prepare to jump the guard with your knife you see the Kobold's face. He is covered various bodily fluids and can barely open his eyes, but he is still staring at your eyes.
You mechanically get off from the bed and rather softly kick the kobold, making sure not to hit any wounds. Valton grabs your arm "Sulti, I understand. Perhaps- Perhaps... you should be the one to teach this one a lesson, a last lesson." He hands you a dagger and tells the guard to drag the kobold outside. You blindly follow them, trying to ignore the faint screams and panting of... you make your way to the garden. It's still snowing outside, the guard puts the kobold down on the side of the road, takes on look at the sky and goes back inside. You are left alone with whoever’s half dead body. You kneel on his side and beg once more: "What is your name, I must remember you by somehow." The Kobold smiles instead. He coughs more blood on your thighs and manages to gather enough breath to speak: "Sulti- Sulti... please- please just... warm me… " Ignoring the blood and guts you cover him with your body from the snow, the ever-slower breathing is all you hear as you shush him and try to repeat a nursery rhyme you know. 
Then something crosses your mind, maybe it's stupid, maybe you are having a moment of clarity. You apologize to the kobold for not trying to talk to him once he entered your room... you thought he wanted... you should have... you turn his head towards you, he is crying and shaking, unable to do anything but watch as he keeps bleeding.
You find the main artery on his neck, placing the dagger right on the darkening veins. The scales puncture like cloth all the way to bone, no meat or fat underneath. He stops moving. You look at his lifeless face then turn away to hide from his still open eyes.
Someone is walking on the snow behind your back, it's Valton. You try to imagine him as only a walking pile of meat, bone and clothes to prevent yourself from killing him here and now. He walks behind you and pats your head. " Feel better now? You should, those beasts deserve all the pain they can get." You think you are starting to realize his plan, at least a part of it, how deep does this go? He grabs you by the hand and takes you to his drawing room You try to a catch a glimpse of the nameless kobold, but he is lost among the snow.
 Inside there is the young maid holding some dry clothes, she helps you put them on and then Valton lifts you to lie on the soft couch, covering you with a heavy blanket. "No one can hurt you know dear" This is surreal, you are still holding the slender dagger in your hand and manage to muster all your will power to not stab the bastard. He leaves the room and the maid fallows soon after, but before she can leave you shout at her, she turns with heavy eyes. "What?" You ask her what the name of that Kobold was. "I dunno, everyone just called him Kobold or some slur, I think I heard him introduce himself to some kobold whores through a window once, they laughed at him and went away though" She leaves, you are only left with the sound of storms outside. 

… meticulous disfigurement of the highest degree on the sparkling banks of cautious misery!
An anxious scream towards the most desperate…

That face, that’s all you remember of your dream. That face is what you imagine the Blood God has. You wake to a terrible headache and the young maid coming into the room. She is holding a tray of bone broth with bread in her hand and gives you a curious look seeing you on the couch. She puts the tray on a chair where you can reach it and then leaves. You are still recovering from the night's events but manage to fit some drink in your throat, tastes like chicken. As you finish eating Valton comes into the room and pats you on the head softly, you actually feel less tense thanks to the pat but feel awful from enjoying it. He kneels down to your level and hands you a very small glass bottle. " I know the king personally, so I wrote a defence for you. I know you can’t read fast so I prepared it like this, they will take all your possessions from you once you enter so you will have to find somewhere to store this.” Bastard, just to weird him out you pull down your pants right there and stick the vial in your private bits, Valton is taken back as you had hoped and then quickly leaves. 
You decide that whatever plans Valton has for you will not work out and grab the knife hidden under your pillow. It's small but you are tiny. You hope to never do this again. You stab the knife with a piece of bread so it doesn't cut you. Then you carefully start sliding it up your back, it's first half goes in as smooth as it's going to get but then you reach the hilt. After a lot of careful pushing, you finally give up and simply try as hard as possible. It definitely cuts you but the thing is in, the bread soaks up the blood and prevents you from cutting yourself further. It feels awful walking around with the vial rubbing up and the knife poking you through the bread but it only needs to last to the prison. 
You leave the room and find Valton, he is standing with another wealthy looking man holding the ring, he must have ratted you out. He looks down on you as you wobble towards them. "So, you are awake? unless Valton has some serious bribes you will go back to sleep soon, I already prepared everything so go fallow the guards outside." Is he in on Valton's plans? You can’t decide and simply walk to the two guards waiting outside. One spits on your feet and the other chains you up. Soon you are trying to walk to the dungeons. The road and the haste of the guards is bad enough but the small vial is even worse, It managed to just sit in just the wrong place. As you leave the house you try to look at where his corpse was. There is nothing there now, they even cleaned up the blood. You hope he at least got dumped in a mass grave rather than being sent to the butchers. The image of his wrangled body being chopped up, intestines being filled with- You take a deep breath and fallow the guards. 
You walk through the city as people watch, most kobolds would be cut down on the spot if they committed a crime, the fact that you are being dragged like this is interesting to them. You still feel ashamed even though you are innocent. While walking you mostly keep your head down but can't help when you reach the gallows. The two singers you saw the other day are hanging by the neck there with their instruments broken under their feet, crows are pecking out their rotting eyes. You hold your breath until they are out of sight.
Finally, after the long march you reach the castle's gates. You walk through the courtyard. A metal door thicker than your head opens to a stone tower next to the castle. So, you are not going to the dungeon but to the fancy tower instead. The guards push you in and you come to a stop in front of a scribe. Your escort hands him a paper which he inspects thoroughly then with an impressed look turns to you: "Stole royal jewelry? That is impressive, it's likely the most impressive thing you’ll ever do in your short life. don’t worry though, I’m sure your tribe or whatever will make stories about the kobold who managed to get the king's attention for a whopping 10 seconds before being executed. You don’t say a word and simply look down. The guard tells a number and another one starts stripping you, he pulls your shirt and then you raise your legs to let him remove the pants. To your surprise they also remove the bandages on you, luckily both the wound on your arm and side have mostly healed, leaving long scars. Naked, you can fully feel the cold besieging the city. Luckily, the guards don’t notice anything about your strange walk to the cell. You climb many stairs upwards; with each floor the prisoners get more miserable and fewer in number, you assume that they are debtors and political prisoners or perhaps those waiting for their turn on the... Only the second to the top floor is empty as there appears to have been a collapse there, opening the building's walls. This could present an opportunity to escape without much attention. You finally reach the top where small individual cells are. A guard is leaning against one of the three cells. You look closer he, is in the process of…  you turn away from the sight. The guard doesn’t mind finishing until the other guard places you in your cell and leaves. After getting a hold of himself and pulling back up his pants the guard takes out a piece of bread from his pocket and throws it on the wretched occupant of the cell. The unrecognizable prisoner who is hiding under a large tattered blanket doesn’t even bother cleaning itself but grabs the bread mid-air and pulls itself back into the shadows. 
The perverted guard turns to you this time: “I would have given you the same treatment as her but someone paid me handsomely to not do so and to feed you properly. Now, don’t cause trouble or I might just go back on my word!” The guard climbs down the stairs, leaving you alone with whoever is in the other cell and another prisoner locked in a room behind an intimidating steel door. 
You want to just sit down and weep, but you can do that later when your life isn't in as much danger. You first remove the vial, and then painfully slide the dagger out. The bread you stuck it into is still there but you don’t even consider eating it. Whoever built cells these must have been a kind soul because there are tiny stone shafts coming from the roof and leading into the cells, carrying water. Unluckily it is winter and most of the water is ice cold. You try to clean yourself a bit but only your mouth can endure the freezing cold. Hiding the dagger under a loose rock you open the vial and look at the paper. It is extremely small, so small in fact that your eyes can’t even read the text. You think that Valton had messed up but how could he have written this in the first place? Then you realize something, the vial you are holding is doing something to your skin, it looks clearer. You hold the vial over the piece of paper and suddenly the small text is reflected larger on the glass. Apparently natural philosophy has actual uses! 
You lean in to read the text but not only are you a slow reader per usual the damage in your eye makes it harder to concentrate. After hours you only manage to read a few lines about representing something before giving up. Once you put the paper in a dry part of the cell a sudden tiredness hits you. It would be wiser to look around the cell and maybe see if anyone wants to talk but you simply feel exhausted despite being awake for only a few hours. The stone under you feels like silk as you close your eyes for a moment to rest.

...the fight
His crime?
Gossip and lies!
Of course, he is still waiting
Dancing with...

You wake up to the sound of a door slamming shut. The guard steps away from the closed door and locks the hatch where you presume he sent food through. You try to call out to him but he doesn't even acknowledge your cries and goes down the stairs, just then do you see the piece of bread he left for you.
With nothing better to do you call out to the occupant of the other cell but the person hiding under the mass of ragged fabrics ignores you. Since your stomach still hurts from how much you ate last time you break a piece from the loaf of dark bread and throw it just outside the bars of the other cell. The figure inside turns around to see the piece of food and begins slowly crawling towards the food. As he reaches out to grab the bread his dirty face leaves the shade and you make eye contact, she is an elf!
The creature also seems surprised by your sight, she leans towards the metal bars of her cell and stares at you with sunken eyes. Before you can utter a word she violently throws her blanket aside revealing herself to be the slaver elf who captured you, now barely recognizable with her scares and mangled body! As you recoil away from her she raises an arm and pointes towards you. “You were with them too weren’t you? You were all conspiring against me from the start! I did everything and you still torment me!” You try to respond to her but she keeps screaming incoherently until her voice starts giving out and she scurries back to her corner, quietly weeping hidden under the blanket. You can hear her whisper something about doing everything she was told. 
You don’t even know how to make of all this. You keep slowly reading the defense the scholar prepared for you. He want’s you to talk about how “the mental aptitude of kobolds would deem them too intellectually incapable to be held in court as they should be charged on the same basis as critter” He wants to say that you are too stupid to commit crimes? That almost seems like a good defense, you have never seen a court in action so who knows. But something about it still seems off, Valton did call you “the greatest mind of your generation” so wouldn’t it make more sense to pardon you because of your worth? Animals can still be executed after all…
As you ponder the questions a sudden tiredness overtakes you, you feel nauseous as the paper slips from your hand and you lie on the stone floor with your blanket wrapped around you.

… from happenstance
Run! Run from your fate 
Like mice to the slaughter 
Like a sudden…
 
You spend the next day reading the text and meditating until the trial. It all feels like calm before the storm. Only in the final hours as tiredness and nausea set in once more do you manage to read the needlessly verbose text. Its contents are truly not worth mentioning at it's full, but it more or less confirms that Valton wanted to you hate your own kind and for some reason tell that to everyone in the kingdom. In your defence to the king, you were meant to explain how "all Kobolds are stupid", how "You are just simple-minded beast trying to survive" and how "you would rather live as his slave if it meant you could be forgiven by his highness". You rip the small paper in half and trample it on the ground with your feet.  
You have better ideas than this. Valton clearly has zero good intentions for you and is trying to use you for something, but what? Make spectacle to the king about how bad Kobolds are? You start circling the room, thinking of how you will speak to the king. You feel dizzy, you lean out the tiny hole meant to serve as a window to get fresh air. After it enters your system you try looking for the paper to see if there is something you missed but they remember that you ripped it apart. You turn to still weeping elf in contemplation; there might be tens of people there, people you can touch the heartstrings of to help you. If the princess is there you might just make it out with your head intact. Perhaps this won’t be as bad as you think it will be. You spend the little time you have trying to make a new speech to tell but you just can’t remember what you intended to say. After putting in some more effort you hope that words will come to you while there. Before going to sleep you check your belly for pregnancy as you have been doing since yesterday, kobold pregnancies last only a few weeks after all. To your dismay your belly looks thicker than yesterday, maybe it's the food? Or you are stressed? You don’t have time to worry about that now.

…more than …

…bastard …

…the holy…

Morning comes slow, rolling on the hard stones it is difficult to sleep but you could be doing a lot worse. The guard comes to pick you up. You wash yourself up in the freezing waters best you can and soften your throat with bread. The guard brings your old clothes back but clearly they have used the rags for something for the past couple of days and are now barely intact. The guard notices you checking the clothes and grins: "Heh, my children wanted to play "catch the kobold" the other day and I couldn't resist them when they asked for ‘that’ kobold's clothes. You know how it is." ‘that’ kobold? how many people knew you were here? You anxiously make your way down the tower, as you go lower you notice the prisoners staring at you. No one did that on the way here, a bad feeling is in your gut. You walk outside to be met by a crowd of people and a handsome young guard in shining armour is your escort. You are amazed by the sights and sounds. Clothes from a thousand colours, young and old, women and men... all for you? Your new escort notices your face and turns to you: "The king has found it to be more efficient if the court processed two cases at once. For the last 3 days a small group was being process for treachery against the crown. Their sentences have been... executed... so now it's your turn. It's both a relief and also disappointing that you aren't the centre of attention. But you still pretend that all these dandy, rich, powerful folk have come to see you, the master criminal be judged. You walk into the castle through the courtyard with roughly a quarter of the hundred-person crowd watching you. You hold your head high and try to walk like your valiant knight but quickly realize that's not going to fly with webbed feet and try to scurry along before making more of a fool out of yourself.
The grand door of the castle interior swing open. You freeze as soon as you see the number of people: a wooden fence separates the important from the spectators, inside the fence people sit on teared seats, a reverse pyramid with the king and his advisors in the centre. Suddenly you hear a familiar voice, it's Old Antoni! He is still alive and coughing. You look at him but are powerless to do anything as the knight pushes you forward. You finally arrive in front of the man himself; he hasn’t been introduced yet but from the clothes alone anyone can tell that this is the most important person here; golden throne, purple clothes, the jewellery, the crown... You also see Valton next to him, whispering to the bored man. But the situation isn’t as gloomy as it seems! The princess is sitting next to her father too but she is trying to avoid your gaze, a bad sign. The king stops talking to the courtiers and raises his hammer as soon as he sees you and opens his mouth but Valton quickly rests his hand next to his and they both awkwardly stare at each other before the king puts his hammer back on the floor and slumps on the throne. When you finally reach the end of the long hallway, within earshot of the king, the situation truly bears down on you. This is worse than being shot, you are not used to this many eyes being on you. A thief dies when people look at her, that's what you are used to. The king sighs audibly and makes a hand gesture to the courtier next to him dressed like a high-class prostitute. The boy stars reading a long piece of parchment as the court writes down.

"By the order of the crown this particular individual has been rightfully and through the authority of the most honourable crown and the...

Are they eating cakes in the back?

...as such based on the mentioned ancient laws it has been found appropriately that the most honourable and righteous...

These clothes have lice, at least you have scales. Ooh! Those are some nice jewellery on that woman, you could make a killing at the-

"... in conclusion, Lady… “he stutters as no one, not even you, can believe a kobold is being called lady…” Sulti Kristiania..." Kristiania? That's not your name, what has Valton been doing? When the name Kristiania is mentioned voices boom across the room but one of the advisors loudly hushes them down. You look at the princess who stares at you as the sorrowful look on her face turns to one of displeasure. This is not going well from the start.

"... will be charged for the capital crime of theft of sanctioned royal jewellery."

When the long speech is over Valton steps forward. "I, Master Valton, Natural Philosophy advisor to his highness will represent the offended party, his highness himself" he steps back to his palace. The boy turns to you "And who will represent you, offending party, Lady Sulti Kristiania?"

You are frozen, not a word can leave your mouth. You remember the paper Valton gave you...

"Who will represent you Lady Sulti Kristiania?"

Whispers among the crowd, you take a deep breath and tell that you will represent yourself.

The trial for Sulti has started but Rodian’s mind is still with his comrades who had to take the fall. Those people, now alongside Sulti probably, will go down in history as heroes once this is all done with. Rodian sips some wine from his flask and looks over his papers again. He didn't even have the chance to explain to the kobold how to read the paper, it seems like she figured it out herself, clever girl. The court proceedings have been going smooth for now but if Valton doesn't wrap this up fast the king is going to get bored and end it however he wants. The Kristiania trick was too risky, Rodian told him that the failsafe was not needed but Valton never listens does he? Master steps forward and his apprentice takes another look at the script to see if there are any discrepancies. 
"... It is well known, mostly thanks to my research, that kobolds are..." Already off script complimenting himself, Rodian sighs. "... lack many of the faculties that makes humans, dragons, dwarves etc. sapient the way we are, this one can barely comprehend reading after years in training in fact. Thus, it is no wonder that this creature has had the audacity to commit this most heinous crime. Now we shall list the evidence acquired..." Rodian repeats the words: The ring, Sulti being chased by guards, criminal background etc. etc. "... as such we request the punishment of indentured servitude as Sulti Kristiania lacks the judgment necessary to be judged as a regular criminal despite fitting the model of one." Sounds of discontent come from across the room. For the crowd, Master’s supposed representation of the king must seem awfully gentle towards the kobold. We are doing okay for now but can Sulti remember her lines? After a solid minute does the kobold realise it's her turn to speak. They should have given her new clothes and a prep talk beforehand for sure.
"Uh- I Sulti- I acknowledge the fact that I was carrying the golden ring owned by the royal family..." Rodian told Valton to keep it simple but the old scholar was wise, she can remember her lines alright. "... but I deny that I have stolen the ring!" What? Rodian doesn't even bother checking his papers. Valton freezes, he isn't showing any emotion but clearly he didn’t' expect this. Sulti isn't misremembering, she is going off script.
She sees the shock on Valton’s face and with newfound confidence goes on: " In fact I did not steal the ring but merely… found it on the forest road where I supposedly stole it. I- I- I had every intention to return the ring to its rightful owner when I found them. I have witnesses to support my claim: Lady... Lady... Uhhh... Master Valton's Niece.” Rodian doesn’t know what Sulti is planning but in any case Lady Odlei is a wild card among her family, which isn't saying much but still she might be of use to the kobold. 
Valton interjects: "Your highness I find much more appropriate that a man should be witness as my niece's memory may be fallible and I think it's much more appropriate if we send our guard or the noble-" A loud crack comes from the other side off the room. Lady Odlei just slammed the entrance doors and is coming full speed ahead. The kings rolls his eyes "just let the woman speak and let's get on with it." Master Valton's plans are not going well at all.

Lady Odlei steps forward and bows in front of the king, the king is at least a little excited from her wonderful sight now. Then she steps in front of the kobold. "Yes, I was there when we found the ring, Sulti had just been chased by two guards. She was being prosecuted out of pure spite mind you. When I found her she was heavily wounded and I asked why she hadn't gone to a doctor, she had no money. But did you know what she had (turning to the crowd) a gold ring, an extravagant gold ring. This kobold, this creature supposedly lacking all compassion and intellect afforded to us had chosen to put her own life in the line just to preserve the honour of this crown and not sell the ring. How many among you can claim to be as such? I have no doubts that if she had known it was royal jewellery she would have returned it in an instant!"
Valton looks dead inside, a cheer goes up in the crowd, then a whistle, a few people start talking loudly. Lady Clarissa bows in front of the king, shoots a glance at Valton, then goes back without even looking at the kobold she defended. Valton turns to the king and says something to him. The man smiles and holds his hammer out. "I declare a break; everyone go eat or something." Some stay to discuss, others leave. Valton makes a beeline for Rodian, grabs his hand and drags him to a secluded room in the castle. Once inside Valton shuts the door and sits on a chair devastated, then turns to his apprentice with flaming eyes. "What the fuck?"
This isn't the best time for it but Rodian makes a small joke: "Well, she forgot to mention subsection 2A, 3A, 4A and 5A and you forgot to mention evidence 6B." "This isn't the time Rodian!" Rodian takes a seat himself and looks at the ceiling, barely able to hold himself together and tell Valton that this impromptu court scheme was unnecessary as he had said before,  "Well, maybe you can make stuff up?" "Make stuff up?" Master looks at him. "Yes, I mean- you are more credible than her. You can trap her, make it seem to her like you are giving up and then come to the real point quickly." Master Valton stares into nothing for a moment. Then he abruptly stands up, pats Rodian's shoulder and makes his way back to the courtroom.
Valton starts a vicious counterattack as soon as the proceedings start again.
"Sulti, what were you doing two nights ago before you were found?"
"I was wrongfully being chased by two guards."
"But the captain of the guard had been chasing a kobold fitting your description for a few days, just as you came into the city."
"..."
Valton brings up heritage,
"Sulti, where did you learn to read again?"
"From a truly wise person"
"Oh, is that so? Why didn't that wise person teach you to recognize royal jewellery?"
"..."
His attacks are methodological and slow, this is Valton's hundredth trial, it's her first.
"Sulti, we know you are a thief.”
"Who told you?"
"We wrote down everything you said when you first came in remember?" 
He points to the bailiff and asks for a specific part of our transcripts to be read:  "I have ever done 2 jobs my entire life: whore and thief." The kobold seems shaken after her own words are read to her. 
As the words are read out Rodian starts feeling a sudden urge to take swig of his wine but doesn’t. Instead, he concentrates on the words he had carefully written out with the kobold. He can’t explain why but he feels weird, almost ashamed.
 "A thief steals many things, and they sell their things through these 'fences'." Valton turns to the king. “Your highness, the truth is now revealed at it's full. This creature is not just incompetent and stupid but also treacherous! She stole the jewellery as an attack against the crown because she is the adopted daughter of the late Mister Kristiania. Angry at his capture she robbed the princess and intended to use the ring against the royal family in a draconic ritual! This is no simple misunderstanding, it's treachery. There is confusion in the courtroom, the king for the first time in his life shows foresight and raises his hammer to shut them down beforehand.
Valton truly is a genius, lies alone easily crumble, it's much easier to simply shift the truth in your favour. The kobold's legs are shaking, Rodian can't help but feel a little sad for her. He starts packing his papers to leave before the sentencing but then the kobolds shouts with all the strength she can muster "I would like to call one last witness: The Princess." The room goes quiet, the princess sinks to her seat but the king impatiently points to the spot in front of the kobold. What is Sulti doing? The controversy all those years ago is still in everyone's minds, kobolds and royalty don't go well. 
"Princess, it is your ring they say I stole; can you explain how I got it?"
The princess doesn't say a word. Sulti slowly repeats the question again. As the courtroom quiets down the princess looks away and speaks:
"It- it- it was stolen." 
The princess is lying, it's so clear. But why? What's happening here? The kobold looks like she is about to drop dead. Sulti speaks again with fear in her voice: "Princess, I don't think it was stolen, I think you know why I have it." The Princess avoids the kobold's gaze. There is something wrong here, the kobold really did not steal the ring! That doesn’t seem important to Valton however, he still just wants to keep to his plans and speaks up. "This kobold is clearly trying to make use of the lies propagated about the late queen! This is an insult." He turns to the king who seems even more displeased from how he was before the proceedings.

How, how could she say that. You stare directly at her eyes and she simply closes hers. Not only a fucking bitch who doesn't help the person who saved her and she is the one who put you in this situation and she is a coward! You try to hold back your tears, Valton would want you to cry and make yourself look weak. What is this about the old queen?  Shouts rage across the room at the princess's response, you think some don’t believe her but the vast majority seems firmly against you. You hold your hips as to not collapse here and now. You wish you could jump over to the throne and smash the princess's face in or drag her to the kobold district, to the inn, back to the gang of kobolds. Valton, wipes the sweat off his brow and sits back on his chair. You can’t help it anymore and cover your face, your eyes must be bloodshot red. The king rises in his place and turns his back to you, looking towards his council and the top courtiers. "As we have heard- as we have heard and uhhh- As we have heard the facts, how do you advise me my humble and knowledgeable subject on this case!" Quickly the courtiers scurry off to a small chamber and return as quickly as they entered, you are fairly certain that at best only two people spoke in the whole group. Valton steps forward; without even looking at you he makes his proclamation: We, advise the king to dispose of this useless thief and make an example of it to its kind. There are voices around you, stares, actions even. You can’t process them. How could you have been so stupid? Your best was worse than their worst. You could have retried defending yourself a thousand times over and still would have lost. In a daze you hear the harsh words of the king " I sentence you to death by hanging!". Valton adds: "All these kobolds, they are the same!"
Now you only want to leave, this is more than what you should have ever accomplished anyway. You imagine a scribe decade from now, writing the histories of the kingdom and making a foot note of your trial: "Sulti Kristiania, accused of theft of royal jewellery. She reportedly made a worthy defence but was found guilty by the king, hanged by the neck until dead." Your knight sees that you are in no shape to walk and grab you harshly by the shoulders, dragging you away. The court quiets down as you are pulled, perhaps a few are actually feeling sorry for you. No matter, what's done is done. Halfway through the hall you remember ‘Antoni, you look towards him with shame. He tried so hard to make you happy and here we are. But when you look at him you don’t see the crying old man you thought you would find. But instead he is franticly waving around a long robe with another younger man trying to make him sit back down on his seat again. When he sees that you are looking at him he stops waving the robe and sits back down next the other person. What was he doing? He has a plan? You regain your strength. Old Antoni is the cleverest person you have ever known, cleverer than Valton or the wisest dwarven mage! If he still has hope for something then so do you! You put your feet back down and the knight stops dragging you. 
You walk across the courtyard with all confidence you can muster but then hear something: on the very edges of the open yard a crowd is gathered. They are shouting and the guards are trying to make them go away. For a moment you imagine kobolds coming to save you but clearly these are human. They are shouting slurs about you "Best kobold is dead kobold!" "Stick em' up, ass first!" "Only good on a plate!" after the last one a few objects are thrown at you. You look at one of them and are horrified, it's an arm, a kobold arm. Worse, it's been burnt. You start gagging. The knight sees you and hurriedly drags you to the tower. Once you reach the door he turns to you and kneels. "Sulti, it’s tough but listen to me. Do not talk to anyone, it's for your own good. I have had many friends die for much less than… this. Just rest and accept your fate, don’t trouble yourself with what's outside. Think about the happy days now." Happy days? Unlike him you haven’t had the chance to spend nights drinking and whoring with your comrades. Regardless, you give a half-hearted nod and go inside. 
The perverted guard is waiting for you. He doesn’t even bother tying your hands but simply drags you to the top floor. You walk to the second floor calmy but then smell something, meat. You slowly turn towards the cell and instantly start choking. They are eating kobolds: heads, tails, feet and hands. You turn your head back and rush up the stairs, trying to block the smell with your nostrils but the air only raises above. You run pass the guard and throw yourself into the jail cell, huddling in a corner. He comes panting behind you. He is clearly angry that you made him run but you can also see remorse in his eyes for once. " The city was on edge the other night, grain transport had been ambushed, harvest ruined, we would have stared starving in a month or two. Then comes in the army. Three carts filled with dead kobolds, says they heard the problems and decided to finish off an annoying kobold tribe north. And well... food is food. I- I uhhh- I’ll ask my buddies, see if they can bury or burn you instead if that makes you feel better.” You cover your eyes and ears, dropping to the floor. The nameless kobold was from the southern tribe, wiped out. This new batch was from the northern tribe, wiped out. The slave kobolds were from the two other cities, wiped out; the sick exile's city, no more kobolds there ... That only ... You are dead tired after all that has been. You close your eyes.

…unthreaded fury with
boundless fire consumes
Under moon and star
The sinful…

You wake up to shouting and screams, faint ones. The perverted guard is also looking out of a window, you try to look behind him but can’t see much. He notices you staring behind him and comes to your jail cell. "Something is happening out there, they told us not to leave the posts so your head's gonna still roll in the mornin'. You feel drained again but remember Antoni, if he had a way to break you out he would have done so by now but seeing as he is not here you must be expected to leave by yourself. There is fire and smoke coming from the city but you can only see a blurry mess with your bad eye. It’s not the time to worry about that. With as clear a head as you’ve had in a while you take a deep breath, lay yourself on the ground then whistle to the guard.

He looks at you curiously, you then expose some scale under the pants. He is taken back at first but quickly opens the cell gate and rushes in "Heh, want a last one before the end? Can’t blame you slut." You try to play it hard to get but the idiot doesn't understand the concept. He puts his hand into your pants and wipes his filthy finger down your cunt "oooh a virgin too, tight cunt" Has he never spoken to a woman before? Before he can discover how the opposite sex's body works you start dragging yourself towards the wall where the knife is hidden. The blinded guard fallows you. Once you reach the wall you cross your legs and instead stare into the guard's eyes and open your mouth. He laughs and pulls down his pants. But it's too thick for your plan so you instead start rubbing your face against his disgusting balls instead. You keep checking how he is doing as he gets impatient and then once he is fully distracted you bite with all the force you can muster and the guard screams in agony. It takes a tremendous amount of jaw force, you close your eyes and try to ignore everything, just biting and pulling back. You fall backwards then spit out the flesh in your mouth. You shout a war cry as the man wails in agony and pulls out a sword. But you quickly stab him right in the neck with a single strike. Once his blood splatters over your face does the gravity of the situation set in. You stare at him wailing and rolling on the floor as the pool of blood under him gets larger. As the body’s wailing dies down to a whimper you hear someone start loudly going up the tower and shouting: "What the fuck is going on over there?" There is no way in hell you are fighting a fully armed and armoured guard. You look around for anything that can help: window? too tall. Sword? It's too big for you. Hide? Nowhere to hide. Then your eyes see the door you never saw behind. The elf is in her cell too, but she is clearly fully out of her mind and is simply staring at the guard's body in horror. You rush back to the body yourself and grab the keys hanging on him. You try each one as the guard's footsteps get louder. finally, a key manages to fit and you unlock the door. As soon as the door is unhinged it bursts open, throwing you to floor. You are knocked out for a moment.
Once you regain conciseness you see a huge man fighting the guard who is barely keeping his position with hard sword strikes. You observe the situation and conclude that the man, despite his size, will not survive the fight on his own so you grab a stool and throw it with all your might at the guard. The force of the blow doesn’t do a dent in his armour, but it does knock him off his feet which gives the man the opportunity to deal a killing blow by punching his face in. Both of you immediately sit down to catch your breaths. Only then do you realize you killed one person and helped another get killed. The exertion combined with all the death and the smell of meat is too much. You gag and puke all over the floor what little food you had since then. You’d think finally letting it all out would make you feel better but instead you just feel worse and puke again. The man sees you and quickly grabs a cup from his cell and gives you water which you drink gladfully while trying to avoid the mess you made under you. After drinking you go over to the cell with the elf who is staring at you like a hungry dog and scramble to find the keys. Once you have the right one you put it inside the lock then stop, the huge man impatiently checks the stairs. You pull the key out and let it drop on the floor, the elf screams incoherently as you make your way downstairs.
Before you can even utter a thanks for saving you the man grabs you and starts carrying you down the stairs. You try to protest but the giant won’t listen so you try to rest knowing you’re in strong hands. People from other cells jeer at you or beg to be released but the man simply rushes past them and goes outside the unguarded doors. Once outside you are overwhelmed by the smell of ash and soot, the city is alight with fire and the screams are even louder. There is some good news however, Old Antoni is here! You see him looking at you and your blood-soaked companion in horror, dressed in the long robes you had seen before. The man shows his teeth and growls, sending Antoni into a defensive position but you touch his face and he stops growling. You hop off the man and rush to hug Antoni, feeling his warmth over you feels better than anything ever. After the quick reunification he stares back at giant and the giant at him. Then the man makes eye contact with you and you hear his strong voice for the first and likely last time. "You are strong, this warrior acknowledges you" With that he runs off into the darkness. You try to hug Antoni again, but he grabs your head instead and looks straight in the eyes. “How did you escape Sulti?” You show your teeth and tell him that you made sure someone will never pee again! He stares at you confused then shakes his head to clear his thoughts while you cringe and quickly hit your head in sudden disgust of yourself. "Sulti, get under the robe, I’d tell you to not look outside but I know you will so please prepare for the worst and if you are going to puke do it now or do it quietly later. You gulp and scamper under his long robes, Antoni is more than tall enough to hide you under himself. He moves slowly at a consistent pace so after a while you easily learn to keep up with him. 

Under the robes you can hear well but can only see a little bit from the robe's slit. Antoni walks over carefully to the gates and the heavy footsteps of a guard with his clanking armour can be heard. You hold your breath, Antoni keeps his cool. "Well, did it work? No? Told you so. Don’t worry, you can say goodbye at the gallows tomorrow?" Antoni responds coldly: “Of one has to die they should do so at home, surrounded by those thy care about” the guard doesn’t respond but simply raises the gates, letting you pass. Few meters at a time you make your way across the city as the screams get louder and the smell of fire gives way to that of meat, the same meat. As you cross the streets humans are singing and you see glimpses of blood-soaked cobblestone under you. After a while you catch the sight of a decapitated kobold right past you which sends you into a shock. You tightly hold Antoni's leg who stops and then drags you a little to the left. Once out of sight he pulls you out of his robes. You try to look at the road seeing what looks like another corpse, but Antoni turns your head towards his. "Sulti, please, please hold it together. Once we are out of here it's all going to be okay." You nod and he pats your head. 
The once familiar streets are now feel like parodies of themselves; what was once a bakery is now filled with crates of freshly cut gibs ready to be baked into pies. People, some of whom you recognize, run to their homes with sacks and baskets filled with trinkets taken from the slums. The few alive kobolds you see are being dragged towards the temple square.
You come to a sudden halt when Antoni is stopped by what sounds like a guard. “You can’t go through the underpass, sir. The kobolds trapped the whole place.” Antoni impatiently taps his foot. “I’ll be fine, I need to get to the gates now” The guard sighs “You might be able to get past the traps and the resisting kobolds but that’s not the problem. We’re going to set the place on fire rather than deal with this, we’ve prepared buckets to contain the fire.” Antoni almost kicks you out of the robes in surprise “Fire! Are you mad? Setting half the city ablaze just for… just for some vermin?” You consider pinching Antoni but don’t. The guard gently pushes the two of you back “We’ll be the judge of that sir, now please move along.” Antoni scoffs and moves towards the lively temple square.
The two of you keep crossing the streets but it's impossible to make out the way. You try to not look outside but still can’t help but see more: A cart gilled with corpses being dragged from house to house, a fire roasting three kin at a time, children playing with a stripped-down bone, people watching a tailor set up outside his shop doing something with a pile of skins next to him... you shut off your mind and try to hum a melody to yourself. You pass by what you assume was once the entrance to the kobold slums, the place is a graveyard now. Mutilated corpses hang from every place that can support it. A tree is lying knocked down with tens of kobolds scattered around it. A familiar voice is heard among the dead kobolds: It's the fat human. You open the robes a little more and see the fat man lying on a pile of hay with a healer next to him. He is badly burnt and crying in pain. You are surprised that he of all people managed to make it out of the slum's ruins.
But then you hear something else, kobolds not getting killed! You open the robes a little bit more to see their last stand but reality is not what you expect. The kobolds are not fighting, they are standing with some guards. You look closely and notice that they are all badly battered, most have collars around them. They will probably be the ones forced to clean up this mess tomorrow and then... You can’t take it anymore and hide behind the robes once more. But the sounds are there, the singing and shouting get stronger as the screams die down. Occasionally you hear a human shout, a kobold scream and then cheering. Soon the only kobolds you hear are the ones dying in agony under your feet. You hear a group of kobolds crying when passing the red-light district, they don’t seem to be in mortal pain so you expect to see more slaves but instead it’s a group getting raped, at least a dozen kobolds lined up against walls... You see one collapse next some humans, they kick him in the stomach but he just folds his arms, so they run a spear down his throat. You almost want to rush out and get killed with the rest of your kin but you wouldn't want to let down Antoni after all this. Even with the sounds and images filtered out you can’t stop the smell. You at least feel better because your body is refusing normalise smelling the burning flesh.
You soon start hearing sounds of water, along the agonizing screams and begging of a single kobold, you must be near a canal crossing. Suddenly Antoni stops, someone is walking towards you. Antoni shouts, presumably for you: "What is it guard? I am trying to leave this place." He kicks you and you quickly get out of his robes from the other side. Most people around are distracted by the sight of the screaming kobold. You see her hanging by the feet from a lamp post, a man is slowly carving her up while feeding her potions. A few people are shouting numbers. For the sake of not getting distracted you force yourself to look away. You quickly enter one of the houses and climb to an abandoned floor of the house. From the window you see the guard trying to look under Antoni 's robes. He protests but finally lets the guard check, after nothing is found he scolds him for his insolence. You sigh in relief as Antoni crosses the road and hides in a corner on the other side.
Now you have to get back to him. You climb up a roof and look around. The main streets are still alive but they've gone from killing to celebrating. Kobolds are being carted off to the city gates as the violent mob dances around a great fire in the market. You jump from roof to roof, getting ever closer to the canal. Finally you reach a spot to dive into the water, there is an unprotected ladder leading from the water to the other side. You look at the waters with anxiety, what was once the brownish water of the canal now has a red hue. You hold your breath and jump into the waters. 
Turns out the canal isn't as deep as you remembered and you wince in pain as your left leg hits the bottom. You have no time to think about that now. You fight against the waters and peddle with one foot to the ladder; you strip from your clothing to stop the weight. You start climbing. Your hurt foot slips, you feel the water on your back but manage to just hold on. You climb back up and reach for the ground. 
A hand grabs you by the horns and pulls you up. Before you know it you are lying on the ground and someone kicks you in the stomach. You shiver and try to protect yourself with your arms, but they keep kicking. You immediately start crying and shout for Antoni but no one comes. Once the kicking stops, you look up. It takes you a moment to recognize him but it's the butcher! The one you stole the liver from. "You disgusting animal! You... aren't you the fucking thief?" He laughs "Now it's my turn you shit." He kicks one more time, hitting the leg you hurt while falling. You scream loudly in agony; in the distance a cheer goes off. "Oh, they think you are dead but let me tell you; I won’t kill you so quickly. There is no fun in simply letting you wallow in pain and then lose yourself either. Those dumbasses on the other side of the canal think they are hurting the shit they hung but it stopped caring long ago." You try to throw some dirt on him but he kicks you in the face this time. "You are dead."
He pulls a butcher's knife and leans on you. "I will first beat you a little more, cut off a few fingers maybe as well. You’ll beg me to stop at first, but I won’t. Then I'll start shopping off limbs, not too violently, I’ll even stop the bleeding after each cut! After I cut off your last leg you'll stop begging to be let go. Then I'll start making cuts along the breast, I know exactly where to cut without making you lose too much blood. Then I'll start chopping off more bits and show them to you. I'll know the moment, the moment when you realize t's all over. The moment you realize you'll never see anyone or anything you have ever loved again and that you will never have a dignified end. You'll beg again, but for me to kill you this time. The light in your eyes won’t go away, I’ll keep you aware and you'll hurt yourself more. Then Ill-"
Something hits the back of his head. The butcher goes down without a word, you start breathing again and look up to see Antoni along with two other kobolds. It's Reynard and his guard! Reynard tries to give you a hand but in response you tell him to put his hand over your mouth. Without question he obliges and to Antoni's horror you push your foot back into its place. You can never get used to the pain, at least no one heard you scream. Now Reynard pulls you up and ask what is happening.
"It’s- I don’t know pup, the army brought in a butt-ton of dead kobolds the other day. Everyone was on edge because of the failed harvest, we thought they would calm down but looks like an attitude of "we ate a thousand of them, what's a few thousand more going to do?" took over. Before we knew what was happening a mob stormed the slum, they say the king's men started this whole thing." You ask him what's going to happen now. "I am trying to save a few more kobolds before sunrise, we then leave the city however we can."
You look back at the butcher lying in a pool of his own blood, you can see his brain. Reynard's guard notices and comes over to you: “they are over themselves, okay? I’ve done worse in my time. Don’t think about them for now, how they act in the fallowing days will be more telling." That was surprisingly touching coming from a cutthroat. His boss pulls his shoulder and turns to you: " Trust Reynard pup and remember, the book may be gone but your debt remains." You think it's not the time to talk about that but don't complain. "Now, you already have an escort here so go fallow him. We forest folk are strong, I believe in you. If you make it out go north, I had somewhere made for… for contingency’s sake" You don’t know how to feel about the way the kobold has treated you so far but that can be thought about later if you survive. You thank them and get back under Antoni 's robes. Soon he is back on track. 
After going through that hell the chaotic sounds start dying down. Now all you hear is humans speaking quietly and corpses being throw around. Suddenly Antoni grabs you and before you know it he throws you to the ground. You are in front of the city gates, freedom is close. Antoni looks at you and drops a piece of wet cloth on you. He first makes a “shush” gesture at you, then closes his eyes and sticks out his tongue as if dead, then he looks around and sticks a piece of his clothing in his mouth. You think you get what he is trying to say and play dead. Antoni manages to grab you despite his age and slumps you over his shoulder. You can’t see anything with your eyes closed but hear him talk to someone: "We are all done here, I can take the food back to the hamlet." A man responds: "Okay Master Antoni, make sure to fallow the proper procedure while distributing the food, also Master Valton sends his regards, now let me help you load that on. 
You are suddenly grabbed by the man and thrown on something soft. You touch around to understand where you are but freeze as you realize: there is flesh under you, tens of dead and, if you aren't imaging the faint sobs and winces of pain, dying kobolds. You scream. Antoni and the man stop talking. You hear the man climb over and you close your eyes, did you fuck up? You wait in terror for a moment but then the man speaks: "Well, that was their last breath in all likely hood" Antoni interjects: "Must have been, this is why we have the dust, no?" Dust? You wait for the man to take his weight off the cart and then quickly stuff the cloth up your muzzle, covering mouth and nose. It is covered in bodily fluids but that is the least of your concerns here. The cart suddenly starts moving and you feel the weight of the bodies under you move, an arm almost pushes the cloth out of your muzzle but you hold tight. finally the cart comes to stop, you open your eyes a little but manage to close them just a few moments before a cloud of dust falls on your body. You cover your face as best as possible but in only a few short moments the rest of your body starts feeling a stinging pain. You concentrate on keeping your mouth covered but wish you could cover your ears instead. A few kobolds in your cart start crying and you hear some give out their last breaths right under you. You hear one kobold scream just as strongly as you had and then a small weight is lifted off the cart. The kobold keeps screaming, an arrow whistles in the air, the kobold stops screaming. 
The cart is on the move again, you are likely the only one still alive. Soon the noise of the city quiets down and you open your eyes. The sound of the forest and Antoni coughing is all you hear. There are still lights in the sky, the stars and moon are the brightest now, lighting the black tower that has been silent for days now. You sit on the pile of corpses, trying to avoid their empty eyes staring at you. You instead preoccupy yourself with trying to not get the rising dust into your eyes and mouth. After a while the cart stops near the sound of water, you lie down again to hide but hear Antoni : "Sulti, open your eyes. Please don’t cry, the salt will react with the dust. Just crawl to my voice." You comply, trying not to step on anyone's face or private bits, you reach the edge of the cart and hop off. On the ground Antoni is waiting with another younger man. They both look at you, the younger man seems mortified, Antoni just looks sad and tired. Covered in wounds, blood, dust and half dead from having lost everything but your life you must look like a dead kobold walking. Antoni comes over and holds your hand with piece of cloth. The three of you walk down to the base of a river. You prepare to vade in to wash but Antoni stops you. he rummages through a sack, finally he hands you a blue liquid, you drink it and instantly feel dizzy but all your previous wounds and turning insides also stop hurting, he must have had a pain stopper of sorts. You give him back the vial and wade into the cold water. It's a good thing that he had given you the pain killer because your entire body is numb. If you could still feel pain you would have fallen unconscious. 
After washing off the dust the numbness subsides a little bit as your body is no longer absorbing it but the pain starts returning when you leave the water. The mysterious young man covers your body with a towel and helps you walk back to the cart. He helps you get up to the front and the three of you sit together as the cart starts being pulled by their horse. There is an awkward silence. After a few minutes or so the ringing in your ear stops and you are left looking into the empty abyss. Antoni finally speaks: "Sulti- I-" before he can finish you hug him as strong as you can and start crying uncontrollably on his thigh. He doesn’t say a word but simply starts petting your head and hugging you tighter. You cry without stopping next to him until your nose is fully blocked and you can’t open your eyes anymore. 

… of my life
I find myself in a forest of light
With the path known…

Your yawn loudly as you wake up. You look around franticly, all the windows are tightly shut so you can't even tell what time it is but then realize that you are in Antoni's house. You remember falling asleep next to him and some of your anxiety washes away. But then a figure emerges from Antoni's bedroom, you instinctively try to stand up and prepare for a fight or a flight but the best you can muster is letting your arm flop off the bed and groan in pain. Under a heavy blanket you can't tell what your condition is but you are clearly not doing well. The figure steps forward, revealing himself to be the young man Antoni was with. He leans in towards you and puts his hand over yours, only then realizing that you are awake:
"Oh, Sulti was it? Yes, you must be very confused, or depending on how well I have been educated basically unconscious, can you help me with that hypostasis? Ask me something please."
You stare blankly at him for a moment and then ask for water but only a few desperate whispers come out. Luckily the man understands what you said and brings a small cup from which you gladfully drink. Only when the water goes down do you realize how dry your throat is. You want more water but first you ask your helper who he is.
"Me? Well, I thought Antoni would have told you long ago who I was, or maybe he did but you are not capable of remembering things older than three weeks? Unlikely I guess." The young man pulls up a chair next to your bed.
 "I am Antoni's son; well, he has many sons but I think I'm the only one he intended to make and believe me what a mistake that was! Mother is ashamed, father-in-law wants to kill Antoni and Antoni is almost executed. Antoni flees with little Pechorin in hand and promises in his own words: “I will dedicate the rest of my life to rising the best son I can!” Roughly 16 years later that turns out to be a lie because I curse his name and leave the house to find my own fortunes. Are you fallowing?
You nod, Antoni never talked about a son, you actually feel a little jealous now. 
"So, I wonder the lands. Work, learn, save lives, end a few... finally a letter, then more. Dear father wants to make amends, writes that he has learned to be better and is no longer a literal whore" Whore? Looks like you have taken something from your surrogate father. "He also writes about his adopted daughter in great detail... except he never mentions that you are a kobold. In any case; in his final weeks he decides to come home to make amends and guess what, the old man changes his mind in the last moment and asks his son for help in a prison break…" He stares into the bedroom. "He never changed a bit, but at least got fun. Now, enough about me, let’s talk about you" You prepare to open your mouth but he hushes you and instead grabs a piece of paper lying next to you. "I have studied medicine well in these last few years, but even the best needs practice. So ... little sister..." There is clear sarcasm in his voice, but you can still feel some affection. "I have made my diagnosis, let me read to you: Patient No.2, Sulti Bint ‘Ntoni. The patient is suffering from various lower body bruises, at least 6 separate cuts and various other minor cuts and scrapes, two cuts appear to be infected but the patient could also be suffering from a cold or maybe both. The skin- sorry, scales are brittle and swollen in places due to poisonous dust. The patient has suffered heavy trauma internally as well but there appears to be no immediate concern, the patient is also pregnant..." Your open your eyes widely and try to lower the blanket but Pechorin stops you."... however, the heavy damage suffered combined with the supposed nature of kobold pregnancies indicates that the process will end in a miscarriage..." You slump back to the bed, you can’t decide whether to feel relaxed or devastated, you simply close your eyes instead "... doctors note: My information on kobold health comes from Caring for Livestock Vol.2, a book which has also suggested that kobolds are incapable of reading or forming relationships with non-kobolds so my knowledge may be wrong. In any case I have administered mold extract on the infection, administered the noted tea and juice orally, the internal injuries and dust damage should heal over time, more rest, sunlight and hydration is advised until further changes are observed." 
The doctor turns back to you and smiles at his accomplishment on the paper. You didn't understand half of what he said but it seems like you have been literally and figuratively fucked hard. You now open your eyes back again and ask for Antoni, the son's smile drops and he turns back to the bedroom. "It will be painful going in there, not just because your skin is like paper from the dust." You look at the bedroom door then back at Pechorin and nod. He reaches with his arms and grabs your body; it really does hurt as much he said it would but you clench your teeth and carry on. Pechorin kicks open the door lightly and you see Antoni lying on a bed, heavily breathing, he looks even worse than you. His son lays him next to you and Antoni manages to open his eyes for a moment, he smiles when he sees you and then closes them again. You look back at Pechorin " I don’t think he will see sunrise, sorry." You want to cry again but a sharp pain all over your back stops you. You jolt back up and manage to sit upright next to Antoni. You look back at Pechorin, he seems to be deep in thought, only then you realize that it's his father that's dying too, and that father seems to love a random kobold more than his actual son. 
You gather all your strength and pull yourself from the bed, holding unto the side of the bed. Pechorin sees what you are doing and grabs your arm. You two walk together back into the kitchen, you manage to climb on top of the counter with great difficulty and he sits on Antoni's chair. You both contemplate the situation quietly for a moment. This must be as weird for him as it is for you. Pechorin finally breaks the silence. 
"Look, Sulti, you weren’t what I expected to see when Antoni wrote about his “little hero” but we make do with what we got. From what I could gather the guard thinks you died in the riots while escaping, that works for us, but it gets better." He uncovers a box from under a bunch of paper. "Antoni somehow knew something was going to happen to the kobolds, friend to the advisor and all," You ask him what was that controversy Valton mentioned in the trial. Pechorin shrugs "Not sure, the only thing we know is that somehow the queen slept with a kobold. How, why, when, what with whom? No idea, but in any case the royalty doesn’t look too kindly to kobolds having any relations with them now; not that most people did anyway. I personally don’t understand the deal you people- I mean the humans- have with kobolds, we don’t have kobolds in the colonies so this is all quite strange to me you see…" What a story, you curse that kobold who started the controversy. " Since Antoni knew that kobolds would be hunted down he must have procured these potions for you." He puts three vials of different colours on the counter. "These potions are some special stuff Antoni cooked up before being bedridden. They are injected to be consumed; you are basically stabbed with poison arrows. They appear to be combinations of various diseases and appearance changing elixirs. I have seen each of these be used individually but never together. They hurt like hell, but once they take hold you should essentially look like a goblin-kobold halfling, far from pretty but better than being disfigured and much better than being a kobold. Once the transformation is done we can further give you some other stuff that insecure lords use, as Antoni has a few in stock. Once all is said and done I will be able to pass you off as my definitely male, castrated, halfling slave. Don’t worry, once this whole thing blows over you can leave but I doubt you can find a home better than this. So, tell me do you want this."
You think for a moment, weight the options, it’s all a little much... but then a nasty look appears on your face. Valton had done this, promise you everything then take it away. You look back at Pechorin and with the deepest voice you can make ask what the catch is. He giggles.
"Clever girl, I would have asked that too in your position. It isn't my style to give deals so good as this, but I think I should be making my heart talk here. I never had much in the ways of family, never wanted one either. You grow the distrust people after I all I have seen; you are in the same boat, no? So, I thought what's worth more than someone who you know isn't going to stab you in the back the first chance they get? As I said, I will pass you off as my slave but you can do whatever you want, we'll get used to each other"
You try to think but there is just too much to consider, something else pops into your head instead. You pretend to not be able to breath and ask for some air. Pechorin agrees and opens a window, both of you look at the stars outside together. You look towards the sky, the black figure of the unlit tower is barely visible under the stars. Remember the consolations? The wise woman you met once had shown a few to you, they often clashed with the ones Antoni showed but you could still make them out. The pot, The sword, the thief... You look back at Pechorin, he is staring at you too. You feel awful, knowing how much this is hurting both of you but you can’t stay. There must be others out there, you came to this world a kobold and you will leave as such. It all sounds really stupid in your head, it probably is but you can’t change who you are, you won’t do that no matter how much it makes sense to. Sensibility is for alchemists and advisors, not you. You turn your head to speak but for once decide to think before you open your mouth. ‘you came to this world a kobold and you will leave as such’… that sounds like the most awful excuse but it’s the truth.
You turn back to Pechorin and tell him you want to have some fresh air outside. He stares deeply into your eyes. You hop off the counter, hurting your legs in the process but still managing to shamble along to him. You hug him, his legs to be exact as he is too tall. He simply sits on his seat for a moment but finally relents and crouches, you both hug for a moment then he lets go. "Okay then, fine. Go over to Antoni's room and find something that fits you. With this cold even a kobold will freeze." He grabs a potion from Antoni 's locked chest and unclogs it. Crouching, he feeds you the potion and it instantly makes you feel stronger. He must have given you one of those potions Antoni imports for the king. Not only do you feel less sick you even feel every part of you become stronger "This must have been sitting there for years. I think you are the first kobold to have ever drunk one. You’ll feel like a god for a few days, then come crashing down. Make sure to find somewhere to hide before that happens. In any case go to Antoni 's room now and dress." You enter to find death hanging over Antoni, he isn’t even moving anymore. You come closer and look him in the eyes, then hold his hands. He first retracts them but then smiles and you hold tighter. "Sulti, have you taken the potions, the ones I made?" Your heart skips a beat. You consider lying but then a weak "no" comes out of your mouth. Antoni's smile disappears but he holds your hand tighter and whispers: "You know what's best for you Sulti, you are all grown up now. Let your old Antoni rest now will you?" He starts turning his back to you but you stop him and come closer to his ear instead. "Antoni, I won’t thank you. I have done that a thousand times before... I just want... I just want you to know that you raised the best son a man can hope for." His face is expressionless, then he abruptly kisses you in the cheek. You kiss his forehead in return. The old alchemist seems content and you see his eyes close.
You go to his dressing cabinet and look around. It feels extremely inappropriate but a pair of thick, long underwear makes for great kobold pants and you fashion a long shirt from what to him is a short summer dressing shirt. Finally, a pair of socks tightened with string makes mittens and a regular shirt becomes robes. Your mismatching outfit is too tight in some places and too baggy in others but you can run without issue and not freeze to death. It's hard to come across clothes made for kobolds anyway and you doubt you'll ever find that sweater you lost last winter. You prepare to leave the room but then look at Antoni, you try not to be sentimental with objects but can’t help yourself this time. You cut a piece of his hair, tie it to create a small but fancy tube of fabric. You then grab some string to make the tube sturdier and finally hang it on the top of your horn, it falls to the side of your head. You saw some older female kobolds tie stuff to the top of their heads like this and this doesn't seem too insulting to Antoni.
You leave the room and Pechorin gawks at your outfit and weird head thing but makes no comment. You tell him that Antoni told you to tell Pechorin that he should take care of the house well and remember to never stop being who he is. You feel a little bad lying to him but that's basically what Antoni thought, no? Pechorin faintly smiles and pats you on the head but you quickly take a step back. He seems to understand and instead hands you a bag. It has a few potions, some food and a small metal pot but no gold. Pechorin reads your mind and answers: "No one in their right mind would dare trade with any kobold, if you want something either steal it the way you already know or take it with this:" He hands you a stubby sword, perfect for a small kobold. "Remember, you are still sick so take care of yourself." You nod and hop out of the window, looking back at Pechorin. You feel safer not being unconscious next to him anymore. Or maybe you overreacted? Your mind has been shuffled around ever since escaping from the farm. It could be that you were far too paranoid and thought the only person alive on the planet who still likes you was evil but maybe you are finally getting wiser.
In any case as you step into the forest it becomes clear that there are bigger problems out there. You must find your kin; they may mostly be assholes but at least you won’t have to be as afraid. There is a large area including your cabin where kobolds often roam. Anyone who escaped the city has to be there.
The snow is slowly getting thicker on the dirt as you make your way to your cabin. You are still in serious pain, but the fresh air is helping. After the ugly smells of the city the forest air helps a lot. In fact, since you are not confined to a bucket anymore you decide to go relieve yourself like you normally do. Let them keep their clothes and beef! Not having the smell of poop everywhere is superior to all. Just as you are about the let your guard down and think a little about life you notice footprints on the ground, many small fresh prints on the fresh snow. You look over them and compare to your own footprints, it looks kobold but could be wolves or any other forest creature. You take your chances and fallow them. The prints soon go off the beaten path and enter the woods. Just as you start losing hope you see a cave in the distance. You start running towards it but suddenly a roar stops you in your tracks. You pull your knife and rapidly look around you. You would have pissed yourself if you hadn’t done so before. 
Shadows play amongst the trees; you can’t keep track of them all but suddenly a shout calms you down: Freeze! You were already frozen in fear so there isn’t much to do. Two kobolds come out of the woods with stone spears. The one who shouted before, a short dark blue one speaks again: Pull down your pants! You are more puzzled than angry, what is wrong with them? His younger, red companion clearly understands the confusion and hits softly the other one in the head "She is female you dumbass!" then turns to you: "are you escaping from the city?" You say yes and ask what they tried to say. "We have a group here with us, come inside before we freeze to death, I’ll explain there." You feel on edge from the tall one's order but still fallow the kobolds inside.
As you come in the blue kobold makes the sound of a bear and movement appears, he must be good at these sounds. You see 12 maybe 13 kobolds come out of various holes and corners. One quickly moves over to a freshly extinguished fire and lights it again. The mostly scantily clad kobolds gather around the fire and don’t even pay attention to you. They are a diverse bunch. You fallow them and sit together with the two kobolds. The blue one offers you some cooked game and you eat it as fast as you can. After the city food it feels good to have some forest in you again.
Seeing that you are no longer shaking, the red kobold talks: "Better now? Sorry for what that dumbass said, I’m Keneith and this bastard is Cuball." You turn to introduce yourself but then recognize them, they were the two kobolds working inside the castle! You loudly exclaim that you saw them with the army which prompts all the other kobolds turn towards the three of you before you correct that you saw them before the attack. Content with not being lynched, the blue one points at you and laughs: “I remember you: the starving thief! You look like a whole different person now.” You nod and thank him for what he did. In response he laughs once more and oh so humbly averts his eyes with a smile. “It was nothing! I help folk all the time. Now, your name?” You silently tell your name, hoping they didn’t hear about who you are. 
"Sulti, the one on trial? The one kobold who should have been killed is the one alive, no?" He laughs but you stare daggers at him. "Sorry, I just wanted break the tension. We were outside the city when the looting began, what went on there?" You look at him dumbfounded. Looting? it's a massacre there! The kobold sighs and turns his back on the fire glinting against his scales "I should have known, that's what he said too" he points to a dead kobold left in the snow outside. You jump back, not having noticed it before. "The fucker, you see him? Castrated, he told us they gathered all the kobolds and offered them a choice, slavery, or death. He took slavery and was intending to sell us out to the Humans." You shudder at the thought. "Yes and by the way, I suggested we; with full respect carefully grab a knife-" Keneith cuts him off "This idiot suggested we cut his bladder to store water in because all the rainwater is frozen and it would kill us if we drank snow. We saw the pile of kobold corpses outside a town on the way here and decided that we would rather drink rabbit blood before we see another one of us butchered like that." You tell them that you admire their integrity, you doubt they understand what you meant but Keneith thanks you anyways. "By chance we were out of own when it all went down, how did you escape the city?". You don’t want them to know that you'd been working with humans, so you cryptically tell that an angel saved you. They don't object.
You stand up and make your way to the fire with kobolds huddled around it. To their amazement you pull out a small metal pot from your bag and their eyes start glittering. You hand the cup to one of them and watch as they excitedly melt snow. Having noticed you, a scrappy young brown one asks a question: "Sister, have you seen a black kobold like you with a scar running down her cheek on your way here?” You mournfully shake your head. He sits back on the floor and covers his face with his hands. Another one asks whether the slums survived, another gives a scarily accurate description of her father. You think you actually saw someone fitting that description among the dead but keep your mouth shut.
Overwhelmed by the questions, you turn to the kobolds and say that some must have survived the city like you, but they shouldn’t keep their hopes up. Their heads need to be here and now. They seem a little content now, perhaps it’s just the fact that someone seems to be taking charge. Then you see another kobold but your vision on the right is too blurry so it hides before you can catch it. It is behind some rocks now. You approach and try to get a better glimpse of it. He is large...  It’s the bandit. Alone without his friends…
You both stare at each other, the cave feels colder. You look in his eyes and search for any emotion or feeling. Digging through his mind you finally find it: unease. You approach with your hand on tilt of your knife, he grabs a rock from the ground. As you come closer he starts gripping the rock harder and you stop suddenly. Without a word you pull the knife, and the kobold rises to meet you: "We are even now; didn't you hear me? Even!" You raise the knife. He is clearly preparing to strike as soon as possible. You don’t attack however, instead you wave the knife around your crotch and tell him to remain calm, you'll become even first chance you get.
With the long night ahead, you ask Keneith where they sleep, and he points to a ledge slightly out of sight. You then ask both to keep the big red kobold away from you and leave. You don't even ask if you can sleep next to them and simply climb up and leave enough space for both. You want to feel safe next to who you assume to be good people but still can’t help but hold your knife as you drift away.

…scales
In syllables untranslatable
I have marked the name of God
I stole from the…

It is warm. You look around: the fire is dead but with the two kobolds from yesterday sleeping side by side you can keep warm. Normally kobolds sleep next to each other, but you are instead used to the solitude of your cabin but still feel thankful for a night without betrayal and murder. You get up from your spot and find the fire. Two other kobolds are maintaining it. You sit down and start eating the leftovers from yesterday. Rabbit, even when it's cold and chewy it feels better than the regular bread. Meat tastes different when it hunted rather than butchered, it’s like someone filled it with out-of-date spices. The medicine combined with this good meal should help you recover soon. Only after finishing do you see the two kobolds looking down at your belly. It is clear now that you are pregnant, the softshell egg slowly forming under your belly. One speaks: "Bad time for children, no?" the other comments "Well, best time if we don't want to die out." You mournfully respond that you doubt it will survive. Then tell that you'll go out scouting since you are the only one armed and clothed properly. They don’t reply so you enter the cold forest alone.
You move barefoot, making sure to walk on stones and fallen branches to avoid laving marks on the fresh snow but with the sun's warmth most of it has melted, leaving only half frozen mud underneath. You first walk back to your cabin; it doesn't have anyone in it and is useless as a shelter. You consider taking your few memorabilia: The doll Antoni gave you, the broken dagger you killed that huge fox with, the stone with "M" and "K" carved unto it. You wonder if Tomokie survived. She would have been in the red-light district when it went down. Probably dead, you hope she at least went quickly and without seeing what happend. You don't want to imagine what they could have done to a prostitute like her if given the chance. Instead of worrying about that you try to think of the better times. “Boxdog", that's what she'd call you for living huddled up in the forest shack through winter, like dog waiting out the snow in it's box… she'd bring you treats when the roads cleared. You leave everything in its place. Maybe your own child will play with them one day. You look down, still undecided as to how to feel.
This is not the time. You gather yourself and make your way back to the frozen road and walk alongside it. You don't expect to find much but to your surprise something is coming down the road. You hide behind a bush and peek out. It's a horse drawn cart filled with humans. You observe a little more and realize that all of them except the driver is heavily wounded. Even the horse dragging the cart seems exhausted. Upon closer inspection you see that there is also a good amount of broken weaponry and some supplies behind the cart.
This is an opportunity. You quickly sneak out of sight and run as fast as you can back to the cave. Inside all the kobolds are gathered, sitting in silence. You quickly find Keneith and Cuball then hurriedly talk about the cart full of soldiers you saw. They don’t seem to understand. Keneith comments: "Well, then we hide. No?" Cuball overtakes him: “We can make some kobold traps and then- wait no one here knows how to construct them.” You tell them that together you can attack the cart and take their stuff, only one of them seems capable of fighting. The kobolds look at each other but no one wants to make the first move. Keneith finally speaks: "Sulti, I of all people am always looking for a fight but we are weak from the city. We can’t take them on!" You stand up to give your fiery speech, but then realize how scared you also are and start explaining slowly how easy it will be. You appeal to the natural looter that exists deep down in each kobold. It takes some time and negotiation and begging but finally a few kobolds agree to come along as long as you make the first strike. As the kobolds gather their makeshift weapons doubts appear in your mind. How many were there again? Were they really sick? Can you fight even one of them in your current state?
You catch the cart on a bridge. The cart driver is shocked when he sees a single kobold with a knife stand in front of him. You shout "Halt!" and tell him to surrender. The driver doesn't seem too intimidated and shouts to the cart: "Baldwin, Kyward! Come out here if you can still stand, we got one." The cart shakes and one man with shoddy armour steps out with a sword. He is clearly in no shape to fight. As he approaches with weapons drawn you quickly grab a rock from the ground and throw it in his face. It bounces off his leather cap but is still enough to make him fall on his back. You turn back to your comrades hiding in the bushes. Despite having seen the situation for themselves the kobolds refuse to come out of hiding. The driver of the cart shouts and starts climbing down to meet you in combat. Then a kobold comes running from the tree line: It’s Keneith! He masterfully throws his spear at the driver, the spear lodges itself on his arm and the man shouts in pain. The rest of the kobolds come shouting and screaming behind Keneith, they climb aboard and threaten the soldiers with makeshift spears. The driver tries to take off but the horse is confused and can’t decide where to go. In minutes, the battle is won and the single healthy soldier tied up and brought to you.
You ask the driver where he comes from. He looks around a little and weighs his options but then relents: "From the siege, we didn't expect you to fallow us." Siege? He is assuming that you know more than you actually do. So, there is a siege, and kobolds are involved. You demand to know which road they fallowed from the siege. The idiot doesn't realize how you could have fallowed them without knowing which road to take and tells you exactly how to get to this "siege". Having finished the interrogation, you look at the loot collected. Swords, leather and metal armour, food, medicine! It is all in terrible condition but still... 
You then turn to the prisoners, what to do with them. Antoni would tell you to let them go because that’s the right thing to do. Actually, he would probably tell you to put them out of their misery... most of them are more or less dead anyway, and every soldier you kill is one less to fight tomorrow. Undecided, you turn to the kobolds and ask them what they should do with the prisoners. They stop talking among themselves and suddenly the proud band of brothers go quiet. You approach but each one you talk to simply looks down as you get close. Finally, Cuball speaks up. "I- We- we- thought that since they were so awful to us... and we need food so... after all it's only fair that-" Even you are taken back at the proposal. You remember the butcher threatening you... No. You turn to the kobolds: they ate us because they thought we were too simple minded to care, but we do care. It would be hypocritical for us to eat them fully knowing how much they would hate it. They don't seem to fallow the logic or know what hypocrisy means but agree anyway to avoid the question. But you are not stupid, you can't just let them go and cause more trouble for you later. Killing may always be wrong but sometimes not killing is even more wrong. This won't be the last time you I’ll do this so better get used to it. You approach the tied-up soldier. He sees in you what is about to happen and closes his eyes. Easier for you. You drive the sword through his stomach. Well, you try to, but it only goes halfway with your strength. The Soldier cries out in pain and starts wiggling, making it harder to finish him off. Panicked, you pull out the sword and now go for the neck. You miss again and the man spits blood on your legs, you stab again with all the strength you have. This time it’s easier, the steel punching through and tearing bits of flesh until you hit bone. The man is dead within seconds, faster than what most kobolds had. You look at the body, should you feel good that you feel terrible about this or bad that you did it in the first place?
Seeing what you did your comrades execute one by one each soldier. None resist, they are too weak, and no one seems to have qualms about killing humans now. You load the rest of the materials unto the horse. You briefly consider your options about what to do with the looted caravan, finally concluding that it's best to get rid of it. Corpses burn surprisingly hard; Keneith says that it's because the men are too thin. When the sticks you used as tinder don’t burn you have no choice but to use some of your precious oil. Once the pile of bodies in the ditch caches on fire the deed is done. No human will know, for now.
Making sure to fallow frozen ground, you make your way back to find a cheering crowd. Your numbers have grown to at least 30-40 kobolds. The newcomers appear to be dressed in proper self-made clothing and carrying kobold weapons. These are independent mountain kobolds. As the rest watch your band unload the goods an old woman, presumably the new group's de facto leader approaches you. You barely know city kobold traditions, yet alone mountain kobold ones. You awkwardly raise one hand, the old kobold grabs and kisses it. She announces loudly "They say you took down an entire caravan with just a handful of barely armed warriors, three men slain by your hand alone!" You don’t know what to say but can only look around as kobolds watch and your anxiety rises. The old kobold tightens her grip and blinks at you. You can only nod. She turns to the crowd "Humble too, aren't we? I would have lied about taking on 50 men alone back in my day!" the kobolds like that one and surround you. Before you know it the rough claws of the mountain folk grab you and place you on top of a cushion placed inside the cave. They start shouting: "First blood! First blood! We have a new first blood!" You look at the old kobold in horror, she seems to have lost her sweet old lady attitude and is observing the situation with dead seriousness.
As the shouts turn into chanting in an unknown draconic dialect a scarred kobold in makeshift metal armour approaches you. "The ceremony will begin soon, go talk to wise one outside." He is struggling with the cosmopolitan city language so you decide to go the “wise one”, presumably the old kobold, to understand what is happening. You quietly leave the cave as a keg of homebrew drink is opened. You find her huddled next to tree, protected from the cold wind. She pulls out a water skin as you sit down on a fallen tree next to her. She first drinks some herself and hands it to you. The alcoholic beverage helps lighten the load on your itchy throat. "Sulti, no?" You feel exhausted after all that has been and answer with a nod. "Sulti, we are fucked. I never managed to keep track of kobold numbers but it looks nine in ten is dead, probably more." You briefly explain the things you saw in the city. "Yes, I know. It's partially my fault this happened." That catches your attention. "The southern tribe fell years ago; we should have known better. Why would humans suddenly waste so much time, money and men taking out a random tribe? We never questioned it but simply moved into their territory. How foolish we were. Before we could gather the leaders only me and your city’s “boss” was left. We only had enough time to set up a rally point." Rally point? You mention the supposed siege you heard of. The kobold's eyes light up. "You know where it is?" You describe the directions. She is clearly amazed and kisses your hands again. "When I heard that a once outlaw warrior managed to organize a raiding party as soon as she found safety, I understood exactly the sort of person you are; this is why I chose you Sulti, you have to lead the tribe." You pull your hands away violently. Fear and doubt overwhelm you. You suddenly gag and puke on the ground. The kobold holds you in her arms and gropes your swollen belly, touching every bit of it with her hands. She then makes you wash down the puke with the drink. "Pregnant, aren't you? The egg seems deformed but you are strong.” You turn to the rising stars above. She tries to comfort you by saying that there will be other chances. Before she can finish her story about having had more eggs than she can count you hold her arm and quietly explain the circumstances of how the pregnancy came to be, you need to open up to someone. She listens wordlessly.
After finishing you sit there for what feels like an eternity. After thinking a little more the woman finally speaks. "Sulti, please. The kobolds no longer trust me and I'm too weak to lead. Hold for at least another week, maybe more. The tribe needs a head, someone else with strength and cunning will show up soon enough to replace you, if you want that." You take a little offense to that, you meant for her to comfort you do not deride.
As the sun disappears the old kobold grabs your hand and walks you to the cave "Start the ceremony!" The ordeal is as crude as you imagined. As you sit on your stone throne, your rock with a pillow on it, each kobold comes forward and offers you something. It's mostly junk and trinkets, maybe they are worth something to them but not to you. The city kobolds are also pushed into the line but they give you actually good gifts like clothes and food. The mountain kobold gifts get stranger as higher-ranking kobolds come. A few cut themselves in front of you and spill the blood on your clothes... a naked purple one comes and stands in front of you. You recognize him as the one that had been asking about his missing friend! He too seems to recognize you and he- he bows in front of you then goes over to sit next to the rest of the gifts... another one, stronger than the rest dressed in proper armour gives you a small piece of its horn. You blankly look at it but the wise one quickly informs you that he is saying that you own his life. The strong warrior bows to you " Sseth will protect you to death! I have served under many warlords”, colour me impressed, you thank him for the “gift”. He then points to the few children watching the ceremony by the side “I will train them, I am good with warrior children!” You hide your smile best you can and nod in acknowledgment. Sitting on your throne, dressed in actual linen clothes, you start to feel good about yourself.  In a brief pause in the ceremony you lean towards Cuball who happens to be sitting by you and tell him that you intend to name your child “Mae”. He thinks for a moment then asks why; you respond that it seems appropriate. He looks at you in confusion then shrugs “I don’t know what that means but you shouldn’t name your child after how you expect them to be”. Keneith interrupts your conversation “What about Yvone?” Cuball laughs, that’s what you wanted name your niece stupid! You slump back to your throne in contemplation.
Then the red kobold is pushed forward from the line. He rushes over and tries to hand you a simple rusty knife. You move your eyes away from him, but a vicious idea comes to mind. You quietly whisper to the wise one and ask if you can demand something in tribute. She nods and explains, apparently you can whatever ask for whatever want in tribute as long as you can defeat them. You rise from your throne, with heart beating like a drum you stutter but manage to loudly refuse the tribute. The red kobold seems to have expected this, he grabs the rusty knife by its hilt and turns it to you. You feel like he is sitting above you again. You consider going back and accepting the tribute but now everyone is looking straight at you. You cornered yourself. You loudly demand he gives you his manhood, they are the ones deserving punishment. It seems like a few of the kobolds understand the situation and give the red one dirty look. The bandit looks around and then turns to you, "I refuse to pay tribute". Maybe you should have taken the knife.
You grip the ground with your feet, the snowy ground is slippery. You can see the red kobold lit by the lantern placed between you two. The purple kobold who offered himself to you turns to crowd and announces: Kinsmen! We gather here today to honour the blood god, and to let each pay their due." He turns to the combatants: First Blood Sulti has demanded tribute in the form of his manhood from..." you can't believe he chose this as his title "... The Blood-Soaked Bandit! The demand was refused by The Blood-Soaked Bandit and now each has been brought to pay their dues." For the sake of the city folk the old woman explains the rules, yielding is an option if both of you accept. You'll have to leave the tribe or he might just find some other way to kill you but it is an option. Having finished his speech, the kobold calls for a few names and they come to him. Together they start chanting a haunting tune that slowly builds up.
You are all alone, you grip your knife as the cold and the snow envelopes your nude body. No escape. You stop looking at the crowd and stare directly into the enemy's soul. You have blood to lose. Forget everything, no retreat, only one enters that cave alive. You start circling him like wolf to prey, he also starts turning in response. You are both naked so no armour, you at least have a proper knife unlike his rusty dagger.

A sudden move is made, you almost jump away in response but manage to keep your cool...

Stop, he is trying to get you to squirm, stare into the eyes, grip the knife, steel bites sharper than snow, don't mind the cold.

He comes forward again and you attack blindly before taking another step back.

A second, that's all it takes for the stab, you stand for a moment and grip the ground. Your legs aren’t shaking anymore. You feel your heart bursting from your mouth. 

He is too far away so- The glinting knife lights the air, blood on the snow. The bandit takes a step back. You look at your now blood covered knife.

The bandit’s takes a deep breath and holds his wound.

You didn't expect that from yourself, the warrior in you finally spoke and it spoke in violence. An unexpected thrust, but that trick works only once. 

You stop circling, anger brewing inside you both. You have blood to spill and be spilled.

He screams and rushes forward; you barely manage to take a step right but he still manages to slash before you can step away. You manage to swing yourself but a sharp pain stops you from committing to the attack.

You cut his hand and lean back against the tree. You don't want to look at your chest but it feels like that scar will remain until you die. He is trying to cover his bleeding hands but wrath is burning to the core of his brain.

The beating of the drums are in synch with your heartbeats, the bandit comes froward, you expect a thrust with his knife. Instead, he kicks you right in the chest. You are shocked by the attack and crawl backwards on the snow. Something is hurting in your torso

You push as hard as you can and manage to get up just as his kick lands in the snow. You can't brute force this, your own kick couldn't even crack a rib. The chanting fills you with the essence of fear. The bandit doesn’t push the attack, you see reason behind his eyes for a moment as he seems to think about something while looking at you. You take this as an opportunity and silently charge forward.

Your knife swings.
His knife swings.
You take a step back.
He steps forward.
Your knife swings.
His knife swings.
His knife swings.
His knife swings.

You feel dizzy, you don't feel the cold anymore. The only pain is the one in your left hand. How strong is- you look away from the missing fingers and grip harder the knife with the other hand. He wants to finish this. You want him to die.

You shout at the top of your lungs and faint an attack, he goes into a defensive posture. Instead of attacking him directly like he expects, you hit his side with your elbow then push him to the ground. The air is freezing.

He punches the knife out of your hand as he falls but you still manage to jump on him and hold on. He slips under the weight and falls with you on top.

You scream, your voice drowns out the sound of the chanting.

You scratch. 

You scratch. 

You scratch. 
…
His scream deafens you to the chanting and takes you back to reality. You grip your claw in pain, after the trashing it feels like they are about to fall off but his shoulder is destroyed. He punches you, sending a tooth flying off and filling your mouth with blood.

You scream again and spit the blood on him.

You are thrown backwards. He tries to get up but slips over the wet ground You crawl back to him. You try to end him with the knife but he punches it away. You stab his eye with a claw. He punches you in the face.

You scream again and punch him but he barely flinches. He punches your face again but much more weakly. With the knife gone you bite his neck.

You bite.

You bite.

You chew.

You lick.

You feel it in your mouth, kobold tastes like this? You manage to pull your muzzle away from the throat and look at the puddle of blood. You can feel his warmth under you. Whose sweat is whose? Whose blood is whose? Chewy and hard; maybe it's the scales. You wipe the blood off your face; sticky and viscous. Rabbit blood was lighter. He punches you in the face again, even weaker this time.

The chanting goes out of synch

You bite.

You scream.
 
… burning coals
In broken, olden shores
Asking forgotten hopes  
For forlorn…

You don't want to open your eyes. You hug tighter, then rub your face against the scales. "Sulti?" You put your muzzle next to the sound. A hand wipes the blood drooling from your mouth. 

… be the one you have
Care for the one you…

You wake up alone this time. The pile of clothes under you is soft and warm. You look around to see that you are not completely alone; the small room has walls made from curtains, in front of the bed the wise one is tending to a small fire, keeping you warm. The walls are orange under the flame, they have a comforting colour.
 She notices that you are trying to stand up and immediately makes you lie down again. "You were on the brink of death; I don’t think you should be doing anything but resting for now.” With the pain rising you agree and lie back down again. The kobold makes you drink something vile tasting. "The bleeding was bad enough; the sickness would have killed you. Luckily, we found some potions in your satchel. Couldn’t do anything about the hand however, you are two fingers short" You don't know how to feel, you look at your bandaged hand. Only then do you notice the lack of the lump. You sit again and touch your abdomen. The Wise One holds your hand and makes you turn your head towards her. "Your body couldn’t handle the stress, we had to help- help you as it... slid off." You cover your face and slump back down. One less thing to worry about?
"Sulti, look on the bright side: you did it. Now no one here doubts you! We had a few more refugees join and after seeing the kobold's body even they couldn't help but fear you. You losing control of yourself was a little…" Body? You ask to see it. The kobold tries to retract her words, "Well, if- if you want to but I don’t think it’s a very good- " You cut her off and try to stand up. She sighs and grabs one arm. You stagger out of the makeshift room. As you make your way out everyone in the cave drops what they are doing and stares at you. You yell at them to get back to their business as loudly as you can. You have to stop for a moment and breath after the outburst, being in power is not fun. On your way outside you see sleeping Keneith slump next to a dying fire, Cuball is trying to cover him with a blanket. The wise one turns to Keneith "He almost ran at you in the fight. I couldn't stop when he insisted on sleeping next to you while you were resting." You feel giddy inside thinking about that, and glad full he didn't take advantage of you while you were sleeping.
Outside the cave it's still freezing, you start coughing and the old kobold wraps you in her cloak. You struggle through the snow but manage to make it to the body, it’s half sunk in the snow. When you see the corpse, you take a step back, but then remember you did this. The right side of his shoulder is completely destroyed, it looks like a wild animal ravaged it or it exploded. His head is hanging to his body only by bone. You bit off most of the scales and muscle in the neck. The wise one points to the side of his head, where you tore out the scale and muscle, exposing the skull in some places. "Some are calling you the 'She-Wolf' now. On one had no one within biting distance will ever question you now, on the other hand they might start treating you like a threat. I'd say embrace it, you are eloquent and clever enough to show your self-control and having others fear you is important." You look at the ravaged body, then at your abdomen. You turn to the wise woman and tell her to remind you to never get into stupid shit like this. She gives you a side eye “Whether they like to admit it or not, most would have done what you did Sulti”
Once your attention is diverted away from the corpse you notice a little blue kobold sitting next to a bush, watching you. You point her out to wise one who immediately goes over to the little girl and grabs her by the neck. She tells the girl to go back inside and keep doing what she is meant to. The little girl runs off back to the cave. You ask her who that kobold was once the wise one returns. "Oh, just some random orphan, both parents died in a raid. She is just playing around, ignore her." You decide to keep an eye on the little rascal.
Keneith is waiting for you inside the tent and he runs to hug you as soon as you enter. For the first time you feel like someone other than Old Antoni cares for you. He lets go once you are warm again and sits you down as the wise one leaves. "Sulti, why?" You look down, say that bandit had hurt you in the past. "Well, should you be chopping peoples' bits off just because you don't love them anymore?" You look at him in the eyes and tell him that he wasn't your lover, you just wanted take back what he had stolen from you. Keneith thinks for a moment, just as you think he will stand up and leave he relies. His expression changes to one of pity and he hugs you again. You feel something moving inside you again. Your muzzle moves towards his.
He recoils back instantly and seems more than a little disappointed. "Sulti, you shouldn't fall in love with the first person that shows you a slither of kindness." You first try to seem surprised but can’t be bothered to hide your feelings, you move back and look down. "Also, you don't laugh at my jokes!" He kisses you on the cheek and gently pushes you back down to the bed. Even the small walk today left you exhausted.

…

You wake up early today, either they gave you some painkillers or you are getting used to the pain. They were at least helpful enough to leave a cane for you. You grab it and slowly make your way out of your tent-like room. You peek outside and only see a handful of kobolds guarding the cave. You sneak out as quietly as you can and find your pile of tribute. You are amazed by both the stupidity and loyalty of the kobolds. They haven't touched a single thing given to you, including the food which is now slowly rotting. Even funnier, the two who offered themselves as tribute are sleeping next to each other as well. You put on some padded armour and cover yourself. You also manage to find Antoni's hair and put it back on top your head. First blood status: ready to lead. Actually... you'll have to take some soldiers to that siege first thing in the morning so might as well enjoy your time until then. You rummage through the rubbish given to you and find the bottle of alcohol someone had gifted. But while pulling it out you cut yourself on a wooden statuette, right across the old wound on your arm. You shriek in pain and curse the recently healed wound that's now bleeding again. Your shout wakes up the two other sleeping gifts. They try to help you but you firmly tell the savages not to lick the wound. Is this how the other races see the city kobolds as well? 
Once the bleeding stops you turn to Sseth and tell him to prepare a small party for scouting, they will be travelling light. The warrior kisses your hand and goes over to wake up some of his comrades. Then you turn to the still very much naked kobold, Keneith left you frustrated the other night and as first blood you shouldn't remain stressed… but you don’t know this kobold, you push back the thoughts and go over to your consort. The dark purple kobold seems to read your thoughts and as gently as possible he tries to pull you towards himself but lets go when you hiss at him. He manages to remain calm; you show your teeth, he is still only smiling. A little impressed, you ask how experienced he is. "The tribe thinks I am very good at what I do" That’s good because you have no idea how anything about this works. You pull him towards your room, one hand firmly on the knife. As he lies you down and starts rubbing your tired arms you realise he is not lying. This is actually how you expected sex to feel like, expectations coming from awkwardly looking at people while hidden in their closet… He touches everywhere, softly. You can feel the tension rising. Finally, he sits on your thigh and you feel him reach under. But when he touches you an intense pain shoots up your spine and you push him off, just managing to block your mouth before screaming in pain. The shocked kobold looks at himself, trying to understand what's wrong.
Even though you blocked your mouth the scream was loud enough to wake up the Wise one who was apparently sleeping behind a pile of boxes. It only takes a moment for her to realize what you two were doing. She first goes over to your courtesan and whispers something in his ear. He slowly calms down and leaves the room, not before apologizing to you. Then the old kobold turns to you: "It's my fault, I was told mating is taboo for city folk, so I didn't tell it to you." You pull your legs to cover yourself and ask her if this situation is less awkward then telling you what's wrong. She speaks while helping you put your clothes back on. "The birth was... complicated. Normally we just let nature take its course but your egg was far too deformed and you were so small. So, we had to use a knife and as-" You cut her off and ask to skip the details. "Don't mate, for a few weeks at least, in fact don't let anything touch you down there." She reapplies a few bandages and makes you drink some more of that vile medicine then leaves. 
First chance you get you try to touch yourself but it's as bad as she said. Frustrated, you open up the bottle of alcohol and down a little. It tastes horrible, why would anyone drink this? You put the bottle down and consider crying. Then the drink hits. You realize why they drink it. The fire in the room feels warmer. You grab the bottle for another drink but Cuball and Sseth walk in before you can drink it. As soon as he sees the bottle Cuball rushes forward and grabs it, you try to stop him and Sseth instinctively comes forward to help you, Cuball stops you both: "Sulti, I get that you are in all kinds of suffering, but we need you sober." You remember the drunk humans you met on your first day in the city and realize why they don’t drink all the time. Cuball hands the bottle to Sseth, who drinks half of it without flinching. Cuball then let’s go off your hand, hugs you and reluctantly pats your back. You stop trying to reach for the bottle and hug back, realizing that he was trying to stay away from your mouth only as he pulls back.
The two help you stand up and you make your way back to the cave. The purple kobold you had with you is waiting outside, "I will save myself for you until you are better first blood." You tell him he really doesn't need to do that but he simply smiles back at you and leaves. You find your group of armed scouts waiting outside. Despite their acceptable equipment they don’t seem to be very warrior like. One is holding his club the wrong end, another seems to be shaking in fear as if they'll be heading into a massive battle, another is downing a very oily piece of meat that's going to destroy his liver ten minutes into the march. You turn to Keneith and ask who among them is actually a proper fighter. He seems a little embarrassed. "Well, among the city kobolds only I have any experience fighting, Cuball knows a little from me and also from working odd jobs at the city armoury." Sseth turns to you: "Our warriors were decimated when the humans came to our tribe. We lost many strong kobolds. Wise one said we were becoming stronger with each battle. We became better at fighting, but it was for nothing. My brothers and sisters fell one by one only until a few wounded remained. Once the wise one got us here I was the only one left." Small wonder that she said the kobolds don't trust her anymore. You look at your scouts and think. Sseth seems to misunderstand why you are thinking and comments: "Our last war painter also died in battle, his apprentice got crushed by a rock and the apprentice's apprentice died in a blizzard" So that's why they all also look like jesters with their half-assed face paint. Finally, you decide to handle them yourself. You take away the little armour they have and to Sseth’s surprise their weapons too. You ask for their regular occupations and make the one hunter among them the leader. Then you order them to never get into a fight but simply report on what they see in the siege. You then pull the hunter leader to you and discreetly hand him your knife, telling him to threaten anyone who steps out of line and to make sure no one tracks their group back to the cave. To your friend's dismay you also pull Sseth out of the party, you need his expertise here.
With the voice tone of a true leader, you shout at the remaining kobolds and tell anyone who can hold a spear to get in line Infront of the cave. As your three commandants gather them around, you walk alone into your tent. You make sure no one is inside then cover your face with pillow. This is the last thing a first blood should be doing but at least as an adult you get to decide when to cry now. Once the pillow is soaked in tears you grab a piece of obsidian and look at yourself, your eyes are too red. You try to cover it up with water but it's still obvious you cried. You desperately rub your eyes but nothing’s changing. Finally, you give up and grab a knife. You can barely feel your shoulders exposed to the cold anyway so you remove one of the bandages there and cut one almost healed wound, letting the blood spill. You draw two simple lines on your cheeks with it and cover the wound back up. Got to become a savage to train to savages, no?
Outside almost all the kobolds except the really young and the unhealthy are waiting in a line that's straight enough. You start walking along the line the way you saw that militia commander do in the village. After walking across the line twice you come to the three actual soldiers and Wise one as they watch you with curiosity. You quietly ask them how in the world you are supposed to train them. Keneith simply shrugs "I was a lone mercenary, I trained alone and everyone I worked with just knew how to fight." Sseth pats Keneith's back "Yes, warriors are made in battle, the strongest will show themselves!" That plan could have worked if you were an actual tribe with hundreds of clansmen but even a single death would be a loss. You remember how you killed the bandit; he was the one actually leading and training a group of kobolds. Before you start cursing yourself again you turn to the wise one. She looks away, "I know stories and healing, okay? It's the first blood's job to take care of the warriors." You wonder how she ever managed to become "the wise one" and desperately turn to Cuball, he actually seems to have good ideas. "I spent a lot of time in the human armoury, I never got to fight anyone or even see battle, but the training humans spent most of their time walking in circles and hitting sandbags with fake swords." Sseth joins him. "Yes, mock battles were common in my youth, before we were forced to fight humans all the time." You turn back to the to-be-soldiers and order them to gather some strong sticks from the forest.
By the end of the day your entire fighting force is decimated, they weren't much to begin with but now not one of them can even stand up. Your three actual soldiers have had their share of beatings too. At first you had the kobolds fight each other but half-starved brewers, trap makers and stone carvers hitting each other with sticks randomly didn't achieve much. You instead had the three somewhat competent fighters go up against each kobold one-on-one but that made things even worse since none of the kobolds could stand up to neither Keneith nor Sseth. As a final gambit you started having three, then four kobolds go up against one of them at once and that finally led to them understanding team tactics. In the end Wise one is left as the only kobold who can light the fire or tend to the wounded but at least no one died. You take a look at the moaning and groaning recruits and decide that non-combat exercise would be better for tomorrow.
As you are nibbling on some berries outside the cave the scouts return. The freezing creatures immediately head for the fire and start cooking the large rats they hunted. Before he can join them you corner the leader and call over Cuball since he knows about human armies. Once he manages to stagger forward you ask the scout what they saw. He is taken back at first but quickly remembers why you actually sent them out and responds: "We made it to the siege, but we couldn’t talk to the kin inside. Humans were throwing large rocks with wooden golems at a wall. The wall led to a valley, humans could not climb the cliffs around the valley. The humans looked cold, hungry. They were cooking horses and roots."
Cuball comments: "Seems like you have already done serious damage to their cause, that carriage never made it back to them with supplies. “An army would eat it's prisoners before the horses" I heard a captain say once. And while having me load supply carriages he would always tell the driving soldier: "An army marches on its stomach! “.” You ask if your soldiers are even needed now. Cuball thinks for a moment, "Well, they might just leave and come back stronger." Indeed, if you manage to wreck enough of the army before they can come back to the city they might not be strong enough to challenge you for many months to come.
After explaining the plan, you grin devilishly at Cuball, you expect him to do the same, but he stares at your chipped teeth and takes a step back. You remember that you don't look like the little girl you once were. You clear your thoughts of war for a moment and look at the scouts sharing the meat with the wounded recruits, who are in turn rolling in a casket of sweet-water. You grab Cuball by the arm and find a seat next to some kobolds, they become agitated once the first blood sits next to them. You did spend the entire day shouting at them so it's understandable. As a way to normalize the situation you remove Antoni 's hair band from your head; take off your thick cloak, leaving only a loincloth like the rest and clean the faded war paint with spit. You probably look a little normal now. The wise one stops tending to a broken arm and stares at you, she seems a little annoyed at you not acting strong enough, but you stick out your tongue at her. She gasps and accidently drops a splint, making the wounded kobold shout in pain. You turn back to the fire and the singing scouts. Tomorrow you'll have to put back on the "first blood" act and have them throw javelins all day but until then you decide to enjoy the chit chat and the warmed-up drinks. You close your eyes as Cuball tells a story about giants.
Your eyes open wide and you almost slash behind you when someone touches your shoulders. Luckily, the purple kobold who promised himself is there. You close your eyes again and feel a sensation you never felt before on your back. Each cracking bone and rubbed muscle relax you further. You shut your eyes again.

… summer’s sizzle
Losing tears of joy under autumn’s drizzle
Rolling down milky hills in winter’s blizzard
Hearing whispers of…

"First Blood Sulti, can you hear me?" You open your eyes and look around; you are lying next to some kobolds in front of the fire. You stand up immediately and put back on your clothes and your attitude. At least you don't have to cut yourself since there is some blood left from the rats, that little blue kobold is drawing something with the remains but runs off once you see her. You walk over and look at her drawings. They look like kobold runes, quite complex from the looks of it too. You decide to replicate some, but they look nowhere near as good as her drawings. As you try to apply the paint Sseth grabs some blood and reaches out, you let him paint you instead. After he draws something on your cheeks you look at your mirror, those are some fancy runes he drew for an illiterate warrior. You ask him what they mean but he shrugs and says that he saw them on the last First Blood. You stare at the mysterious symbols, what could they mean? You catch the wise one as she is passing by and ask about the symbols Sseth drew. She takes one look at them and turns her eyes away, "These are- these are most interesting symbols. I think you should keep them until we meet some other kobolds". Weird, you decide to clean your face as soon as possible.
Once ready you take a deep breath and loudly order your soldiers to wake up. A few rise, but most look around confused. Cuball who is already awake comes to you and whispers in your ear. "Uhm... Sulti, these are not soldiers. The authoritative tone is nice, but you should explain things better." You nod and this time slowly explain the waking kobolds that the tribe needs to make javelins and train with them today so that you may help your kin trapped by the humans. One kobold shouts back: "Well, why do we need to help them?" You open your mouth to respond but then notice the wise one running towards you. She takes a moment to breath and then leans on your ear: "Sulti, I can't ignore what you did yesterday but for the betterment of the tribe I must warn you: You are losing control." You look at her curiously. "Kobolds are simple-minded, for them leaders are all knowing and if they are questioning you they must be doubting you as a leader." You turn to kobold who asked the question and try take out your knife but the wise one grabs your hand. "Don’t, you can even kill him for sure but fear and strength can't rule alone. You need them to truly believe you are first blood." You think you understand and step forward. 
The lone kobold starts look around uncomfortably as you slowly approach. Once you are at biting distance you loudly ask if he has any better ideas. He tries to say something, but you show your teeth, he quiets down. You then turn to the rest and proclaim that it is our duty as a tribe to help the kobolds. Not getting the reaction you wanted you also proclaim that you will all go hunting boars if the javelin throwing goes well. Your four supporters need to egg them on a little but soon the kobolds start cheering and get back to work finding long branches and stones for the javelins. Looks like the books you read on philology were not useless! Or was it physiology?
The training goes well... mostly. Yes, the javelins were made by half-trained apprentices and can’t even penetrate thick clothing but with a surprise advantage you could route a group of humans. Yes, most of the kobolds can’t throw further than what your left eye can see but they are still exhausted form yesterday and are improving. Yes, you couldn’t hunt a boar but the wise one did manage to convince the kobolds that otters are basically forest boars. Yes, you did have to cry to your pillow after having to shout all day but at least your throat is getting used to giving orders.
After the long day you find Keneith and Cuball sitting just outside the cave with Cuball lying his head in Keneith's lap. You sit next to them, quietly. You finally gather your strength and prepare to open up but Keneith speaks beforehand: "Sulti- I mean first blood Sulti. Can we sit together later, Cuball and I want to have some... discussions... together." Well, that was awkward. You apologise and walk to the purple kobold chatting with Sseth.
You sit next to them, making sure to not lose your First blood image like last time, then finally ask the purple kobold his name. He giggles and rubs his shoulder up against yours. "Well, you finally ask your concubine his name?" Concubine? You stop for a moment and silently curse yourself for not realising the situation until now. He giggles again at your facial expression and explains: "Every first blood needs to have few concubines, sadly for you most died on the way here and you are left with Poe, the sociable kobold. This is less a profession for me and more of a hobby." Not knowing what to say you compliment him on his sophisticated language. He smiles "I learned to speak like this from the last concubines, before they were sacrificed to the blood god for the last battle." You'll never get used to these mountain folk. "You are not very experienced with these... "situations" are you? The tribes, fighting, leading, those lovebirds over there." You look around to see the lovebirds but can't find them. Then you notice Keneith and Cuball watching the sunset together. Your jaw drops and you turn to the Kobold who giggles. "Don't worry, I spoke to them. I didn't quite understand what they tried to say but the red one simplified it as "We are not lovers, we are lonely". I think they were concubines in the city like me and decided that casual sex was better than suicide, sadism or alcohol." You watch as they walk into the forest, holding hands. It feels like there is a hole inside you. You want to jump into the fire burning behind. Sseth doesn't seem to fallow the conversation but he notices how you feel and hands you the bottle from yesterday. You grab it and gulp down as much as your muzzle can hold. It's like drinking fire and you can't help but spit some of it out. You feel nauseas rather than dizzy like last time. You turn to Sseth and ask how he can drink so much. He says something but you can't hear it. Poe helps you lie down and speaks loudly into your ear, giving you a headache, at least you understand him this time. "I'll help you to not make a fool out of yourself!" You try to stand up but fall back. Everything becomes blurry.

…make war
With my blood
My heart stopping
For…

You sip the liquid in front of you, once the mixture enters your system you snap back to reality. Poe puts the cup back on the stone table and places a wet rag on your head. He speaks quietly as to not trigger a headache. "Oh! Those concubines the last first blood had. They knew every sort of mixture for their master. The best I can do is boiled roots. Not to insult you but I think it's better that an inexperienced first blood has an inexperienced concubine anyways." This isn't your first-time drinking, but you could only afford two glasses of ale last time. This is much, much much worse. Without moving your head too suddenly you turn to Poe and ask what time it is. He peeks out of your tent-room and reports that the sun is rising. So you still have time to prepare the soldiers, hopefully they are not as wasted as you are. You manage to walk out on your own and find your clothes hanging to dry on some branches. Poe reports that you puked a lot the other night but the smell on you is enough to explain. He was at least clever enough to prepare a bucket of water and a clean cloak beforehand so you manage to become somewhat presentable.
Your kobolds will never become even slightly as organised as a real army but they complain a lot less when you wake them up this time. A few even take the initiative and start training outside with the javelins right away. You inspect your ragtag army as time passes. Cuball and Keneith come to you as you try to show a particularly stupid kobold how to not make the javelin wobble in her hands. You can't even look them in the eyes as they try to get your attention. Finally, you let them speak and they don't seem to mind you looking up at the sky as they talk. Keneith points to the training soldiers: "I think they are ready enough, Cuball and I went to that siege earlier today and the small army seems even weaker now." Happy that they don't want to talk about personal topics you ask if they are weak enough for 40 odd kobolds to take them out. Cuball speaks this time: "No, we are nowhere near strong enough. But there are, or at least I hope there are, actual fighters trapped in the valley. If we make enough noise they might realize that we are coming to help and rush out to join the battle. We can pick the rest off as they retreat." Good plan, the only viable plan. 
You stretch your black limbs under the sun and turn to the kobolds. You order them to stop training and prepare the javelins and spears for a real attack. They have to gall to actually start complaining about how they just got used to training now and would rather continue but you only need to repeat yourself once.
The kobolds might not be good fighters, good thinkers, good workers or just morally good in general but they at least know to coordinate. As they pick up supplies and weapons you order anyone who can fight to come with you. But as soon as you give the order the wise one stops you. "Sulti, that’s not the best idea. What if we are attacked while you are gone? I think you should keep... say... half the warriors here." Half? You explain that no one even knows about this cave, but she insists. "Sulti! listen to me. I- I have seen many first bloods make this mistake, you need to cover your back! I even picked a few warriors myself for the job." She picked warriors... cogs start turning in your head. She picked warriors herself. You feel smart and just manage to cover your grin. You play coy and ask to see these warriors. She playfully grabs a few among them and presents them to you. As you expected all of them are older mountain folk. You can feel her saying "I still got it!" inside as she watches you inspect them. You turn towards the wise one and tell her that these are truly great warriors, she smiles like an idiot. So, you have decided to send them into battle first. Her smile drops, she shouts behind you as you order your soldiers to join the line. As they start marching you notice the little blue kobold also coming along. You decide that the youth needs to see war as well and grab her hand but before you can even start talking to her the wise one comes and grabs her back. She stares daggers at you while dragging the kobold back to the cave. You'll need to see about this once you return. If you return.
The march is long and boring, the kobolds try to sing a song but only a handful know a proper marching song and Poe’s songs, despite being very beautiful, are either too dramatic or too cheerful for the occasion. The cold doesn't improve the situation. Your wounds ache with every breeze. The cloak you found in the cave helps a little but you'll need to think of something soon since the sun is setting. As you are walking at the head of the party Keneith and Cuball come from behind to talk. You'd prefer to dismiss them and explain that you need to have “war discussions" with Sseth but you are too embarrassed to be sassy. You endure their chat about the weather and other random topics. Finally, Keneith realizes that you are not taking much and asks if you are anxious about the battle. You want to just answer with a “yes”, you are actually anxious, but decide to instead apologize for trying to come unto Keneith when he was just trying to be nice. He laughs "It wasn’t about me Sulti, I just thought you didn't need extra complexity in your life." You bite your tongue and say that you didn’t know about the relationship between them. They both go quiet. You all stare at different directions. Keneith sighs and keeps looking away so Cuball breaks the silence: "Sulti, do you know what we used to do in the city, for food?" You don't answer "never mind, let's take a different approach. I know for a fact that you were a thief, that ordeal in the castle wasn’t a one time thing." You turn to him, surprised, and ask who told them. "No one, I could tell it from how you acted. When we first met you had stolen human clothes..." not true but- Keneith interjects: "I saw your warrant read out in the city, you appeared out of nowhere and stole enough to get noticed in only 3 days?" But- Cuball goes on: “You didn't thank us when we gave you food... "well- " You didn't even thank any of the kobolds giving you tribute once. And you kept taking random people's clothes and food in the cave." You realize that Antoni is basically the only person you've entered the house of and didn't rob or considered robbing... actually you stole his clothes as well. 
You relent and say that he is right. He nods in accordance, "Maybe if you were more perceptive you could tell what we are- what we were as well." You look at them but can't tell anything. " We were both born in the city, different parents but in the same room within the slums. Our caretakers disappeared within a few months, pretty good by kobold standards all things considered. We were left alone and starving. We could have taken many paths but at that age with no one to guide you luck carves your path. Keneith one day returns with actual candy. Says a lady in the red-light district gave him money and said to come to her for jobs." You cringe and he notices. "That's the face I made as well, he understood it less but I knew exactly the jobs people did there... but the candy was so sweet… we learned to count from our ribs Sulti. We were old enough to comprehend what the clients did to us but not old enough to realize the consequences." Keneith slows down and leaves to joins the other kobolds coming behind you. "We got used to the physical hardships of the job quick but only when we were old enough to start exploring the world did we realize what we became. The other kobolds, even the ones working with us, would go out at night to find mates; we would just sleep in a dark corner hoping not to be disturbed by anyone until work starts again in the evening. We'd hear the couples sing love songs in the slums, we were forced to do the same by some rich snobs for over a month on stage every night so it just disgusted us. Well, finally we managed to find jobs that didn't destroy us but the damage was done." Keneith walks back next to you and takes Cuball's place: "Please don’t dig into our relationship Sulti. The world made you into the thief and us into that, try to resist it at least." You can't find any words of comfort so instead you mix and match a few words of wisdom from Antoni : "A mad world makes mad people like us, no?" They both chuckle, Keneith tries to hold Cuball's hand, but he pushes it away and moves to walk alone next to the column. 
After some more hours of marching smoke clouds appear over the setting sun. You tell the kobolds to stay quiet and head out with your comandantes. You come closer until the sounds of the human siege camp can be heard. You easily climb a tree despite your injuries but none of the others are agile or light enough to do so. You try to look over the camp as it is getting dark but can't see anything. You curse your blurry eye and look again with it closed but doing that just disorients you. The campsite is at the bottom of an incline covered by a thick line of trees. You can only see tents and figures moving in front of a narrow valley. You'd think that it would be simple to surround the camp and do a surprise attack from the tree line, but you can't tell if there are any defences. You curse again under your breath and ask under the tree if anyone can climb up. No one answers, you ask again if anyone can hear you, no sound. You are getting a little anxious. Then suddenly the branches start shaking. You freeze and look down. Sseth’s voice finally comes: "First blood, we found someone." You ask who it is, no one responds. You see a small figure climbing up the branches and dying leaves. It's the little kobold!
She carefully makes her way up and sits on a branch as if this is perfectly normal behaviour. You are taken back a little and ask her name: "Buddi, I am un-wise and ugly." Children, they are weird, were you like this when you were little? You assume that she fallowed the group after you. You put on her calm, serious attitude and tell her to come towards you; she obliges and stares at the camp below. You ask her how many humans she sees. She asks if the ones with the tail and four legs the humans are. You explain that it's a dog she is describing, humans are like kobolds but larger and without tails. She fits her name alright.
 Buddi looks again, longer this time. You consider explaining to her what a human is in detail but she finally reports on her findings: “on average 49 humans outside at a time excluding the ones that might be in the tents, 19 armed as of now. 20 to 23 standing at a time. Roughly half seems to be in one of various forms of discomfort, camp fever is likely." Before you can even respond she speaks again. "The armed ones are concentrated in the centre of the circle; they are operating a wooden machinery. The rest of the humans, standing or otherwise, appear to also be looking at either the wall between the valley or the machinery." Well, you don't know about wisdom, but she might be as intelligent as Antoni! You tell her that you are impressed and together go back down. The others are waiting there, Poe comes forward: "We found the little one at the back of the column, when Sseth came asking for someone to climb a tree she seemed best." You tell him to be more careful when sending a little girl for scouting but thank him anyway. Then you order him to take the little girl somewhere safe and to give her food and warm clothing. 
The rest of the warband is brought in sight of the camp. You discuss plans with Cuball and Sseth. The situation doesn't seem too complicated. The humans will start going to sleep as the sun falls. Keneith will take a small group to the other side of the camp and wait for your signal. Once the humans look like they are mostly in their tents Cuball will make the sound of a wolf and Keneith's band will charge. As the soldiers are distracted the main force will attack from behind, making as much noise as possible. At this point the hope is that the besieged kobolds will rush out and help, if they don't Cuball will make the sound of a bear and you'll retreat. You gleefully explain the master plan but neither warrior seems impressed. Cuball counters first: “"No plan survives first contact" the human captain would say, are you sure the kobolds will be able to fallow it?" You can't answer. Sseth adds: "Is it a good idea to relay on another tribe? I have seen many battles lost because of lousy allies!" You explain that's why the bear signal exist but he doesn't seem too impressed either. In any case, with the cold night approaching the warband can't simply return, there needs to be action. You order the plan to be executed. You go over to the kobolds to explain what they need to do. But all of them are gathered around circle, ignoring you.
You walk between them and reach the circle’s centre. It’s Buddi cutting up a bird! She carefully breaks the trashing pigeon’s neck, then slices its belly. All the kobolds lean in but then take a step back when the little wise one stops cutting and looks at them. She goes on with her work until the tiny heart is removed. She looks at it, smells the blood, even licks it. Finally giving her divination: “The gods have promised good fortune”. The kobolds cheer but you quickly order them to quiet down, enemy is but a few hundred meters away. You tell Buddi to go clean her hands then start placing the kobolds in their positions. Did she actually fallow the haruspex’s rules or make things up to help you?
The human camp can be seen clearly from your high position. The kobolds are hidden among the trees with javelins and spears. You have Sseth on your right and Cuball on the left, ready to give the signal. The tribe armourer, carpenter normally, comes through the lines and hands a few kobolds extra javelins; then he come over to you and hands you a shoddy shield. You try to hold the thing but it keeps falling off. You realize that it keeps falling off your missing fingers. The armourer tries to tie it to your arm but you make him give it to Cuball. You'd love to start the battle as soon as possible, you can see a few kobolds starting to shiver, but the timing needs to be perfect. You watch one particular soldier among the humans. His shiny armour suggest that he is high ranking, perhaps the commander himself. Soon he goes in his tent, you wait a little more to make sure he is at least out of his armour and in bed. Shivering, you whisper to Cuball for him to give the signal. He cups his mouth and at the top of his lungs makes the howling of wolf. Sseth just manages to grab a stupid warrior stepping out of line. You wait for Keneith's charge, but no one comes. You see a few humans staring at the tree line. You start panicking and tell Cuball to make the signal again, he obliges. No one still. You sent the wise one's soldiers with Keneith, did they fuck you over?
Shouts, you look again. It's one kobold coming down the hill! For a moment you think it's only going to be one person but in just a moment the rest of the party comes behind him. A ruckus starts in the camp. You look at the commencing battle. Most of the humans actually rush towards the walls of the valley. You see Keneith's party cut down a few unarmed humans as they enter the centre of the camp. The entire army wakes up as they start tearing down tents and attacking half-asleep soldiers. You see a small armed group of soldiers gather in a corner; they are preparing to attack your kobolds! It’s time. Your heart is beating, this might be the most terrifying thing you've ever done. Not a moment can be wasted. You raise your own spear and shout gibberish at the top of your lungs. Cuball and Sseth, then the entire kobold group joins. Tens of javelins are thrown into the air, more than a few hit humans below. Your legs stop shaking and you start moving forwards. The hill gets steeper and steeper. You can't stop anymore. 
The entire camp is in chaos. You see heavily injured humans lying on the floor but few are dead, your soldiers are not strong enough to actually kill them in a fight. With Sseth, Cuball and a few companions behind your back you rush to the valley walls. The wooden palisade is tall enough that no one could climb it. You come over and shout at it. After a few agonizing moments you see a white kobold look at you up from the palisade. You shout at them as more appear, but they don't seem to be moving. Cuball shouts even louder for them to come down and help the fight but they simply look down. You keep shouting but no one responds! You see Sseth trying to hold off a soldier coming towards you. You keep shouting, there are a lot of them in there, they must come down! Cuball grabs your arm "Sulti! It's not going to work; we need to retreat." You look back, there are a few kobolds lying on the ground now and your surprise advantage is getting lost. You shout again at the kobolds above who are watching as if nothing is happening. 
You hear a bear next to you, you turn to Cuball and slap his mouth. He stares at you in shock and runs off the help Sseth. You turn to your kobolds and wait for them to retreat. But they are not doing so! With all the shouting the battle is too loud and no one heard Cuball! With nothing to do you charge towards the centre of the camp to find Keneith. You see his small group which is now on the defensive. Just as you reach them Keneith takes a stray arrow right on the arm and falls. You think he is dead for a moment but he manages to stand up and limps towards you. Horrified, you try to remove the arrow but he stops you. "Sulti, I- I can't stop them, they are looting, the fuckers!" You turn to his group. They are not killing people in the tents; they are running off with metal armour! You scream at them to get back in line. A few turns but they quickly make use of the chaos and hide back in the crowd. You turn to Keneith again and beg him to find something, no one could hear the retreat signal! He is as shaken as you are but manages to keep his cool. "The captain, he is in front of the trebuchet with a few soldiers. You- you need to kill him. I heard the humans say that there are hundreds of us…" after those words he collapses on the ground. Nothing can be easy, can it?
With a few loyal warriors fallowing, you find the captain standing in front of some of his subordinates and giving orders. As soon as your small group comes into sight you two make eye contact. You have no idea how but you connect with him the only way two leaders can. Shame you both want to kill each other. You raise your spear in defiance and approach the captain. It only takes a moment to realize how bad of an idea that this is. He is triple your size, fully armed and armoured and has soldiers with him. The warrior within you quiets down. You are a thief, no? Is stealing lives much different from gold?
You look the captain straight in the eyes and raise your spear higher. You shout at him to come face you. The clever man sends his soldiers instead. Losses are acceptable. As the soldiers come forward you push one of your own kobolds at them. The creature doesn't even have a moment to react before he is cut down, but you manage to pass the two soldiers and head straight for the captain. He raises his shield in response. You don’t head straight for him but jump on the trebuchet next to him and climb on top of it. He probably expects you to do some clever trick and hurl a rock at him or something and so cuts the rope in the machine, making it inoperable. Clearly he has never met a thief before; you have simpler tricks. You hurl your spear at his shoulder. He easily blocks the shot but has to recoil back because of the shield's weight. You put all the strength you have left in you on your legs and jump. You see the entire carnage in the battlefield for a moment before falling down on the captain.
The strong soldier manages not to collapse under your weight but is stunned, giving you the time you need to pull out your knife. But just as you prepare to stab the captain drops his sword then punches your hand and the knife goes flying off. You both look at each other in disbelief over the situation. Without thinking you bite off the thin leather on his neck armour between the metal sheets. Having realized your intentions, the captain screams but only manages to draw more attention to himself. You don't know how you look from the position but the soldiers coming to his aid stop in their tracks and simply stare. Your teeth cut into the man's flesh like a thousand needles. He screams in pain and manages to hit your back with his metal hand but you are gripping with your teeth like a wolf now. He screams as you tear flesh and finally hit bone. He coughs large amounts of blood on your face and starts collapsing but you don’t stop. You bite until your jaw starts hurt and finally crack his neck. You pull as hard as you can, bits of bone scratch your mouth. You spit out the blood and guts as the horrified soldiers and kobolds watch, frozen. You tear again, your jaw makes a cracking sound but you manage pull out more bone. The man collapses with you still on him. After one final painful bite you are thrown backwards with a chunk of the man’s spine between your teeth. Still on the ground, you hold out the mangled head at the terrified soldiers and before you know it a route has started. "The captain's dead!" "Retreat!” "They have hounds!" Once you are sure of their defeat you throw the head away and collapse on the ground, still spitting the man's remains. You puke and feel okay for a moment but then fall face first into your own vomit.

…down the painful road
Of thy lyfe, clear across
To the city, let me drop

For I have forsaken
The one who dreamt

In the depths…

The breeze wakes you up. You pull the blanket all the way up to your neck and warm up. Once you manage to open one tired eye you see a kobold in robes watching you. You both stare at each other, he stands up from his seat and takes a few steps towards the exit of the tent you are in. You try to ask where you are but can't seem to open your jaw. The kobold stares at you for a few moments then quickly leaves with fear in his eyes. You try to stand up but a sharp pain stings your legs, firmly placing you on the bed you are in. Just as quickly as he left the kobold returns with an older female kobold behind him. You recognize the clothes as belonging to a wise one. She kneels on your side and starts saying what you assume to be shooting prayers in draconic. You again try to open your mouth, but it won't move. She continues her weird prayer as a familiar white kobold comes in. It's Reynard! He takes one look at the wise one telling prayers and grabs her by the horns. The old kobold tries to resist but Reynard shouts what sounds like some rudimentary draconic at her and throws her out of the room. He turns to you: "Wise ones, useless ones I'd say!" You try harder to open your mouth but just as you feel air rush in a terrible pain hits you and you close your muzzle again, almost leaving you in tears. Reynard comes over and starts softly rubbing your jaw. 
"Well, well, well, pup. We meet again. Don't try to open your jaw, we tied it up." Only then do you feel the rope holding your muzzle closed. "You really messed that guy up, didn't you? I mean, I’ve seen some shit in my time but that… that was amazing. You definitely won't be biting anyone soon but the..." He makes a funny face and squeaks his voice "... "wise one" thought that you were possessed by the blood god and would attack anyone you see like an animal. You wouldn't do that, would you?" You shake your head and he smiles in response. He reaches over slowly and stars removing the bindings, you doubt he thinks you lost it but from how slowly he removes the binding it's clear he isn't fully convinced either way. Once the rope is removed you open your mouth as wide as possible and stretch, then cough tiny pieces of blood and guts at unsuspecting Reynard who dodges out of the way. As you spit out more guts and puke he makes you eat some porridge and drink water. Once the liquids enter your mouth they combine with the remains of the captain and you spit some more before gladfully eating the food. Once finished you turn to Reynard and ask why in the fuck he didn't help your warriors in the fighting. His slight grin drops, he crosses his arms. We didn't because what you did was the stupidest thing you could have ever done." You try to raise from your bed but fall back down again. 
"Let's get this straight, you have 30 something kobolds, mostly starving or worse. You train them for a grand total of 2 and a half days then send them off to fight a group almost twice their size, while equipped with makeshift weapons." You try to explain the plan, but he silences you. "We didn't help you because we didn't need to be saved. If you had come a day earlier we might have attacked since a few of the king’s advisors were here and we could have captured them. You would have known this if you had set up scouts spying on the camp. Or, you could have simply not come. With the colder months approaching the siege would not hold anyway!" You cover your face and ask what happened after you fell down. Reynard sits on the bed and rubs your shoulder. "That’s the best bit. This commander, this incompetent buffoon, this rookie first blood then takes her shit plan; fails to execute it properly but still savagely defeats her enemies and orders her own soldiers executed right afterwards! Ex- executed? You scream the words at Reynard. "Well, emphasis on "ordered" You were dazed after falling down and mostly went around screaming at the kobolds who apparently started looting before the battle was over. That went on until your friends had you sedated. On another note, I’m really impressed with the little circle you built, they are competent people unlike you. My so-called “friends” would bite me in the ass first chance they get" You try to push him off the bed but he grabs your hand and pulls you up. You feel your legs crumble beneath you, Reynard quickly grabs you before you fall and holds you on his arms. "huh I thought you would be heavier, makes it easier for me." He starts carrying you out of the tent.
You have to slowly open your eyes as they adjust to the sun. It's almost midday and over a hundred kobolds are dismantling the camp as you walk towards the now open gates leading into the valley. You look around at Reynard’s tribe working in unison and bringing the resources into the valley. You are amazed as you enter; the kobolds have already turned the place into the city slums. The walls are covered with makeshift tree houses and only a narrow road leads towards a larger structure ahead. A few kobolds stop to gawk at the first blood being carried like a baby but you show your teeth at them and even in your weak state it's enough to scare them off. You finally make it to Reynard’s new home. After going through the newly built doors you see your friends talking with Reynard's kobolds in a wide hall. Poe rushes over and takes you from Reynard, it feels good to be in trusted arms again. The talking quiets down as Reynard takes his seat on a large pillow and you are placed on a smaller on one next to him, facing the table with the kobolds. This situation feels oddly familiar. Reynard is given a cup by who you assume to be his concubine and he raises it. "We have won a victory today, it's not every day we get to spill so much human blood so let's toast to First Blood of the Northern Tribe, the She-Wolf, Survivor, Sulti!" The oddly dressed kobolds around the table cheer. You only have your four trusted companions while Reynard seems like he has surrounded himself with all sorts of kobolds and is doing his best to appeal to them. 
You think he is about to give a speech but instead a roasted boar is brought in. His scantily clad concubines start carving up the meat while the kobolds chop off bits with their own knives. You look away in disgust at their complete lack of manners but once the smell of roasted pork comes to the throne you wish you could join them. While Reynard and his kobolds are distracted you signal to Poe who manages to stop carving for a moment and brings you over to your own tribe. As soon as you are seated you lean in and ask why you can't walk. Cuball hands you a rib and explains: "No hello to your battle scared friends?" You aggressively kiss him on his forehead then sarcastically apologize. " I’m getting mixed signals here but okay; I accept your apology for hitting me in the face as well" Angrily you turn to Keneith and repeat the question but Cuball finally answers. "You were walking just fine when the battle was over, you started limping after we found you giving random orders to confused warriors and then you collapsed. Their wise one told us to that you had incurred the attention of the blood god for your viciousness but that seems a little… contradictory to me." He reaches under the table and pulls Buddi from there. "I don't know how much we can trust a little girl but she has a different opinion." The little kobold gives her professional opinion in a monotone tone, as if it's the hundredth time she's repeated it: "You are lacking blood, the nerves and bone are also hurt. You need rest and red meat to restore health." You raise your shoulders and happily take a bite out of the rib. You knew it would be good, but you didn't expect it to be this good. It has all the best qualities of city meat and forest meat combined, you manage to chew as long as possible and make the best out of every muscle. But then the taste of the human captain comes to mind, and the smell of the burning kobolds. You keep chewing, it tastes amazing but you can't bring yourself to swallow. Poe sees you struggling but misunderstands the reason and hands you ale. You manage to wash it down. The drinking Cuball pulls Keneith, who has been staying oddly quite until now, towards you and speaks in a buzzed manner: "Don't be too sad Sulti, look at Keneith, he won't get back to being normal so easily!" You take a closer look and then gasp; his arm is missing! Keneith hides his stump beneath his clothes and closes his eyes, not even touching the food. "I knew this would happen one day. I had come to terms with it long before but- but it still feels so... wrong..." You hold his one hand, making sure that your missing finger are in view, and kiss him on the cheek. He briefly smiles and takes a small slice from the food.
You look around for Sseth but don’t seem him so you ask Poe where he went. “Sseth? Heh. There were some camp fallowers of the humans left after the battle, being the warrior he is he took the liberty of partaking in those spoils. I think he is still with them.” Poe keeps eating his food with a smile on his face while you sit frozen in place. You push away your food and take another sip of the ale. 
The hours go on. The story of your battle with the commander slowly drifts away from reality right in front of your eyes. One kobold even comes up with a song on the spot.

Sulti, daughter to Kristina
Came to the court of Reynard
The First Blood of First Bloods
There she did raise hell
Brought down the fury of our God
On the cowardly humans
And tore out the heart
Of the soulless human leader

You ask her to add something about how you outsmarted the captain as well, you have more than enough people fearing you. She waves her head and walks away with lire at hand. With the drinks finished Poe grabs you and prepares to return you to their camp but Reynard stops him on the way out. He leans in, you smell the blood of the pig but at least he didn't drink too much: "Sulti, we need to discuss debts." You look him straight in the eyes and say that at least right now you are prepared to pay anything but that. He laughs, "Oh, don’t worry about that, favours can be bargained with. Let's just talk for now. You relent and ask Poe to let you go. Reynard tries to pick you up but you think you can start to feel your legs again and ask to be placed down instead. It's painful to walk and someone still needs to carry most of your weight but this is far more dignified than being carried like a newborn. One arm grabbed by Reynard; you walk to what looks to be his bedroom further back. Inside two concubines are waiting for him on his large bed, he coldly orders them to leave. They both give you ugly looks as they make their way out. Reynard rolls his eyes as they leave “I was going to make you one of them you know, concubines are more than… meat, you then went and made your own destiny" you don't know whether to feel proud or ashamed at the revelation. There are no chairs so you both sit on other ends of his bed.
Reynard pulls out a bottle from his pocket and takes a swig of some alcoholic drink, he offers it to you as well but you refuse. "Sulti, look, I've been a little unfair." No shit. He lights a candle despite the kobold night vision “Your attack did lead to 12 dead kobolds and us having to cut off a hand for each looter but it helped with morale and discipline. Better yet, the kingdom is much weaker now. Still, it doesn't change the fact that we are still fucked. I have ears all over the kingdoms, that money I extorted wasn't being wasted." You relax a little and compliment him on his foresight. He raises his bottle to you and goes on: "I didn't expect the attack on the kobolds to be as big as it was, maybe the kingdoms didn't either but in any case they are now determined to wipe us out and come spring a proper force from all the kingdoms combined will come. It is impossible, even with our she-wolf, to take them on." You ask why all this is happening in the first place. Reynard sighs, "I actually don't know. I spoke to so many and with each new information it got even more confusing. This is what I am sure of: The kingdoms got bored, and they got ambitious. There has been peace for a while between them, with their new trade routes and advances in warfare war has gotten too costly." You pretend to understand and nod. "They are planning something, something big, and kobolds are in that thing’s way. Are we with the ones they are plotting against? Do they think we will turn on them? Do they think we are too much of a loose cannon and they need stability? Do they just need the experience in war and resources from the Kobolds? All of those things at once or perhaps none of them?"
Your head starts spinning, you ask how you fit in. He smiles, takes a look at the candle, then closes his eyes. "I have- had a major problem. We couldn't get anything done until now about the rising threat because the tribes couldn't unify, and I was planning to spend the winter doing just that. But now that problem is almost solved. The Kobolds living in the north- the kobolds who survived living in the north have all flocked to you. The rest are within my control." You look at his closed eyes and ask if this is going to lead to a marriage proposal. He laughs, it actually feels genuine for once. "Cute, it's not actually the worst idea but first bloods don't have marriage. I instead want tribute. It’s not uncommon for one tribe to yield to another. You can go backstab me in a few years but until then if you yield to me the 3 remaining first bloods that are left will all be under me, an unprecedented event. They are weak and can’t even control their pitiful tribes but it’s the fact that I control them which is important. A fact that would allow me to perhaps save our people. I need tribute, I made the last three do funny but degrading things for it. Like pretend to be a dog for a day or lick a muddy cart clean. You, however, need to pay in blood." You tell him that you don't have enough blood for yourself. "No, I meant someone else's blood. Your wise one's blood." You are surprised and ask how she breaks the plans. "Oh, she isn't doing anything wrong in particular. She just has the annoying combinations of being ambitious but stupid, sneaky but craven and worst of all wise but unhinged. We need her out." You try to bargain but he won't budge. The wise one has helped you so far and you don't want her to be killed for no reason. As you come up with alternatives that have her not killed Reynard's voice tone changes, he is getting angry. “This is why we can’t get along Sulti, you are not on the same page as… as anyone”
After you suggest simply banishing her he stops responding. As you try to get a response he suddenly moves. With a single stroke he throws the lit candle to the floor, bathing the room in darkness. You can only whimper before your vision goes away as your eyes struggle to adapt to the darkness. Before you can even shout out his name Reynard hops on you and you feel that crushing, burning, freezing weight on you again. He bites you neck soft enough to allow air in but hard enough to draw blood. His face slowly starts appearing in the darkness, the ashen skin looks like that of a monster. "Sulti, look, I like you, but I've had enough of this shit. I'll rape you right here and now, then I'll have you and your friends' heads on stakes before sunrise if you don’t listen." You freeze and beg him to let go of your limbs. He complies but puts his entire weight on your belly instead, crushing you. "You'll bring me your wise shit’s head; no games, no negotiation." You repeat his words. "Right, good girl" He stops crushing you and stands up. "You are staying here tonight” he then calls out for Poe and patiently waits as he comes over. When your concubine finally reaches the room Reynard impatiently points to you “Now we know how many foot taps it takes before you appear. Wonderful.” Poe makes no comment stands beside the door as the boss closes it. “You'll take your remaining kobolds and leave for your cave first thing in the morning and do as I say, we handle your surrender later." The door shuts with a loud thud.
You grab a pillow and cover your face. You first scream at it with all your anger then start crying. You just want to run out in the forest and find Antoni. Why can't you just live normally? You don't want the meat or the respect or the glory, you just want some fucking peace. As you stare at the low ceiling Poe bursts into the room. He runs over and ask if you are okay. You nod, he touches your hips "Do you want me to stay over?" You thank him and say that you'd rather stay alone tonight. He looks at you for a moment then leaves. You stare into darkness. Keneith lost his arm, and you are crying over this. You are a child. A child spoiled by her dad. You wish you could just be normal and act like a real leader. You wish you were never born. You wish…

… it
Moths and spiders
Kill…

"Sulti, we are ready to leave." You blink a couple of times then nod at Poe. He helps you rise from bed and you manage to stand up but still need his help. You step outside Reynard’s house and try to walk on your own but it's impossible. You drag him to quite corner and he has to awkwardly look away while you take care of your business behind a bush. After the deed is done you turn to Poe and tell him to cut your throat if you ever lose your legs. He quickly drags you to your warriors before you can get an answer. You try to enjoy the sight and sounds and smells of the slums before leaving. The kobold settlement is bustling with activity. You see your comrades and Reynard waiting at your small camp. You try to hide your anger as Reynard comes to speak: "Sulti, I was a little harsh last night. I didn't know about the miscarriage and that band-" You cut him off, who the fuck told him about that? You grab his shirt with one hand and look him straight in the eyes and ask: will he betray you, throw you away like trash the moment you are no longer needed or seem to become a threat? He breaks your grasp and takes a few steps back. he seems angry at first but becomes more somber after seeing your face. "Sulti... despite all I said you are competent. Not intelligent perhaps but you have that spark. If I ever decided to get rid of you you'd smell it from a mile away." You tell Poe to keep moving. Outside the valley there is a somewhat thick fog but you can make out the road.
Cuball is getting really good at the whole army business. It looks like he managed to have all the wounded and weapons loaded onto a cart with a horse and you are placed among them. You can't help but feel guilty when the wounded kobolds look at their leader. They don't understand the mistakes you made but they can understand pain and losing loved ones. You try to cheer them on a bit, but they don't seem to listen. Sseth comes along with twenty or so kobolds behind him. "First Blood Sulti, these kobolds belonged to our tribe. They were staying here after leaving our tribe because of the late first blood's failures. After hearing of your glorious actions they have re-joined us." You ignore Sseth and turn to look at the relatively healthy-looking kobolds and declare that you'll keep the victories coming as long they are loyal. They give out a hurrah and join the march. Sseth seems to expect some attention from you but you stagger back to the cart. The ride goes on in sorrowful silence as you contemplate life on the bumpy ride.
Suddenly your scout further ahead comes running towards your cart. "First Blood! There are humans on horses coming up on the road!" You look up ahead and there really is a figure slowly coming towards your group. You stand up best you can and order the spearmen up front to defend the cart. The kobolds quickly form a wall in front of you as the figure comes closer through the winter mist.
You manage to grab a javelin and wait for the horse charge. But as the figure comes closer you realize that it's one person alone. Finally, he comes into view: It's Valton's apprentice! He panics when he sees your raised javelin and armed kobolds but manages to stand still. You are as shocked as he is and ask why he came here. He dismounts and approaches with hands raised. "Sulti? Sulti, that is you, isn’t it? You lower the javelin a bit and ask who is asking. "I’m Rodian, I used to work under you know who but we had an argument. Look, I need your help as much as you need mine. I’m unarmed and I won't leave until you tell me to. We just need to talk. You ask Keneith to bring you to the apprentice. He manages to stand still as Sseth searches his pockets for weapons but only manages to find papers and some supplies. You raise your head up and ask why in Blood God's name he though coming here was a good idea. "Because- Because I can’t sleep at night… Because I knew you'd listen Sulti. Last night soldiers came to the city and told of what you did. Now, I know you are a good person so-" You cut him off and tell him that you are really not a good person, you are in fact a thief and a murderer. Keneith and Cuball add: "We've killed so many innocent people and are also whores." Poe shrugs: "I got accused of "corrupting youth" more than once, they weren't wrong." Even Sseth manages to fallow: "I come from a long line of torturers, right now all I want is to see how long it takes to break a scholar!" Rodian starts shaking and losing his cool. You take that as a sign of honesty and grab his hand. You tell him that you'll bite, metaphorically of course. You tell him to put you on his horse and fallow the marching kobolds. The rest of the ride is made in comfort as you talk about all the soldiers you killed last night to Rodian. You think scaring him would have been funny but it’s not fun when you are the only one laughing. You go quite and then apologize but that just makes things more awkward.
As you approach the cave Cuball comes over to the horse: "Sulti, I think we should blindfold him. They can't know where we are." You don't want to be any ruder to Rodian after all you've done so you refuse. Keneith counters: "Sulti, if you two disagree and he knows where we live there is no going back for him." Before you can respond Rodian binds his eyes himself with a long piece of cloth and asks for his horse to be lead. You keep going. Rodian, probably bored from being blinded, tries to chat: "So, Sulti, how did you escape the city?" You still hold a grudge against the city folk so you sarcastically say that the gods were so appalled by the violence that they pulled you up to the sky and dropped you in the forest. "Well, kobolds died but it wasn't that bad compared to a war." You exclaim a "Hah!" and tell him there were literal lines of people getting raped and carts full of bodies. "Well... kobolds can’t feel pain, no?" Keneith, walking alongside you overhears the conversation and can't help himself. "Okay man, wait a moment." He runs off and grabs a young kobold from the marching line and brings her over. "This is Tomica. Tomica, please tell them again what you saw in the city if it's okay with you." The poor purple kobold shuts her eyes and recounts: "I was running along the streets with my friend Higo and a few others when we were attacked. We managed to avoid the mob and we ran to his mother, she hugged him and told us to hide. I managed to get inside a barrel, but the mob came before Higo could hide. They- they shouted at him. They then... then they made him rape his mother. They hit him whenever he stopped. Then they made him choke her to death. He was crying but they made him eat her cheeks and when he couldn't eat anymore from puking they kicked him to death. I hid until morning then swam upstream out the canal." Keneith pats her back and tells her to get back in line. You can see Rodian physically cringe. Keneith then goes over to the wounded cart and helps a kobold stagger over. "If you don’t mind please tell me about what you saw in front of the temple in your “expedition” out of the city." The kobold coldly nods. "I was running above the roofs, trying to get to a house close to the city walls so I could jump. I passed by the temple square on the way. There were tens of kobolds attached to poles. They were being disemboweled but also healed with magic at the same time. Onlookers were betting as to how long they would last before dying. The longest, a screaming and crying white kobold, had lasted an hour. Her insides were empty like a bag, yet she didn't die. After a while priests came out of the temple and killed off the kobolds. They were probably more concerned about the gambling rather than the torture." He staggers back to the approaching cart.
Rodian utters a few words but they are gibberish. Keneith speaks again: "One last story. I was out of the city when the massacre began. But I had friends on the inside, so I tried to find them. I scaled an unmaintained part of the wall and jumped to a roof. I saw the piles of bodies and decided to leave. I then saw a dead-end underneath and two kobolds in it. I saw a group of humans lead by a huge man come chasing them. The kobolds shared a last kiss together, then one charged the humans while the other ran to a metal fence. The one attacking was grabbed, the other started bashing its head against the metal railing. She screamed with each hit but finally managed to either die or get knocked out before the humans could reach her. The other one wasn't as lucky. They tied him by the feet, covered him in oil and set him on fire next to his companion." Rodian doesn't say anything but simply looks down. Keneith adds before leaving "Reality is much crueler than anything one of your writers can come up with, scholar." The rest of the way is made in silence, you think your wounds hurt less after hearing all that.
The wise one watches in horror as you return, on horseback and with a captive no less. She grabs Buddi first and approaches you. "How many kobolds did you lose?" You stare at her furiously and ask her why she is so concerned about deaths now that you are in charge. She runs off to the arriving kobolds and shouts for a few names. No one responds, you sent the kobolds loyal to her with Keneith, almost none survived and those that did stayed with Reynard. With options running out she turns to run but Cuball grabs her. She is thrown at the hooves of your horse and shouts: "This tribe changed; I want to leave!" You hop off the horse with Keneith’s help, now at least able to stagger around. You tell her that you'd love to let her go but Reynard wants tribute in blood. Her eyes go cold. She looks around for an escape but finds none. Sseth comes behind you. "I was wondering what that first blood wanted in tribute. Are you sure we can’t fight him Sulti?" You shake your head, then regret doing so because it gives you a headache. You say that kobolds need to stick together now, and this wise one does not want to stick together. 
The old kobold finally relents and pushes Buddi towards you. "This one, I trained her. The knowledge of the tribe runs with her. Take me but leave her alone." You nod in approval and the wise one walks a little further ahead then sits on a rock facing the sun. You kneel in front of the little girl. You want to test her. You draw the two symbols Sseth drew on you with blood and ask what they mean. She takes one look at them and responds: "Large, Penis" You angrily turn to Sseth who simply shrugs, "Old first blood was proud warrior, too proud. I saw the symbols on his face." You tell her to talk about the wise one. As if reading it from a book she responds: "Wise one is always right, she always knows best. Everyone else is stupid." You ask her to tell you about Sulti. "New first blood, weak, stupid, ugly. Raped by a random bandit like a stupid slut. Had strong, beautiful white kobold child. It died because of the shame”. 
You freeze. Cuball steps between you and Buddi. "Sulti! She is just repeating what she was told!" You take a deep breath and ask what the wise one would like to do. She stares to the ground for a few seconds and responds: "She would like her dearest apprentice to kill the first blood as she sleeps." You are still frozen, Poe grabs her hand and pulls her away. 
You've seen enough. Sseth tries to help you stand up but you push him away and walk towards the wise one while holding Keneith’s hand. You shout at her that she trained Buddi well. No response. You shout that sadly she never thought her to lie. Still no response. You pull out a dagger to let her know that she should have picked someone bigger for the job. She sits there a second more, then starts running off, away from you. A javelin whistles in the air. The kobold comes down. Sseth pulls his arm back and comes behind you. "They say the best heroes all die from betrayal; I think you should take this as a sign." You watch her body spasm for a few more moments before movement stops. You turn back to the horse and have Rodian's blindfold removed. He hasn't seen anything but has heard enough to be horrified. You walk to your room with him. 
You close the curtains behind you. he sits on a rock and waits. You look at him for a moment, a familiar scent, city folk. You wish you didn't but you can't help it. You rush over to him and hug the shocked man and start crying over his shoulder. He remains motionless for a moment but then hugs back. With teary eyes you jump on your bed and look at his face. You ask how you look. He inspects you. "Well, you look more vigorous overall but those are some nasty scars you made, not to mention the further sunken eyes and general lack of healthiness and the fingers and… You need rest is what I think." You close your eyes and ask if you look like a monster. He is silent for a moment... "You are being described as one, are those rumours about eating soldiers... never mind. You look rougher, but still... still you feel like the kobold I first saw." You smile, you are not a wolf yet. Maybe you'll never be... Before he can talk you start speaking. You talk about how you escaped prison, came here, became first blood, and defeated the siege. He listens with attention. After finishing you hand him the remains of the alcohol you drank a few nights back and let him ponder about your story. You have been treated better than most but... but why can’t everyone just stop killing each other?
He finally comes up with a response. "Sulti, I’m no doctor but you have deep problems" You laugh, every kobold has deep problems. "Yes, that's why I’m here. Sulti, do you know about the second coalition war in 342 D.s?" You tell him you were born in the year when Lord Fairfax died and that's as much history as you know or care to know about. "Well, long story short, we've had peace for a while now. Normally when there is peace kingdoms slowly fall to decadence and collapse after a few bad harvests or an Orcish army comes." You ask if the kobolds were killed for food because of the bad harvest. "No, that was part of the justification but it goes deeper than that. Do you know how Kobolds were made?" You come up with a crude sex joke but instead decide to maintain a level of intellect and tell a well-known poem instead:

Where once was land was sand 
Neither was there sun nor hand
Then the will said: “Rescue me, numen”
So it did, carved flesh from stone
And blood from itself
Thus struck the bargain
Of centuries past

"Exactly! Sulti, this may come as a shock but Kobolds really are carved." You pretend to be surprised. "For almost the last 13 years Master Valton and I have been researching Elves, why you ask? Because the king wants to invade the elvish realms." Interesting, you ask how that relates to kobolds. Rodian leans on his chair. "Master Valton is paranoid, he keeps a lot of his knowledge secret. But he needs someone to discuss things with and keep records. I was that person. He never explained the full details but the Elves and Kobolds are somehow connected." You say that elves can be hypnotizing sometimes. He smiles "Yes, exactly. We discovered that through experimentation as well. You know who else is hypnotized by elves? Goblins." Goblins, how is that related? "Interestingly, goblins are also the only race kobolds can produce offspring with, interesting coincidence." You are finally intrigued and sit on your bed instead of lying down. "Have you ever looked at a lizard Sulti? I have, I have looked at a lot of lizards while helping Valton. Kobolds, despite being supposedly coming from lizards are the only ones to have proper appendages and share facial features closer to humans rather than Lizards. It’s almost as if you were carved to fit in with humans. Well, carved as in selective breeding, or perhaps some sort of magic surgery. We don’t know yet. There is also talk of kobolds coming from dragons but that's just folk tales" You don't know what an appendage is and say that you still don't understand how that relates to Elves and goblins. "The goblins are mirrored versions of kobolds but made for dwarves instead. I ran so many theories and diagrams. The result is clear: Goblins with their night vision, small size, fast breeding, stupidity etc. etc. were made for dwarves! They are the perfect annoyance. Excuse me if this sounds a little rude but who is the annoyance for humans?" Well, this is becoming stupid but you entertain the idea: it's the less ugly and less stupid kobolds who can live among the humans. Doing nothing but prostitution, theft and mercenary work. A weight on society. "I wouldn't say the last part but yes! and both of you have an affinity towards elves. Who coincidently don't seem to have an annoyance of their own." You stand up. This is madness. Before he can finish you ask Rodian who came up with the plan of attacking the kobolds. He sinks in his chair “I- I did Sulti, I suggested we use the same tactic the kingdom used against the Greenlander humans a hundred years ago" You stare into his eyes, he doesn’t avert his. “They thanked me, Sulti. They told me how clever I was, they- they…” You move outside, Rodian’s voice echoes from behind you. “It doesn’t matter whether you believe it. Valton only needs to convince the human kingdoms!"
Why does everything hurt? Your shoulders hurt, your calves hurt, cunt, head, arms, legs, feet, teeth, heart... Does everyone's everywhere hurt all the time as well? You call Sseth and tell him to bring an axe. After the wise one’s head is removed from her shoulders you tie it in a bag and send it off to Reynard with a trusted kobold. Tribute means duty, but also protection.
You look upon your busy encampment, finally the kobolds are setting up tents outside the cave and even creating a stockpile of supplies. You find Buddi sitting in a corner and try to connect with her. You sit next to her and offer some meat jerky; she accepts and eats it but remains silent afterwards. Seeing as she doesn’t want to tell you start yourself. How is the weather? “It is cool, mid-winter weather, more snows and storms may approach.” Has she memorized every possible response? You look around and see Rodian watching Keneith train some recruits. You ask what she thinks of this new creature. She cannot have an answer for that. Indeed, she looks at him for a brief moment and responds: “I don’t know” She then looks at your face expecting a response. You smile and ask what she personally thinks of him. She inspects him for a few more moments. “I think he is funny. Big legs, too big.” His leg is the same size as her. You giggle and pat her back. For once she doesn’t smile. You lean in and ask if anyone is taking care of her now. She thinks for a moment, “Sulti killed wise one.” You awkwardly pull your arm back and ask if she is not happy about that. She looks down. You had the only person in her world killed…
Just as you think that the discussion has broken down Poe reveals himself from the shadows. He comes over and kneels in front of Buddi. Has he been listening in? “Buddi, tell me, is it wrong to punch someone for no reason?” She looks at Poe for a moment, then raises her shoulders and tells that no one thought her about that. Poe turns to you now and asks the same question. Ignoring the fact that he had been totally spying on you, you answer with a firm yes. “Indeed, a logical answer. How about this. What if the person enjoyed being punched, suffered no injury from it and let everyone know that he was okay with being punched in the face but didn’t request it?” Uhhh… you say that then it would be weird but okay to punch him. “Well, then there is a situation where punching someone in the face randomly is acceptable behaviour?” You try to defend your point, but it is in vain. “How about another question: Is it okay to say… leave someone humiliated, physically hurt, depressed, feeling guilty, covered in filth, traumatised and given the possibility of having a much greater responsibility trust upon herself?” Is he- you feel your limbs burning again, you stare down like the little girl. Poe very gently rubs your arm; it feels good to be treated like the young Sulti again for a moment, but you push his hand off. He leans in and whispers in your ear. “Sulti, ignoring all else, maybe you should ask Buddi how she feels first. Not how she feels in general, the specific emotions.” You look back at the girl as Poe slips back into the darkness. You grab Buddi’s hand and go outside to spend some time together.
Hide and seek seemed harder when you were young.
It was actually fun to be with the child, you try to forget about you own as the tired Buddi slumps next to you. You both stare at the snow-covered meadow as the sun finally sets, leaving a red hue behind. You hold Buddi’s hand and tell her that it is getting cold and you should return before either of you catch something. She looks at the horizon for a moment then back at you. Without a word she finally hugs you and you rub her head. Once she lets go and both of you make it back to the cave. Loneliness, fear of abandonment, powerlessness, a whole lot of anxiety. Teaching her javelin throwing may have been overkill but she is content enough to talk by herself now. The scars run deep and Antoni or basically anyone else other than you could have done a better job making her feel better, but you’ve done your best. 
With the day’s jobs done the kobolds gather around the fire again to dance and sing. Keneith approaches you “No grand victory today, but morale is as good as it’s going to get.” You look at your kobolds: they are eating their rabbit, chatting, and possibly having sex behind a rock but you can’t be so sure with you bad eye. This can’t last however; you are still at war. The humans will come, with this many kobolds it’s only a matter of time before your cover is blown. You turn to Rodian watching the kobolds from a corner. You’ll have to take the tribe and leave these lands or stay and fight. The clock is ticking. Every day like this gives the enemy, let that be humans, the winter or the blood god himself, more time to prepare… You made the mistake of being complacent to fate once, you won’t make the same mistake again. Keneith thinks that you have nothing to say so he goes over to the fire, but you grab him firmly. You look him straight in the eyes and tell that every kobold needs to be at the top of their game. They must train everyday as if the next is going to be the final battle of their lives. He is taken back at first but manages to mutter a “Yes, first blood.” You hold him just long enough for blood flow to be interrupted then let go just as his arm starts going numb. He scampers away to Cuball’s arms. This can only end badly but you’ll make sure it’s not the people in this cave it ends badly for.
You can’t be bothered to call Poe, so you go over to the nearby lake to find a smooth rock.
You return to find Buddi huddled in a corner next to your bedroom’s entrance. You grab the sleepy girl’s hand and get in bed with her. The half-asleep child grabs your tail and hugs it tightly as she goes back to sleep. You spend what feels like an hour staring at the ceiling. What to do? How long till Reynard comes after you? How long till the humans come? Is Rodian right? You carefully remove Buddi’s tiny hands from your tail and give her a pillow to hug instead. You should get her your doll from your cabin before she becomes too old.
Having left the room, you find Rodian watching the stars from the cave’s entrance with Sseth a few steps behind him. You tell him that you’ll handle Rodian for now, he can join the kobolds by the fire.  He doesn’t move “First blood… it not my place but I think you should rest. You can talk with the scholar in the morning.” You angrily turn away from him and say that he should go work on himself before bothering with you “Poe is waiting for you with the others, we need our She-Wolf on her feet first. You can make plans later.” You hold his shoulder and stare into his eyes. He sighs and pulls out his knife, handing it to you. Then he walks over to the dancing kobolds. You almost forget to do so for a moment, then thank him under your breath for the weapon. No one hears it, maybe that’s for the better.
You sit next to Rodian. He starts his questions again even without looking at you: “Sulti, do you believe in divination.” You shrug, you have to if your kobolds also believe in it. “Valton also fallowed the same logic.” The name sends a shiver down your spine. “He would say that the gods are silent, and that all magic is abstracted natural philosophy.” You counter, what if prophecy and divination is also some natural element he didn’t discover yet. “Exactly, that’s what I would say too but he told me that I was thinking too little and also too much.” He turns from the stars to you. “In any case, there will be a joust soon. But this is no ordinary joust.” Joust? You remember your first and only kiss…a knight’s servant kobold…is he still- focus Sulti, focus! “This is no ordinary joust however, it’s a cover up! The knights and kings of the other four kingdoms will come with more than enough supplies for a proper campaign. Their levies are also in pre-emptive training. Valton has been planning this for over a year now with the rest of the natural philosophy advisors. He will finally reveal his plan before the joust. Irrefutable evidence as to why they should go to war with the elves. I, and many others in their circles think that a war like that would be disastrous. It happened at least once before and that’s what it led to.” He points to the barely visible black ruins under the darkening horizon. “If we destroy his evidence as to how to elves are supposedly against humans I and my associates will swoop in. We’ll humiliate Valton, dethrone him from being the prime natural philosopher. Then it’s all roses from then on.” You starkly ask him if he’ll advise the king from then on. “Well, yes, this will work out for me. But unlike Valton I’ll concentrate on infrastructure projects, better medicine, science etc. etc… I might even manage to make the king abdicate, push his daughter from the succession… change how to wheel turns.” That would be good, what about the kobolds? “In time we can heal the damage, maybe even make some improvements. Before now the only kobolds I knew were miserable slaves and experiments trapped in cages. I’ve had a bit of a shift in perspective here.” 
Your rise from your seat and stand in front of him. What does he expect from you? Now we will know if he is lying or not. “Simple, destroy Valton’s evidence chest and bring me his notebook. Then we can come up with ways to counter his points and he won’t have the evidence against elves.” You say that this all seems too convenient. “I agree, Valton always refuses to share his knowledge. If he had plenty of allies people would have been supporting him but he only has a few handful. If the evidence is gone, his life’s work, then he’ll be powerless.” So, you are expected to sneak into the city and destroy these papers? “Indeed, you know where he lives. The house itself is guarded and none of my friends can find a way in. The criminal underworld was crippled after the slums burned down. You kobolds are small and agile enough to find a way in.” You won’t have to wait for Reynard to save you all. You need to take action yourself. You tell Rodian that you’ll find a way. He shakes your hand and wordlessly goes back into the cave to sleep. As he leaves you tell him to find the skinny, singing, purple kobold and make him come to you. He nods. You need a massage, maybe more. 

… a smile
Give me your hand
So we may have a land
Built Under moon and star
For the love of our beautiful pact
Dreaming of a future that may yet…

You wake up with a splitting headache. Your entire body hurts, this can’t be normal, people live with like this? Downing Pechorin’s medicine helps but only so much. You stagger out of your room. It’s snowing again, at least the kobolds have constructed a small wall made out of animal skins and clothes that cover the cave entrance, keeping the cold out. You find Keneith, Cuball, Poe and Buddi sitting silently on a log together next to the dying fire. Your concubine stands up as soon as you approach and starts massaging your back “Feeling better Sulti?” You harshly push his hands off and say that you’ve spoken to the scholar, he has plans. Keneith looks down, Cuball speaks for both: “Sulti, Sseth stayed up all night guarding your door, we are a little worried. You were shaken when you came here but it’s getting worse.” Your hand rolls into a fist, you coldly explain that pleasantries can wait until the kobold race is no longer in danger. Keneith raises his head, “Sulti, please?” … 
You feel you hand shaking and hide it behind your back, before the kobolds can speak you shout at them that no one here has the luxury to stand still, least of them you… They stare in silence
You ask Keneith if he can still fight with one arm. He looks down again then waves his arm around to show he can swing a sword. You pull up a stool and talk of Rodian’s plan, then explain how it will be executed: Keneith will take the four of you up to the broken bit of the wall from where he managed to climb into the city. Then you’ll lead them to Valton’s mansion through the roof tops. Cuball and Buddi will break into the- Cuball stops you “Buddi? The child? What?” You explain that she is the smallest most agile kobold in the tribe since you are still weak. She can go where no one else can. Cuball sighs loudly and covers his face. You know the layout of the house; it will be easy. You ask if there are any problems. There definitely are problems but neither the couple nor Buddi say anything. Poe stands up, “Sulti… please just remember that safety is our top priority.” You nod at him and go over to get thicker clothes from your tribute pile.
As you rummage trough the trash Poe comes over and sticks his hand into the clothes pile, taking out a leather jacket and handing it to you. You put it on and prepare to leave but the kobold holds you back; “ Sulti, you don’t have to do this, no one is forcing you” Is he retarded? You angrily push his hand away and simply ask him if you should have not attacked the convoy when you first came to cave and leave the tribe open to the wise one’s influence; you then ask him if you should not have bothered to break out of prison and hope that someone else save you; you ask him if he has a logical and functional plan as to how anyone can stop the humans gathering in the city from coming here and killing all of you. “Sulti… please”. You want to slap him in the face, instead you pull out Antoni’s hair from your head and throw it in his face then tell him that he can be the acting first blood until you come back if he thinks he is so good at deciding how people should live. Someone has to do something, that’s what they don’t realize; if you don’t act others will…
The roads are silent. No carts bringing goods, no tracks on the snow, even the animals seem quieter today. You lead the way with Buddi holding your hand. Seeing you, Cuball also tries to hold Keneith’s hand but realises that he is on Keneith’s left and awkwardly moves to the other side of him. His companion doesn’t seem interested in walking with hands held either way. The stones underneath are slippery, you realize that without thinking about it you’d been trying to slide forward instead of walking. You stop the game and keep walking normally.
Suddenly a voice comes from behind: “Hey! Folk, are you lost?” You draw your knife and prepare for a fight. A figure stands behind you, an elf in golden colored armour! “Wait, you are not with the brigade. You are blood folk. Hah! We thought you guys were done for.” You demand an explanation, who are they? What do they want? He stares at your companions first, then at you: “Strange, you must have forgotten. Your storytellers must have died off. Come with me, we’ll give you proper clothing and an explanation. You weigh the options; things didn’t go well last time you fallowed an elf… Buddi pulls your hand “We should listen to them” You trust your little wisdom machine and signal Keneith and Cuball to fallow. 
The elf takes you through the woods, seemingly fallowing random paths and trails until you reach a clearing. Despite being out in the open it’s darker than the forest and isn’t covered by snow. He turns to the four of you and makes you form a line, then slowly fallows a small, barely visible patch of dirt leading to the clearing’s centre where a boulder is located. After reaching the centre he places his hand on the stone. You cautiously approach and place your hand next to his.  
A brilliant flash of light blinds you. You pull your hand away and blindly stumble into something, falling to the ground. You manage to open your eyes; you are in the middle of an elvish war camp! At least a thousand soldiers! Tents and fires covering the field!

The poor uneducated creature doesn’t even know what a stone of obscuration looks like. No wonder they couldn’t stand up to the humans. After telling the other folk to close their eyes before touching the stone I go over to the black one rubbing her eyes on the ground and help her up. She is so light and small for her age, must have suffered some serious malnutrition or some disease as a child. I start talking about alteration magic but she just looks at me confused and bluntly asks: “Will you protect us from the humans?” Taken back, I hold her hand and make all four fallow me to the commander’s tent. He’s heard the commotion but still seems surprised after seeing the band of destitute, starving, wounded folk. Still, he composes himself and salutes the black one that seems to be the leader. “Our scouts and spies said that all fo- sorry, “kobolds” within the kingdoms were exterminated. Seems like they were wrong. I am the captain of the first legion, can you introduce yourself?” they were called kobolds here, no? She lowers the hood on her cloak and responds: “I am Sulti, first blood of the northern tribe; well, what’s left of it at least. We were on our way to the city.” The commander smiles with pride. “You kobolds! Always on the move, always living! It is truly brave of you to attempt to save your people.” She seems surprised “people? There are kobolds in the city?” “Well, yes. They are being held in the… ugh… whorehouses of the city, the poor creatures. I thought you were off to save them from their fates.” She leans on a pole and wipes her face; only then do I notice the chipped teeth. “We are trying to destroy the information about how elves will kill all humans.” What? I make eye contact with the commander and the same thing crosses our minds:” how much do they know?” 
The commander walks over the kobold and crouches so that they are on the same level. “Sulti, peace was never an option. The humans will attack, for one reason or another. Whoever told you that is lying, this is… not something we want.” The kobold stays quite for a moment, then sniffs around. Suddenly she takes a step back and angrily responds: “You bastards! You are manipulating me, aren’t you? I can smell it on you!” I step in and try to explain that the pheromones don’t affect her decision making but she keeps stepping backwards until hitting the corner of the tent. Then she pulls out a knife. You try to pull out your own but the commander stops you. The other kobolds rush to help her and slowly calm her down “Sulti, us elves and you kobolds used to be very close. We are sorry that we abandoned you after the last war but believe me we’ll do anything to help your kind once this war is done. She seems a little calmer now, puts the knife back in her scabbard then sits on the cold ground and speaks:
“What do you want to do about the city?” The commander scratches his chin. “Well, you say that you have a way in?” She points to the kobold with a missing arm. He explains: “One side of the old walls cracked. The humans covered it up with bricks but a small shaft was left inside the wall itself. Narrow enough for kobolds to climb through and get up.” The commander snaps his fingers. “Sulti, if you can get into the city you can lower the city gates it would a great boon for us! We were planning to levitate in at night but if we can simply walk in we’ll have our powers at their full, easily decimating the knights and kings of the human realms! We can end this war in a day.” I chuckle and say that I’d gladly kiss her feet if she helped me and my brothers and sisters win the battle with our magic alone. The commander nods “Feet kissing later. Sulti, will you help us?” She thinks for a moment then spits on the ground. “Fine! We will.” The commander claps his hands. “Great! Their morning bell rings at 5, that’s 10 hours from now. We will wait outside the gates with our forces invisible, if you can’t get the gates open until morning we’ll attack ourselves.” She pulls out her knife and waves it in front of us. “Do you have any swords better than this for us?” The commander laughs heartedly “Swords? I got something better!” He goes over to the supply cabinet and hands each kobold except the child a few fire signet rings. “Just point them at whoever you want dead for a few seconds. When the light becomes blinding they will turn to ash.” He then puts one on himself and points it at me. I look straight at it while the thing slowly becomes brighter. Why did I have to join the first legion?

The elf stands there with his feet firmly planted on the ground. You think he’ll actually let himself get fried for a moment but the commander quickly shifts the ring’s focus towards a plate of meat next to the elf. The well-cooked food lights up and turns to a smoking charred lump before you can even lament about your hunger. You make your kobolds put the rings in their pockets until you get to the city. The commander turns to you: “Kobolds are resourceful, you are stronger than the humans at heart. With fortune on our side no one will be able to stop us! The status quo will return and you’ll prosper again.” Whatever, you mindlessly nod and exit the tent. 
The elven soldiers wave at you and cheer you on as you return to the forest. Keneith, Cuball and Buddi all seem to enjoy the attention. As the hour goes on you cross the village you thought of as home, past the black ruins you spent so much time in with Tomokie and swim across the river Antoni would force you to get washed in as a child. The stone walls of the city come in sight. They feel intimidating, you are as scared as the first time you saw them.
Keneith takes the lead. After circling the walls under the cover of darkness he stops next to a much older part of it. True to his word, the newly made walls are hallow inside. Keneith points to the small hole, you look up. It is narrow and hard to climb, Keneith won’t be able to make it with one arm. Cuball hugs him lovingly, then goes into the hole, Buddi fallows him. As you are about to enter Keneith grabs you. “Sulti, I don’t give a shit about anything else. I just want you to know that If Cuball doesn’t come back… you make sure he is okay.” You shrug him off. As you start climbing the walls, he grabs your leg. You look down. He isn’t angry anymore, just sad. You feel a weight on your shoulders. You turn your eyes away and apologize to him… not sure for what. He lets go and you climb up after the others.
The climb is long and hard. You cut yourself many times on the stone and the increasingly tight space suffocates you. After what feels like hours climbing you manage to get up top and breathe a sigh of relief with the others. You are on the walls, the city can be seen below. Cuball points to the lit watchtower: “The gates are raised from there; I’ve seen the mechanism being used once.” You quietly start moving towards the watchtower, walking along the walls and avoiding guard patrols. You stop your party once you are half the way there. You can see the main square from here, a festival is happening. Knights in shining armour walk among the crowds. Something is being given out to the people but you can’t make out what it is. A few of the things are thrown to a pack of dogs that start fighting over it. You look away and prepare to move on. Then you hear two people talk right beside the wall, on the ground. You listen in, seems like of them is peeing in the canal. “…but it would be a waste, right?” the other one responds “Yeah, shame we have to kill it though, I wanted know how long she could last.” “Same here, her scales are turning from purple to white from all the spunk. I wanted to see the end of it.” 
Could they be talking about… impossible… can’t be her.
“I think I’ll go take care of her now before we change our minds. The guards keep pestering me.” He stops peeing and walks over to a house right by the walls. Is it her? It’s just so unlikely, could be anyone. You must help them regardless. You turn to Cuball and make him wear a ring, then order him to open the gates with Buddi. Despite your better judgment you and one to Buddi too. Having overheard the conversation as well Cuball stops you “Sulti, even if it is Tomikei that doesn’t mean we can save her. She was an angel for sure but we can’t risk everything over her.” Makes sense that her colleges knew of her, but no one knows her as well as you do. You will save her. You order them to keep moving towards the gates then crawl over to the roof closest to the walls. The narrow jump is hard but you make it. You keep to the roof until you reach the house the man went into; you jump through a window and enter the house.
The room is messy, trash all over the place, barely lit by a few candles in the hallway. You walk into the hallway and smell an awful odour leading into an otherwise unremarkable half open door, holding your breath you enter. The man is standing beside a bed, he has a broom raised. Before you can act he brings it down on the bed and a kobold gasps. You quickly raise the ring towards the man and look away. Just as the second hit comes down a flash lights the room. The ring makes a deafening sound and when you open your eyes a charred pile of burning flesh falls on the ground. You gag, the smells are too awful. Before you collapse you manage to stuff a piece of ripped clothing on your nose. You rush over to the bed it’s Tomokie! And she- she- she… oh god… You feel like fainting. 
How could anyone… She must have spent the entire time since the massacre on the bed, being tortured like this. 
You don’t even bother about the filth. You hug your wriggling friend and burst into tears. She manages to open her eyes and stares blankly at you. You kiss her forehead; the muck enters your mouth but you don’t care. She tries to say something but only manages to drool. You try use your remaining claws to cut the ropes holding her down but they aren’t sharp enough, not even your teeth work. Desperate, you instead look at the bedframe holding down the ropes. The age-old wood can barely hold her weight, so it comes down easily with one kick, releasing the ropes. They leave deep scars that quickly start bleeding. To your surprise she manages to rise from the bed despite her status. She is just… oh Tomikei. You start ripping your clothes to make bandages. With feet trembling she starts walking towards the window. You don’t understand why at first but as she comes closer you realize. You rush over to her and barely hold her by the horns as she tries to fling herself off. 
You break into tears again and hold her down. She starts whimpering and you notice that you are crushing her. You get off before she is crushed further and make her lie on the ground. As she tries to get up again you feed her some water that gives her some life again. She looks at you. You both stare at each other for a moment. She manages to whisper under her breath.
“Sulti? Sulti?” She faintly smiles at you “You- you look awful. Are you- are you okay?” You hug her and start crying over her chest. She weakly licks your head, she started doing that after you came to her crying again one day. A man had hit you on the head after a failed theft… she’d always be there to patch your bruises…
A blinding light illuminates the night. You turn to the window and see a flash coming from the watch tower. They must have used the ring! You turn to Tomokie. Do you tie her up again? She could try… You take a deep breath and look her straight in the eyes, then tell her that you’ll return as fast as possible. You beg her to just rest for now, she simply nods and slumps on the ground again with her eyes closed. You rush out the way you came, climbing the roof and barely making the jump to the walls.
You run as fast as you can, your eyes sight is bad but there are flickering lights on the other side of the wall also coming towards the tower. You enter the open room where the gate mechanism is.  The smell of burning flesh enters your nostrils even before looking inside. Next to a charred corpse a mortified human with piss dripping down his pants is slowly opening the gates. You see Buddi huddled in a corner crying and go over to her but Cuball stops you. “Sulti! She just roasted a guard! Why the fuck did you give her the ring?” You look at the charred corpse and ask when the door will be open. He tries to say something else but decides against it. “The- the mechanism needs two humans to work, but we lost the other so it’s barely moving.” You tell Cuball to join you then start cranking the other handle by the human. Cuball grunts loudly and joins you.
The going is slow but just as you start hearing the footsteps and armour clanking of the guards the mechanism brakes down, the rope holding the gates snaps and at the speed of a swallow the ropes start spinning in place. With a loud thud the gates drop down, shaking the entire tower. You grab both kobolds and rush down the stairs leading to the ground.
Just in front of the now broken gates a group of knights on horses are gathering and they turn towards your group. But before they can even prepare to attack thunder lights the sky. Even at a distance you feel the shockwave and dust covers the scene. You cover Buddi’s face and close your eyes. Once the dust falls back down you look at the scene: The entire group is gone, bits of metal and flesh and blood litter the area, most of it is still on fire. Before you can even take in the scene properly Elves in armour enter through the gates in a quick but orderly formation, the commander is at their head and you run to him. He gives a few orders to his soldiers then notices you. “Sulti! You did it! You magnificent bast- I mean kobold. This will be a cake walk now.” You thank him and ask if there are any doctors around, with a concerned face he points to an Elf next to him in white armour. You tell the doctor that your friend needs help and grab his hand. The commander nods at the soldier and you start dragging the doctor behind you to the house with Tomikei. 
Then a scream comes from the city. Not the scream of a man, but a child, not a scream in terror but in pain. You turn around just as an elf blasts a group of children watching the chaos from the peripheries. Before you can even process what’s happening another fireball lights a house on fire, it’s resident just manage to make it out before the it collapses but the group of women, children and men are put down by a group of Elves with swords. You let go of the doctor’s hand and look for the commander but he is running up the square, towards the castle. The doctor grabs your hand again and you shout at him to explain what is happening. “Uh, we are wiping them out.” You point at an old woman’s corpse that’s on fire. “Well, we need to remove all of them. That’s how it goes. I know it’s cruel but at least we are doing it quick, they’d do the same to us- hell they did worse to you, no?” You turn to Cuball who is watching the chaos in equal terror and tell him to get this doctor to the house where Tomikei was. He ignores the order and watches the carnage. You grab his arm and shake him back to consciousness then repeat what you said. He holds the doctor by one hand, Buddi by the other and runs towards the building. You start chasing the column of the commander.
The efficiency of the Elves is horrifying; no torture, no looting, not even war cries… only murder… fireballs decimate houses and its inhabitants fall out of windows… small lightning bolts light up alleyways, the few guard who are left standing are killed on the spot … finally the bells of the church start ringing from a distance as screams fill the air. You run up the streets towards the castle. The citizens of the city ignore you, some try to carry their valuables out while others are in their night gowns but all of them are killed by the advancing elves. 
Then a monstrous explosion rocks the city, a brilliant flash of light baths the temple square. You turn towards the temple and see its tower leaning, quickly you hide behind a building and cover your face. The sound of a terrible crash penetrates your ears. When you open your eyes again the entire street it covered in dust, only the base of the temple remains in view now. 
As you leave the carnage behind the city feels quieter compared to before screams and boots marching can be heard now. At least the Elves are only killing the humans. A group of terrified kobold survivors and dwarves wait in the middle of a square with Elves guarding them. 
After the exhausting run you reach the castle gates. They are just as formidable as the city gates but properly guarded this time. You find the commander watching robed Elves chanting around a circle, in its middle a winged creature stands chained, is this what dragons are like? The commander approaches you “Sulti, is the wounded okay?” You try to ignore the question yourself and ask what is happening the army. He seems surprised. “What’s happening? We are destroying them the way we are meant to.” Meant to? “Oh! You didn’t know?” He is clearly faking ignorance! You raise your fist and demand answers. “You do not know anything! The humans are ignorant, they do not know their place, they want to make their own world with their own rules they don't want to obey God  because they... Look, In short, the humans… well… they have a tendency to attack us Elves once every couple of centuries. So, we are given no choice but to come do this once in a while. Believe me, we tried all else, but the choices are us getting the genocide or them getting the genocide. They will live those hardy humans! Sadly, we’ll have to do this again when that happens. We can't let God go to sleep, if you understand” You look in horror at the commander who pats your head and points to chanting Elves. “Look! They are about to finish the ritual, those dumbasses in the castle think they are safe but once the spell is set their entire citadel will be black stones and ash.” 
A hand grabs you; you turn to see a kobold. The fast one you sent to Reynard for tribute. “First Blood Sulti! We heard of what you did! All the kobold tribes are in awe!” What you did? “Yes, you opened the gates and lead the charge! You saved us all and won! You are our champion. Reynard sent his forces to take the city with the Elves, but now they won’t even be needed. You are truly the greatest among us.” 
Greatest… greatest… There can only be one top dog, Reynard will make sure of that. He told you that you’d know when he would betray you, didn’t he?
You take a huge breath and thank the kobold and tell him to enjoy the battle. He cheers in your name and takes off. You look one last time at the castle then run towards Tomokie.
An Elf waits in front of the building, presumably to guard it from fire. You run over to him and ask if the kobold is okay, he coldly tells you to go up. Holding your breath, you climb up and burst into the room. 
She still there, but Cuball and Buddi are not tending to her. You slide next to Tomokie and grab her hand, it’s cold… You feel tears are running down your chin, you turn to Cuball, he shakes his head and bitterly closes his eyes “She was dead when we came Sulti, it’s a miracle she survived this long.” You break down, fall over her corpse. You kiss her, hug her, try to fix her clothes... A hand grabs you, Buddi. She tries to hug you but you push her away and stand up. Just as you are about to shamble out of the awful room you realize what you did. You turn back to the still teary-eyed child; you should go over and hug her. You don’t, you avoid Tomokie's dead gaze and run out. 
It’s snowing lightly, the ground slowly getting coated with snow under the faint morning sun. You try to breath fresh air but only ash and soot fills your nostrils. You slowly start walking towards the wealthy district, eyes on the ground.  The screams are dying down, they killed half the city in less than two hours. You cross the burning houses and corpse littered streets; Elves watch the lone kobold stagger in the streets. You look at the market as you pass by, produce is sitting unguarded. You come to a stall filled with fruit. They were giving out free samples once, not to kobolds of course. You tried to convince the shopkeeper that you’d buy by showing your sack of coins. Another kobold charged at you and knocked you on the floor before the merchant could even look at the money… It’s all here now, free berries, apples, peaches… your stomach growls. You hold a pear, take a large bite, then put it back and go on your way.
There are no corpses or burning buildings in this part of the town, you approach a patrolling soldier and ask where all the people are. “The rich bastards? They must have gone to the castle to hide. Won’t do any good.” He looks over the buildings. “Actually, I can sense heat in one of the buildings, I don’t think it’s fire, maybe a servant. It’s coming from the top floor. Why don’t you check it out?” He points to a large mansion, it’s Valton’s. You walk towards the house, past the stairs where that kobold died… past the wide-open doors and up the stairs. All the doors open, gold litters the floor, along with a single slipper. You grab it; it’s a women’s, expensive too… she is resourceful, maybe she made it out the city before sunrise.
You walk up the stairs, past all the empty rooms until you reach the attic. A single shut door. You go through, it’s an office.
“She comes back! Was your last visit that lovely? Maybe I can offer some more porridge? No, you are a grown-up lady kobold now aren’t you? A warrior even, an eater of men and leader of tribes. A hero perhaps? As master of house I should offer you the thing you really need…” Valton, pushes off a pile of paper from his desk. Without even getting off his chair he raises a bottle of wine. You stare blankly at him. He chuckles and pours a glass for you, then one for himself. “Oh, don’t act so surprised. You knew about all this from the start, didn’t you? You clever little kobold. It was all an act! A masterful one, truly! In all my years I have never seen such a player! Bravo! Bravo!” He claps his hands as you grab the glass of wine and lie on his couch. “Tired? Me too, I’ve been thinking and reading all night. Wish I’d discovered this “coffee” earlier.” You turn to him with dead eyes and take a sip of wine, then ask an amazingly simple question: “why?” The scholar looks up at the ceiling and chuckles. “Why? Why? Why does the lion hunt when it will die one day anyway? Why does the flower bloom when it will die next season? Why does the bottle open when it will be finished now?” He downs the entire glass and fills it up again. “I thought I was so clever, thinking you were a pawn and I the queen! Turns out we were playing checkers all along, marching to our fates on linear paths… We could have won, we’d almost won the first time, but the Elves managed to win by luck, the second time we knew what we were up against, but then you kobolds came and ruined everything. Those stone ruins outside the city? Those were called “Kobold’s Monument” On Elven maps for three hundred years. This time… this time I don’t even know what happened… was I not good enough, too many variables perhaps?” He grabs what appears to be a cage from under his desk and gleefully shows you a pigeon. “Did you know that the kobolds living today have twice the strength, speed and likely intelligence of the ones who lived two centuries ago? ‘Natural selection’ my master would call it, the weak die and the strong breed. I had to test it myself, bred pigeons; after 50 years I have the best in the land.” He ties a tube to the feet of the bird and turns back to you. “Humans, we didn’t have much more time to prepare, you see? Honestly, if we didn’t surprise the kobolds and you people had time to gather yourselves, we could have lost”
You look at your blunted claws and try to sharpen them on the window still, perhaps the humans shouldn’t destroy the other races? “Perhaps, that’s what I thought when I was young. Then that dammed teacher drilled into my head all his theories and calculations and simulations… We are getting worse at this. The last two times there were actual battles, now the city and all the knights of the kingdoms will fall overnight.” You look at his papers, he knew exactly what the humans had, what the elves had, what the kobolds had. He knew exactly how each action would play out. Why did he lose? “That’s what I am thinking, is there a thing such as luck? Maybe trying to solve the random was my mistake or perhaps I should have studied more. Perhaps- perhaps I did everything right. Perhaps all this was meant to happen and we all just played our parts.”
He looks at the fires outside the window, then slowly pushes a letter across his desk. “Sulti, I was hoping- I knew you’d come. I have grown wiser today, I truly realized how little I know.” He points to a small picture frame on the wall, weird but strangely beautiful symbols cover a canvas. “Your old man, ‘Ntoni, he drew that. Knew “old kobold”, not draconic but “Old Kobold”, from one of the masters he had studied under. Why he learned that random language I never knew but he did. When I told him about my kobold studies he said that he’d seen kobold writing on tablets within the blackened ruins. I was so cheerful, then the translations came in. They were dumb drinking songs, love poems and other useless garbage. I stopped reading the letters after the fifth one… until late last night. I should have told him about my other findings, he would have helped me. I was so stupid and prideful” He points to the letter. “Do you believe in divination Sulti? I never did. But I’m not so sure now. Can you read that for me little kobold?” You take a sip of wine then push your tired legs off the bed. The letter is old, old as you are perhaps. It has Antoni ’s familiar signature on it. Two papers fall out of it. You look at the first one:
To my dear Friend Valton
Valton! I have translated and transcribed another text. If you though the last one was interesting, you will love this one. It reminded me of the of those dumb songs we’d sing at that tavern in our youth, you know the place, there was that barmaid you’d always go on about! Just read these lines: Bloody warriors, smoking ruins, the heroic kobold with his battle axe! Hah!  In fact, you remember that infant kobold I found on the bridge last week? Well, I thought it would be hilarious to name the thing after the hero! She is in her cradle right now, wiggling her little arms and tail! She is so cute! Can you imagine her leading troops down the streets? Maybe I will make her read the poem when she is old enough.
Well, that’s all, don’t let me keep you away from your studies.
Your dear friend: Antoni
…
“Finished? Go on, read the poem you cute little kobold. Let’s honour the old man’s wish, no?” You take another sip to stop your shaking hands and sit back on the bed.

Hear! Hear! Hear the hero that comes
Hear! Hear! Hear his war cries
Sult-Sultharahim was the one leading the charge
His axe, sharpened to an edge like the crescent moon
His folk, bloodier and more loyal than any before
His wrath, burning the wretched city to the cold ground
Hear! Hear! Hear the hero that will come again
Hear! Hear! Hear his war cries that will fill the streets once again
Booming with the words of Tinkering Ti
…
Valton downs the rest of the wine glass and slams it on the table, “I certainly hope the poet who wrote that isn’t too angry we stole his work, they may even be happy about how we dramatized it.”
…
“Tell me Sulti, do you think I would have killed you right then and there If I had read the song? I did not believe in prophecy, but you can never be too sure, can you? Maybe there is no grand plan. Maybe it’s just chance… but it can’t be, can it? Perhaps more variables…” You drop the paper. You ask what his name was, the kobold he killed. “Which- oh, you still remember him? Personally, I found him a bit boring.” The name. “Name? He had no name, he was just “The Kobold”. Wait, I did give him a name! He kept begging for one, so I finally told him the draconic word for “stupid”. It was funny for a while but he stopped using it one day for some reason. In any case he is gone now, the servants butchered him up before sunrise. I think they put a little broth of him into the soup you had. I personally prefer my kobold fried, add some salt and- hmmm, I could go for some with my wine right now.”
He closes his eyes then turns his back to you, looking over the smoldering city now covered in white snow.
You wish you could pick your executions too, fucking bastard. You finish your wine and stumble out the room. He doesn’t say a word as you leave. 
The streets are cold now, the Elf approaches “Didn’t do it? Uh, well I’ll go handle whoever it is. You look cold, take this.” He puts his cloak over your shoulders. You look at his hands for a while, then turn to his face and thank him. The Elf wipes the blood off his sword and smiles. You leave the street and head towards the city centre as he enters the house. Something flies out of Valton’s window and goes up towards the sky. You look at the object disappear as it goes over the city walls.
You go walk the streets for some time, most of the elves are besieging the castle so only corpses and the dying are left now. Your feet take you back to the fountain where you used to sit with her... 
“Katia”, that was her name.
As you stand next to the calm water a shout rings out: “Hey! I was right, wasn’t I?” You turn towards the voice, it’s the old bookstore owner lying in a pool of blood next to a few corpses; his smoldering ruin of a shop just up ahead. “Turns I wasn’t important enough to finish off, care to give me some water before I stop hurting?” You blankly stare at him. “Don’t care to? Well, that’s fine. If there is not one person out there who cares for me then I’m sure my last wish wasn’t important in the first place!” Your eyes search around for Sseth, Cuball or Poe, no one is coming. You cup your hands and take a bit of the freezing water then knell beside the dying man for him to drink. The bookstore owner drinks all the water in one gulp then slumps back on the ground with his eyes closed.
You sit next to fountain, hoping for something. After some time the cold starts biting your scales and you go search for shelter.
As the sun dips below the buildings you find yourself in the temple square; you avoid the burning rubble covering the ground and make your way inside the temple. Countless corpses cover the floor, no doubt died praying for a miracle that never came. Two elves see you; they wave and whistle but you ignore them. No doubt disappointed, they go back to admiring the stained-glass windows. You start climbing the broken tower.
Even with its top removed the tower reaches high above the city. Each step up feels harder than the last, but you are harder. The view from up top is incredible. The entire city can be seen. You admire the streets, countryside, forest, ruins... Almost everything you have ever known can be seen from here. You look down at the ground from the dizzying height, then push a stone down: one second, two, three, four…

Keneith rushes into the temple. It’s filled to the brim with corpses as well! Trying not to gag he walks towards two elves while holding the wall. They approach him in response, stepping on the bodies like it’s nothing. “Hey! Folk, looking for your buddy?” Buddy? You ask if they saw a black female kobold with missing fingers. “She was female, black and looked like the sort who’d be missing a few fingers.  I think she went up the temple, are you part of her missing limbs club?” Keneith runs up the stairs, just as he is about to reach the top something heavy hits the ground below. He stops for a moment then keep running up. 
… She is there, sitting on a rock, looking at the city. She turns to her friend, her eyes are even more sunken, the dark scales are now pitch black from all the soot. A cloak barely covers the wounds on her arms drained of blood;  “Keneith?” He holds her shoulder and asks what’s happening. “What is happening? I was asking the same thing.” She pushes another rock off the tower. Keneith clenches his teeth as it hits the ground with a loud thud. “Keneith, do you see that smudge in the horizon?” The kobolds looks through the smog at the group near the forest that is coming towards the city then tell her that it looks like a small army of kobolds. She giggles “We don’t have much time then.”  
Keneith grabs her hand “together we’ll make everything right, the war is over.” Sulti seems unfazed “Over? No, never over. You wouldn’t understand Keneith” She turns back and smiles weakly “You… you are… I think you are good Keneith” That came out weird but still her friend smiles back at her then hug her tighter, asking what is wrong. For the first time Keneith hears her laugh. It’s a growled, but enduring sound. She stands up without a word, he asks where she is going. “I don’t know, I just have to go.” Keneith instead ask how long she’ll be going. “How long? I might just fall halfway down the stairs and break my neck. Or maybe I’ll drop dead 130 years from now. I’ll try not to cause massacres again. Take care of Buddi, Keneith. Take care of her well, I think she might matter.” He lets go of her. They both look over the burning city. A light is coming from the castle, it’s slowly getting bigger.


Sky, swallowed by the night
Sea, hidden under the waves
I have the happiest, brightest hope
Thank god, one day we will all die






Do you hear?
The will of God
How it now sleeps
It will rise again
It will be whole again
For everything is God
Except God
God is entropy
And nothing is perfection
yet
